Am I the only one who thought this was going to be like The Button?
You are not alone.
Boo
Are you saying boo or boo-urns?
I said Boo-urns.
Boo-urns?
Boo, you whore.
YANA
I came here to press a button.
Am sad now.
TBH, we had a plan to have some "The Button" type thing.
However, we felt that there were bigger issues to discuss with our community to talk about.
I was a backer of the button tho, so here
[PRESS ME]
That won't do anything, but it's fun. Right?
I found it fun...
all it did was [DEPRESS ME]
I... I can't get it to do right :(
It goes blue if you keep pressing it quickly!
Mine goes green... Am I doing it right?
Maybe that means you get a higher score than me!
Or vice versa.
I don't know the rules.  :-(
What ever happened to that by the way? Didn't the devs of the button say they'd use it to produce some cool data? It all just sorta died down when it hit the Holy 0.
The data dump is here.
Oh cool, thanks!
I like what /r/dataisbeautiful did by creating this heat map
https://www.reddit.com/r/dataisbeautiful/comments/38y3hu/63_days_of_button_pressing_in_8_seconds_an/
Took me only 0 seconds to upvote this post
Purple scum
"Those who affected the clock the least will be offered paradise in return." ~parables of Saint-60
Probably.
spoken like a filthy purple
I'm a proud 59.
proud
59
What kind of monster are you!?
57s all day, every day
The Pressiah was a 59! We are the chosen people!
He was a 60! This is cold hard fact you hand worshippers!
I got excited :(
All is forgiven by the Holy 0.
WHERE'S THE PRESSIAH WHEN YOU NEED HIM
...Says the non-presser.
I'm not just a non-presser, I'm pope of the Church of the Holy 0.
Welcome to The Catalogue! You are the first 60s ever. /s
I thought something bad happened to AskReddit with the title.
I'm a greenie.
It's just like it, I'm scared for when it hits zero and nothing happens before it.
Great news, but please rephrase your post in the form of a question or it will be reported and removed in accordance with rule 1a).
/s
Bloody hypocrite mods
It's in our rules that mod posts are exempt from the rules. Fine print, son!
And therefore exempt from the rule exempting them from the rules.
Check and mate motherfuckers.
Shit. Back to the drawing board, everyone. Black out the sub!
I think this also counts as a personal soapbox
The vote manipulation at the alter of celebrity is a bit disturbing.  One of the basic beliefs of reddit is that users are authentic and more or less treated equally.
This is neither authentic or equal.
What did I miss? Who vote manipulated and when?
https://i.imgur.com/Obafhpc.png
That's some pretty disgusting behavior by the admins.
We agree. That's why we thought people deserve to know. Important to point out that it's not all admins - just one or two.
They are a company, they work as a unit this is being done by reddit as a company.
If the chef is bad, the whole restaraunt is bad.
Yeah, but the writers of a game and the graphics team are both in the same company, that doesn't mean they know all the inner workings of each other.
Reddit isn't a large development company. This is a significant marketing move, it would be foolish to attribute it to only 1-2 employees. There are even several people in your example that know what both are doing.
It still means that the actions of one team reflect on the other team, though.
That's a silly line. All admins are represented by all other admins' actions, seeing as they are representatives of reddit.
If they are doing it under the imprimatur of the reddit brand, then it's not just one or two of them; it's reddit as a company.
TIL. Thanks for the link. I had no idea this happened.
Didn't karmanaut used to be pretty reviled by the community as the worst of the worst in terms of the excesses of the whole poweruser phenomenon? Kind of interesting how the last few months have rehabilitated him as a champion of the average reddit user.
He did something bad (that turned out to be sort of the right thing to do but it was still for the wrong reasons) so the reaction was bad. Now he did something good, which deserves a good reaction. Ignoring anything good done by someone just so we can hold a grudge against them never helped anyone.
My favourite thing is the conversation between him and his alternate account in which he congratulates himself on his own hard work.
Link?
If that doesn't scream insecure...
A bunch of people got angry at him for removing the AMA of Bad Luck Brian (which turned out to be fake anyway) for not fitting within the rules of the sub.
He was also known as a huge karma whore and there was plenty of people that felt he was using methods that are not strictly approved to get as much karma as he did.
Well, his name kinda hints it.
It was the most downvoted comment ever
It has since been overtaken by kn0thing's popcorn comment.
I thought the previous most downvoted comment was some shitpost comment on /r/atheism? However, no fucking clue why kn0thing thought that was a good idea to say that.
Karmanaut was also responsible for the banning of Shitty_Watercolor as well, right (for a signature-esque link to the blog with all of the drawings)? I know it got lifted eventually though.
For being an online personality after already doing an ana himself a few months prior.
Reddit placed ads that linked to tom hanks comments.
in addition to twitter and facebook posts about it
If anyone else did that they'd get a shadow ban.
Well if you make the rules, it means you have free reign to break them - as long as everyone else doesn't catch on and go somewhere else.
This was further compounded by actions that demonstrated disconnect with the general workings of the subreddits, most notably with the recent "celebrity promotion strategy" from Team Amplify
Read the screenshot.
Reddit is arranging for celebrities to post comments then immediately promoting the comments with reddit ads.
I don't know what you're talking about. The ads team were just really on the ball and noticed Tom Hanks making comments only seconds after it happened and quickly whipped up ads.
You dropped this: /s
Adam Savage's presence on reddit always felt so much more authentic.
This is obviously the first stage of a plan to manufacture "authentic" celebrity experiences on Reddit and I'm really worried what's next. Alexis has hinted at account verifications for celebrities and I would be really disappointed if that included things that highlight the user in comment trees. There's also the concern of how we know it's the celebrity and not just a PR team once they're "verified".
Would mods be within their rights to just ban celebrity accounts from their subreddits should this sort of manipulation become the norm?
With the rules as they currently are, mods are allowed to ban any users for any reason they like.
That would certainly be an interesting spectacle to watch.
And the Admins can override anything they want, it's just a matter of whether or not they already have easy to use tools in place to do it.
Wouldn't be surprised if admins made celebrities immune to banishment, however. "Promotional strategy."
I would be really disappointed if that included things that highlight the user in comment trees
It would be great if they implemented this feature on a per-thread basis, and still allowed you to turn it off.  It would help a lot with AMAs with multiple people answering (you don't always notice real answers when it's not OP).
Individual subreddits can apply flair.
And the disruptions that would cause, a la the Morgan Freeman AMA.
From a pure drama perspective, we should be in for a wild ride.
I WANT TO GET OFF MR OHANIAN'S WILD RIDE.
WARNING! 2SPOOKY4/u/DANK_SON
Hey man, could you please add a spook warning to your comment? It reminded me of a terrible experience. Mr skeltal was a bad man
me too thanks
dank maymay
I hope not. I like drama that doesn't involve me.
popcorn tastes good
It would be nice to have the highlight in celebrity AMAs. I hate it when the person is downvoted so far I can't see their responses.
Reddit will be destroyed the way every other good site on the Internet has been. It'll slide further and further to the lowest common denominator until it's a homepage for celebrity gossip and pointless life hacks.
I don't know if you've been browsing /r/lifehacks recently, but I think we're halfway there.
It's so lame too, because now (at least for a while) we're not going to have a "hey, look! A celebrity's redditing, cool!" moment. We're going to have a "hey look, a celebrity reddit post. Wonder if it was bought instead of actually being natural?" moment each time a post crops up.
That is an issue we felt was necessary to bring up, even though it was recent. We, for the most part, do not agree with this.
Many of us also find it distasteful.  Bringing AMAs to reddit is one thing, but comments in unrelated submissions have always been assumed to be authentic, from people who are interested in reddit for their own reasons; making them in a sense one of "us."  If it is part of a promotional campaign, that's not really "us", it's more like an "us vs them" situation.
from people who are interested in reddit for their own reasons; making them in a sense one of "us."
Like Zach Braff. He genuinely enjoys it here. If I found out he was being paid to hang out with us it'd feel dirty and inauthentic.
Arnold the-Terminator-whose-last-name-I-can't-spell-and-isn't-in-my-autocorrect-dictionary is also a legit regular redditor now as well.
Schwarzenegger.
We even tried to get him as the CEO while the shit with Ellen Pao was going down.
Comments semi regularly on the bodybuilding subreddit.
We completely agree on that. We have worked hard to make this community great for the new and seasoned users, but there is no place here for a user that brings attention to themselves with some flair we did not approve of.
Some of us have spent years making this community what it is and do not want it degenerating into Twitter, where some celeb with a flair gets automatic attention.
We don't want it degenerating at all, after all of the unpaid hours we've put into it.
Our policy on AskReddit is that each person's questions and comments should be voted on based on their own merit. That's why we don't give anyone flair and why we made several rule changes to reduce baiting/stories in posts.
Do you actually have proof that Tom Hanks' appearance on the site was pushed by the admins, or is it just a hunch?
The admins did (later) admit that they coordinated it.
But it was pretty obvious when they messaged us asking to add flair to his comments before anyone had noticed who was answering, and while he was still posting. And then they put up ads a minute later, which would have to have been prepared in advance
It was pretty obvious.  No posting for a year then a multiple posts in a various forums...likely coordinated to the release of his next big blockbuster Bridge of Spies in a couple of weeks.
Alright, thanks for the answer. Understandable that you're annoyed about it if they didn't contact you prior to this stunt though.
That's the reason we folded that complaint into this post: it's exactly the kind of behavior that started the blackout in the first place. The admins weren't communicating with us and didn't value our feedback or opinions when they did things to mess with our communities.
Fully agreed. I think their "let's push reddit's celebrity-image" -idea is quite stupid too, but they're free to run their company how they want to. But not contacting the mods of the subreddits prior to pushing said celebrity is rude at best.
Do you have any evidence of vote manipulation?  You mention it, but it seemed like there was some doubt there?
I assume this post should answer your question: https://i.imgur.com/Obafhpc.png
Also, a better post: https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/3mxawa/announcement_the_timer/cviy4q6
I'm done with the site if they keep up with this bullshit. I've already seen a decline in decent user content over the past couple of years. I give it a day before admins backpedal, apologize, and continue to do whatever they want. It's quite clear they have loftier aspirations for what they want this site to be. Which is fine. I can find somewhere else to go. It's the constant backpedaling and the "we're listening to you guys" that's getting annoying.
There are still high quality sections, but your characterization of the situation isn't that far off.
Yesterdays postings felt so artificial.  When people started losing their shit with "OMG, its Tom Hanks", I knew it had to be related to some new scheme related to the release of his new movie Bridge of Spies.  I come to reddit to evade the celebrity worship that dominates every other media outlet.
What's even funnier is that everyone who keeps talking about the new movie he has coming out is only giving more exposure to it.
If I hadn't read this comments thread I wouldn't have even known he had a movie coming out, much less what the name of it was.
I think that was the whole point of this new type of celebrity posting, but poorly executed. As stated in other posts, Reddit values sustained contribution not only when you have something to promote which is how those posts were perceived.
So what's the name of this movie? You know; for when I totally pay to watch it in a movie theater.
Could these totally real people talking about the movie have anything to do with the fact that A Hologram for the King is down 269 this week according to IMDB??
Didnt they ban Unidan for doing the same thing?  And he was providing good information, not kissing a celebrity's ass.
Unidan was banned for using multiple accounts to downvote competing comments.
and they are manipulating votes to get tom hanks to the top.  I dont see the difference.
While it's not a huge difference, there is a difference between manipulating views and manipulating votes.
Tell that to whomever at Reddit invented "np.reddit.com" links. They know damn well that increasing views to something changes the votes, or they wouldn't have bothered using their paid ad space to promote Tom Hanks' comments in order to get him enough upvotes to move him to the top of the threads. The only other reason I could come up with why they'd advertise him at all is to share his insightful comments with us out of the goodness of their hearts, which is obviously not the case.
And at the core it's the same. It's about bringing balance to the weight each unique user has here. Giving everybody the same chance to be head regardless of popularity of merit.
Links in the screenshot:
https://www.reddit.com/r/LV426/comments/3mqtun/tom_hanks_thinks_the_first_egg_scene_in_alien_is/
screnshot to ad
https://www.reddit.com/r/announcements/comments/3cbo4m/we_apologize/csu0kmv
https://www.reddit.com/r/TheoryOfReddit/comments/1x4hin/changes_to_riamas_top_500_posts_in_totals_and/
http://www.scribd.com/doc/270823733/Why-you-should-become-a-redditor-in-2-slides
Thanks for providing context edgar.
/u/-eDgAR- always delivers.
He's a pretty cool guy :)
He is.
Wait
aw fuck. I can't believe you've done this.
Okay, /u/-eDgAR-, can you do Digiorno?
[deleted]
I was very surprised to read Tom Hanks "was brought" to comment in various threads. Everyone had the impression that he was there of his own accord, and nothing indicated otherwise. I feel deceived and insulted that this was a calculated move by the admins, as well as saddened that Mr. Hanks wasn't here just for fun (as it seemed), and I think I speak for many in saying so.
He did a 20 minute run where he went down a bunch of threads and posted generally low effort comments. He made no replies to other users, or acknowledgement of anything. He only really had one comment with any substance, and that was about rwdubbing audio lines. Everything else just felt souless and shallow.
Seems like a way for celebrities to use reddit to promote their shit but not have to deal with being asked any actually interesting questions by users in organized AMA's. They just trawl through for 20 minutes and tack on to random reddit comments that they approve of. :/
Let's focus on the film, people.
Ask me anything..Only involving my promotional stuff that makes me money.
Seems more like a way for them to get paid with the money that people spend on gold to "improve" the shitty servers.
To be fair, most comments are souless and shallow. If you put your heart and soul into every single comment you made you'd be on reddit all day long-oh...
That interaction feels less genuine than the one-off AMAs coordinated through Victoria.
I recently became aware of the celebrity promotion strategy and think it's disappointing that the moderators were not informed or asked about it ahead of time. I do feel that it's a form of vote manipulation/brigading. I think that it's questionable on whether they're following Rule 5 of this subreddit. However, I am optimistic about continued progress in moderator tools and admin/mod communications.
Can someone explain the celebrity tom hanks thing like I'm 5
There's two sides.
You:
Browsing random subreddit.  Oh, look!  Tom Hanks said something!  Huh!  That's crazy!  He's a normal redditor just like me!  I sure do like this site, it's full of cool people like Tom Hanks and Snoop Dawg!  I should use it more and click on all the advertising and such!
Admins:  Hey, Tom Hanks.  We will give you x amount of money to randomly browse Reddit for 10 minutes and say stuff.
Something definitely seemed fishy with that when I saw a post pointing out that he suddenly started commenting after 1 year of inactivity (and all prior had been in his AMA).  It definitely reeks of trying hard to be like the cool kids.
"Hey, what do other social media sites that are popular have that we don't?"
"Uh.... celebrities?"
"Yeah, they tweetbook and snapface all the time!"
"That stuff is huge, gold even!"
"Great, get us some celebs and then we'll be the cool site just like those other ones!"
While I'm concerned about this Tom Hanks astroturfing, I'm really glad we seem to be working an communicating like adults about the myriad issues facing the mods.
I mean... is that it? Is that all they've done? I was expecting something bigger. Something... better. I'm not saying you guys should go private again immediately, but I wouldn't be satisfied with this. Sounds like they tossed you a few bones to keep you pacified while once again doing shady stuff (like the Tom Hanks thing) in the background.
Development takes a long time and from the sounds of it, Reddit was written with some god-awful code. /u/deimorz has been excellent at communicating about how big the scope of some of the bigger changes are and what sort of timelines we are talking about. No point expecting things that aren't reasonable.
Yes! Shout out to /u/deimorz for his continuous and tireless work.
The whole community and mod support teams have been really good and collaborative. I hope that in the future we get the same level of respect from all admin departments.
You have to be jesus first
I guess I'm coming at this from a non-mod/regular user perspective. The admins or the mods should really clue us in on what the timelines are and other useful details. It's pretty unsettling to have things clearly happening in the background, but no clue about what's going on.
I can tell you that some of us (the more technical members on the team) have been monitoring these changes as they are being pushed into their source repository. We're seeing what these changes actually entail and some of them are significant and cross multiple pieces of reddit even though the forward facing change may seem minimal.
From a development perspective, the testing for things like that are not trivial as they have to make sure they didn't break any of the parts of the site that are dependent on the libraries they modified. There is a clear indication that there is at least one or two people doing full time work on this stuff and we're not just getting scrap development.
I'm glad to hear that. Kind of makes me upset that the regular users are the last ones to find out, but progress is still good.
Anyone can track the commits here if they want to get a feel for whats coming down. You don't have to understand code to see what's happening because things are labeled. You can also click into the commit to see what was changed but don't make the assumption that all they had to do was type that out and have it work. Trial and error and testing are all part of the process you don't see. But, as a general rule, the more places changes are made, the more difficult the change was.
but don't make the assumption that all they had to do was type that out and have it work.
You should see what some clients think, heheh.
It's pretty unsettling to have things clearly happening in the background, but no clue about what's going on.
Check out /r/modsupport. That's where we get most of our info and it's open to everyone.
The Tom Hanks thing was very recent.
VERY RECENT.
Before that we were happy, but this upset a lot of us, because it goes back to the same issues we were arguing about before.
We would love to hear from admins about this now, since they have been silent so far.
Damn admins made even Tom Hanks a bad thing.
RIOT!!!
Sounds like they tossed you a few bones
To be fair, they told us from the outset in /r/modsupport that they'd be focusing on small changes first. I think by doing so, they've been able to show completed projects and data for determining progress. If they tackled the biggest issues first, all we'd be hearing from them right now is "we're working on it, we promise".
I just want to comment on the post that was screenshot-ted (???).
We find it very difficult to get popular submissions from 'Regular Joes' now that we have a constant stream of celebrity AMAs.
Right. Aren't these the same people who close down threads because they aren't famous enough and suggest posting to /r/casualiama instead?
I know I'm a week late here but this is exactly what I was thinking. The mods have deleted plenty of "regular joe" ama's because they personally didnt find them interesting. Karmanaut even deleted the bad luck brian ama that, judging by the upvotes it got, people obviously were interested in. To be fair to the mods, when you deal with a large amount of reports a day, you are bound to make some mistakes, but I think the upvote / downvote system should be the determining factor on what content people want to see (with a few exceptions).
You guys aren't a source of revenue. Reddit will make just as much money being more shitty thanks to the sheer volume of casual traffic and continued traffic from users like me who really don't give a shit about all this. Until there's a place like voat.co that doesn't suck, this is the place to go for wasting time.
As a long time (7 year) and faithful member I'm starting to question my faith in this site. I can see a mass exodus looming if the admins don't get their act together.
just some observations:
This looks like the work of 1-2 devs over the past two months, not a cooperative effort to get mod tools fixed
honest question: do you guys actually have the power to blackout again? I mean seriously, I feel like if you did that again, they would just ban you guys or something... not being a troll, i just don't think anyone reading this takes this whole "timer" thing seriously. I mean do you really think reddit is going to sit around and let you guys shut down one of their default subreddits again? I genuinely think they'd conveniently have scheduled maintenance right before/after the 'blackout' went into effect, bring askreddit back online, fire all you guys as mods, and enter damage control mode until the rest of the user base for gets about it like they did with chooter.
We absolutely have the power to black out again, it's as simple as clicking a button. It actually is just clicking a button to set the subreddit private.
I personally don't think there's a point in blacking out right now. We know they're working on things, they can't just roll out big changes in a few weeks time. It can take up to several months, which is what's happening now.
While the admins do have the power to remove all the mods and appoint new mods, I don't think they would do that. They've always said "the subreddit is owned by their moderators" and doing such a thing would be in conflict with one of the core principles of the site. Besides, how shitty would it look? "Yeah we didn't want to keep that subreddit shut down, so we just fired all of the mods who have put in years of effort building and maintaining the subreddit"
While the admins do have the power to remove all the mods and appoint new mods, I don't think they would do that.
They removed the head mod of /r/wow last November/October because he set the subreddit to private.
It can take up to several months, which is what's happening now.
it's been a few months, mark my words - no significant changes will happen over the next 2-3 months and it'll will be perpetually forgotten about. Come december, they'll have 2-3 new features (maybe even one kinda big feature). But I guarantee brigading features, and the more critical features won't be anywhere near ready.
It's not that I think they're lying about the situation. I just think they're severely under-delegating resources to the one issue that could cause a shit-storm on reddit again. If you guys want new mod tools, set a deadline, outline specifically what features you expect, and do not bluff. Otherwise you'll end up with "hey we just released a new button to mute users for 128 hours instead of 72 hours, and it took 2 weeks... ~~progress ~~".
I mean even in the CTO's AMA, he was saying all of this shit about "building a better data science pipeline, improving keyword targeting for advertisers". I just shook my head. Rather than saying "hey we our mod tools are ad-hoc and cause issues that undermine the foundation of reddit", they delegate 2-3 guys to work on a pretty much insurmountable problem (refactoring / patching mod tools into some frankenstein feature set) rather than just making a team wide effort to rewrite / fix the problem once and for all.
fwiw, as a company, you can't simply just reallocate all your engineering resources over to a single project.  From a practical standpoint, people hired as mobile developers, for instance, can't just be told one day "ok, stop doing what you're doing and work on mod tools".  a) they may not know the technologies or the stack, and b) they were hired for a particular job for a reason, and to bait-and-switch them into a new is a really good way to lose employees.  Data, mobile, ads, these are all prime examples of roles where specialized employees are generally hired because of what skills they bring to the table.  If a bus crash happens, hospitals don't hand oncologists a scalpel and send them into surgery.  The same applies to engineers; we're not all interchangeable cogs.
Furthermore, a lot of work goes into building any new feature.  There are a number of steps involved beyond what is actually seen.
Each of those steps takes time, and in some cases, takes time from multiple people.  Tiny changes?  Sure, straightforward enough.  But if you've looked at the Reddit codebase, you'd see that there are no straightforward changes (hence, the CTO's priority for "Performing a major overhaul of our age old code base and architecture").
Finally, and I should have put this up further, but things like brigading (since you specifically called that one out) features don't happen without data systems in place.  You first have to be able to identify brigading, which means you need to be able to analyze data.
But that's just, like, my opinion, man.
[deleted]
But are you telling me that they only have 2-3 engineers that work on the web platform?
It's actually not far from the truth. For the past few months, the engineers on the web team have been:
We don't have hundreds of engineers or anything, reddit's a pretty small team overall.
I don't know if you're saying Reddit is one of those "bigger companies", or whether you're comparing working at a bigger company to working at a smaller one, but I think you overestimate how many engineers work at Reddit.  Unless I'm miscounting (which is possible), there are only 24 full-time engineers.  And that includes IT, infrastructure, operations, security, data, mobile (web, iOS, android), ads, and web platform.  So no, there are not only 2-3 people working on the web platform, but it isn't much higher than that.
All I'm saying is that there are people working on it, full time, and you're making a lot of broad statements about things without knowing what's going on within the company, what the resourcing looks like, and what the tech stack looks like.
ELI5?
Mods wanted the admins to give a shit about the tools we have, they seem to be giving a shit.
Just wanted to post a note to the mods, thanks for all the work you do!
I think it's fair to say I post a lot in this subreddit. That's because, all joking aside, I am always amazed at what a high level of discussion is possible here on even more obscure topics with such a broad cross section of society. And I've been around the Internet long enough to know that's not a normal thing, so thanks!
Your welcome! You're right though, this place is pretty dam rad most of the time. I can get lost in a single thread for hours sometimes and be like "what year is it?!" when re-emerging.
All this supposed drama and blackout is to get tools for moderators (mostly led by the power mods) but how about getting tools for users to hold moderators accountable? /r/anarchism is by no means a perfectly run subreddit, but back in the days when the subreddit mods were more committed to anarchism, they voluntarily instituted a transparency page which shows all deleted posts and a modlog too. How about tools like that for users?
A lot of these demands are purely for moderators to exert more control, how about some demands from the userbase?
///
Also, does anyone else find it hilarious that the AMA mods are saying:
"we find it very difficult to get submissions from regular joes now"
That's because they started deleting submissions from "regular joes" and coveting celebrities instead! I used to love /r/AMA because it gave insight into areas of society, now you can't post "duplicates" i.e. they won't accept "I am a plumber" for example, because "we've already had a plumber". However it doesn't matter how many actors they've had, because celebrities are always welcome!
A lot of these demands are purely for moderators to exert more control, how about some demands from the userbase
No one is stopping the userbase from demanding anything?
they won't accept "I am a plumber" for example, because "we've already had a plumber".
Not true at all. See our wiki here
The prime example of this is a person's job; posts about someone's occupation are almost always allowed. This rule exists because we want a person's topic to be something that they know thoroughly and is important to them; this gives them more to discuss and a more thorough background in the field.
Being an actor is someone's job, just like being a plumber is someone's job. Both are allowed at any time. Our rules are just set up to make sure that the topic is something important to that user and that they'll have sufficient knowledge and personal experience to talk about.
I feel like a dumbass because I said "I love seeing Tom Hanks around as a normal redditor" in one of his comment threads, as now that pretty clearly isn't true.
the sad thing is, there are tons of people who said the same thing, but wont see this thread.
The entitlement here is amazing. You're demanding that the admins tell you about changes to their policy, but you regularly don't tell users about changes to your own policies.
Did /u/karmanaut check in with the users before enacting a bunch of rules in /iama? Nope.
So why should the admins talk to the mods before they get celebrities to comment on THEIR website?
Stop being hypocrites
Reddit has been feeling distinctly less and less reddit lately for a variety of reasons.
First off is the blacking out of the subreddits. While I get it, I don't necessarily agree with it. If I'm honest (and I'm trying to be respectful here because you [mods] haven't done anything disrespectful) I found it fairly childish. Shutting down an entire subreddit, one of the most popular on reddit, just for moderation tools felt like going overboard. Especially when the reasoning for everyone elses blackout was because of Victoria, if I remember correctly. Even that I found childish. The admins have shown multiple times in the past that they don't really care and blacking out a subreddit because someone (who few knew existed) got fired. The whole thing was a mindfuck and just felt... cheesy.
Then there's the Ellen Pao/Spez thing. She wasn't the greatest CEO but Spez certainly isn't either. Ellen took the site one way and Spez is now just running with that ball. With this Celebrity Endorsement/Promotional nonsense it's not feeling like reddit anymore. It's like they're trying to just circlejerk how celebrities use it too. As others have said, it was also blatant vote manipulation. They literally bought ads to have someone upvote him. Now I get that the karma couldn't mean less considering the AMA and how inactive Tom Hanks was to begin with, it still goes directly against their rules and I'm having a hard time seeing how they're going to reconcile that. Then again they probably won't and will just ignore all commentary to that extent.
This really doesn't feel like the same site I started using 5 years ago. I've hopped around multiple accounts (only sticking with this one because fuck yeah Breaking Bad) for a while and I've seen a lot of what reddit has to offer. But banning subreddits? Quarantining them? They're really bowing down to pressure from outside influences and trying their best to make reddit as mainstream as possible. I don't say that in a bad way, it's just too much trying to bow to the whims of everyone. I'm left with a really sour taste in my mouth from all of this. The fact that moderators (myself included, albeit not on this scale) are left with a few extra tools does not seem worth the nonsense that's been going on.
My activity on this website has been dipping as of late because of it. I doubt /u/Spez could give a shit about me disappearing but I know of a few others who feel the same way. This celebrity thing is just another rung on the ladder to climbing out of this place.
Quite hard to see a light when they're blocking it with welcome signs. It reminds me of how in London they went around telling people to clean up their houses and shit for the Olympics. They would shame people and basically hide them to make London look as beautiful as possible. Some people don't give a fuck and want to just exist on their own but they're actively forcing people to fork over Email Addresses to access quarantined subreddits. They're banning others and saying "You're not welcome here" when reddit used to be incredibly welcoming to everyone.
Actually another good example is what's happened to me. I used to live in a part of Canada that had cigarillos. Flavored tobacco cigars that were a little longer than normal cigarettes. I used to enjoy them but then I moved to an area where they're all banned. Reasoning is because kids might want to smoke them. They already ID people for cigarettes, what the hell does it matter? Just ID them. Same with reddit. What the hell does it matter what some assholes want to get up to on /r/Fatpeoplehate or whatever. Just let them do their own thing and punish the people who interfere. They didn't punish those who fucked up, they completely nuked everything. Completely overboard.
It's... I don't know. I'm not saying it's going the way of Digg. Digg lost everyone. Reddit is just pushing too hard to include everyone, by excluding a lot. Doesn't feel the same anymore.
Not a big fan of touting it, but /r/RedditAlternatives exists for those who might want to find a new place. I'm still in the 'pool' of reddit, but my feet are definitely on the ladder and ready to climb out.
Edit: I love how I'm getting downvoted but only one person actually wants to have a discussion about this instead of just downvoting. Good on you Reddit. This is the problem. No one cares anymore.
I agree with you for the most part, though not on the "selling out" part. It's natural for websites to seize the opportunity to make more money when their popularity rises. Reddit is nowhere near "niche" status, and it hasn't been for years. IMO whoever is at the top of the food chain within the company decided to implement some controversial measures, and threw Pao under the bus to do so. Then Reddit went all gung-ho about their favorite website disappearing and losing its "soul" or some shit, which ultimately resulted in...nothing, because things are still progressing the way the powers that be intended.
A lot of people seem to believe that Reddit is some sort of "more civilized 4chan", where they can say and do anything they want without fear of repercussions. Well, it's not. It's now an advertising platform like any other, with certain ads being more obvious than others. I'd wager 90% of the celebrities who comment on Reddit don't care about the site, maybe their PR teams told them "hey, this looks like a good opportunity to promote yourself" - if it's even the celebrity themselves answering the questions.
Highlighting celebrity-related participation (whether genuine or artificial) is not surprising. Call me overly cynical, but I doubt the management of Reddit does things out of the goodness of their heart; if it doesn't end in good results (i.e. money), it'll most likely take a looong time to implement or won't get implemented at all (see: what the mods requested). Reddit is a private company, not a forum operating out of someone's basement; they're always going to prioritize what brings in money over the "spirit of the community".
The subs that got banned/closed...to be honest, I never cared about or visited them more than once, so their closing down doesn't affect me directly in any way. I do admit I had to do a double take when coming across CoonTown for the first time, though.
A whole bunch of celebrities made big investments in reddit.  People had been speculating that we would probably see a lot more celebrity interaction inserted into the site. The writings been on the wall for a while. Now it's happening. We know who some of the investors are and that's who the management answer to. None of this a much of a surprise in hindsight.
I do admit I had to do a double take when coming across CoonTown for the first time, though.
I miss CoonTown because it was a nice little quarantine zone. Now the same people from there are all over the default subs dog whistling so loud they're even making other racists uncomfortable.
Who cares? Like, really? I understand why this is important to mods and stuff but why make this post?
So /r/askreddit will not be getting shut down then?
correct
Can you answer whether or not a shutdown would be considered again if astroturfing becomes a major problem? (E.g. Verified celebrities being given site wide flair)
If things go way too south, yes.
After reading the Tom Hanks post in that screenshot, I find myself wanting celebrities banned from Reddit. Kind of fucked up that the actions of the admins make me want celebrities to not be around.
The only celebrities you see will be the ones the Admin want you to (= the ones who have paid, or who are connected to companies that will pay)
Everyone else will be banned for "self promotion" or some such bullshit.
Not sure what to make of this.
Yeah they completely failed to do anything of substance. I mean really, think about it.
The ability to double sticky? Only double? I guess triple would have been beyond the capabilities of reddit. And locking posts? Isnt' that something every forum on the internet has been able to do for the last two decades? And yet it still has to be a beta?
Actually letting you talk to the admins. Color coding. Mod mail.
All of those things they could've implemented at any time. And you guys act like its in some way a sign that they're going to do better. But what would've really been a sign they were going to do better would be if they actually did what they said they would.
You got fleeced.
Me, I don't really care that much. But it seems like the sorta thing you really do care about. So I had to make sure your rose tinted glasses were off.
What threaded modmail?
Is there an ELI5 for this? I don't understand what's going on :/
All right
Sincerely,
John Doe
MODS! MODDSSSS!
intervention! intervention!
Where is a box of whistles when you need it??
🎺🎺🎺🎺
FIND OUT THIS SUNDAY ON WWE SOOOOOOOOOOOPER SLAMMMMM
http://instantcena.com/
Someone needs to make this a ringtone.
AND HIS NAME IS JOHN CENA
Oh, sorry. His name is Bon Cinna.
Cinnabon?
BAN HIM!
Holy shit, he's alive.
It's a miracle!!!!
John Does are strong as hail!
UNBREAKABLE
They alive, dammit!
I was always a fan of his brother, Cookie.
[removed]
Whoah me too, I'm Tom Cruise
I too, am Tom Cruise'sballsack
... and I'm straight Tom Cruise, and I have cable.
AMA?
He's Tom Cruise, he's Tom Cruise, I'm Tom Cruise! WE'RE ALL TOM CRUISE!
Reachable at 555-555-5555
123 Fake Street,
Springfield, USA
I was thinking, Hi I am XXXX XXXXX, AMA!  BANNED!
[removed]
What about people like you or I that have our names integrated into our username? Should we just be careful to not use our last names in our comments?
I am so set.
On the internet, no one knows you're a doug.
You wouldn't download a doug.
Yes I would u don't know me
I wouldn't, no good reason to really. Allows weirdos to find you either irl or to harrass you and connections in your life via the internet.
Tom Hanks ban incoming.
Absolutely. I would also considering changing your username if you're not particularly attached to it. My last username referenced my real name.
So your last username was /u/ImJesus?
Obviously not because then my username would be /u/NotImJesus
We got you, /u/Jesus.
Last comment 9 years ago, so much missed potential
Yeah he should just show up every three days to post
He is waiting to return as our savior.
Where will YOU be when /u/Jesus returns?
This is going to be a new /r/thebutton thing isn't it?
I was sat at /r/all
shitting posts
when Julio say 'jesus is return'
yes
He said he'd be right back...
/u/tubajesusmkII
I was so confused as to why I was called. Had to actually look around to finally understand.
Well I am the TubaJesus and in the name of our lord and savior Billy and the church of /r/Tubatholicism I am the only Jesus.
That makes more sense than I expected.
Am I not allowed to post at all then?
You're fine because the mods don't know which part of your name is first and which is last.
I'm thinking his name is Benma Rvin.
If you don't let on that your username is your actual name, they have no reason to suspect. But now the cats outta the bag for you.
What about people who are already pretty public? I'm not going to use his real name, but /u/wil has a commonly known real identity.
I hope incorporating job titles is OK because I like this username.
And this one doesn't.  I guess it's true then.
But narrows it down to who he isn't!
And let's be honest, I automatically assume anyone on reddit is Jesus, so it is really helpful.
Everyone on reddit is Jesus, except for you.
How does one change a username? new account?
I did not know changing your username was possible. Can someone explain how it is done?
I'm going to assume that you are Cesar Millan. I don't care who you really are, to me you are the salad whisperer.
ok
thank
mr
JOHN CENA!
That's a name! Consider yourself banned.
Yeah, how are the mods supposed to know if this guy is John Cena or not?
We'll have to hold some kind of competition to see who's the real John Cena. A super event full of slams.
Let's call it...
kereoke
🎤🎤🎤🎤
Krrrruncheoke
Will the real John Cena please stand up?
I don't know if he's standing up or not, I can't see him
I think it may be time to retire the John Cena meme, everyone.
That time was 3 months ago.
THE TIME IS NOW
THIS SUNDAY NIGHT SU SU SU SU SUUUUUPER SLAAAM
🎺🎺🎺🎺
skeltal?
Doot doot
We r onomonus. We r leejin.
-/r/askreddit 2015
we wll no forget
we no are forgives
xpected us
When did anon become dolan.
THAT QUESTION WILL BE ANSWERED THIS SUNDAY NIGHT!
🎺🎺🎺🎺
We no heer yet!
Quick question - am I going to get banned from /r/AskReddit? I ask because my username is my real name, and you're telling me I'm not allowed to post any identifying information.
So - do I need to create a pseudonym account just to post in /r/AskReddit?
Strangely, the mod answering most of the questions here has the same format of username.
Best ban the fucker, then.
Posting, or seeking, any identifying personal information, real or fake
whoops
Hey dude, can you make up a fake name for me?
BANNED!
That's literally how my last account got permabanned, and then egg-gar was all like, "Oh if you're gonna be a little bitch about it (I just provided proof that the name was fake) then fuck you you can apply to be unbanned in a month in our unban askreddit concentration camps."
I'm paraphrasing here, and like no hard feelings, but I thought it was funny
What about users whose usernames could be personal information? I got banned a while back because of a comment I made about someone else's username that a mod took as a Rule 4 violation. It was a sad day for me :(
Yeah what about those idiots using their first and last name as a username.
Came for the rules, stayed for the comments
Title should be in the form of a question
Breaking News, Megathreads, and Mod Posts are exempt from rule 1 and 2 as they serve a separate purpose to the sub compared to regular posts.
From our rules.
All mods are hypocrites, riot ヽ༼ຈل͜ຈ༽ﾉ
"Lisa S...no that's too obvious...L Simpson..."
My favorite song from the 80s:
[deleted],[deleted], who can I turn to?
You give me somethin' I can hold on to
I know you think I'm like the others before
Who saw your name and number on the wall
[deleted], I got your number
I need to make you mine
[deleted], don't change your number
[deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleeeeee-ted]
[deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleeeeee-ted]
[deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleeeeee-ted]
[deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleted][deleeeeee-ted]
Oh yeah! By [deleted][deleted]
Can't reddit just have a fake name and address, email that can be universal and is not bannable?
Well, anything @example.com is reserved for examples, so it seems that should be legal, since it is impossible for that to ever resolve. In the US, the surname Doe indicates an unknown person, but much less definitively.
What if someone's username is their real first and last name? I'm asking for a friend.
Don't be an idiot, don't post PI.
3.14159265...
GREAT. NOW YOU'VE DONE IT.
Oops
🍕
Your dominos order is on the way!
How the hell does that even work?
You assign an emoji to your favorite order. Since most people don't change their pizza too often, the emoji saves the time it would take to order regularly.
🍕+🍻?
🎺🎺🎺🎺
What about Tau? I'm gonna say it! 6.283...
FOR THE GREATER GOOD!
How about e? 2.71828.
Noone likes e
Except for ravers
Neither would i
the greater good
The greater good!
THE GREATER GOOD?! I'M THE GREATEST GOOD YOU ARE EVER GONNA GET!
WOMAN, LIVES ARE AT STAKE!
Hi there!
If you read this rule literally it means that you can never post a name, even if it is a fake name. Because the name belongs to somone. How are you supposed to post a story if you can't use a name?
"Even if they are fake and you are making them up for a story, DO NOT post them."
John Smith
I am Screamo, thanks for the doxxing, shitlord.
If you post someone's first name, that's fine, because it is not enough information to identify someone.
Lets check it out then.
JOHN
JOHN CENA!!!!
🎺🎺🎺🎺
Be careful. You're breaking rule #4
Permaban inc
BRUCE WAYNE.
2 first names, that's fine.
And 2 last names... BANNED!
It literally says so when you go to write a comment. How is this still an issue...
Since that bit is integrated in the stylesheet, people on mobile apps or people without eyes cannot see that message.
Yeah, I don't have eyes andie  ccueiaepemci fences.
'andie ccueiaepemci fences'
Quick, someone, help! This blind man is saying Andie fell into some fences!
No I think this is called a stroke
Attention blindness is a real phenomenon. It's entirely possible for a person with good vision to not specifically notice something, especially when you've seen it thousands of times.
People often don't read more than they need to in order to accomplish their tasks. In fact actually reading and reminding yourself of the rules with every post would take a fairly large amount of time.
I don't have a mobile app, nor do I use the mobile version of the site, but I do tag a "/.compact" to the end of the URL. It makes mobile site browsing so much nicer. But, I also don't get the sidebar info.
That sort of thing doesn't show up on my mobile app (Alien Blue). but still, you'd think this would be common sense.
but why male models?
You serious?
Test Post, please ignore.
Going to ask again because what you're saying now is in conflict with the answer you gave last time:
Will you delete posts along the lines of "Let's call her Julie because that's her name. (Super specific story about Julie here.)"
Or celebs. No one will post Tom Hanks again.
Or Tom Hanks will never post again, who knows.
What if we're referencing a company or a public figure? What kind of gray area are we talking about here?
[removed]
(I'm guessing here)
Sure.... BANNED
3.14
Rule #4 man cmon
Can we use 555 phone numbers?
Hmm... Post possibly could have used a [serious] tag.
u molest cowz?
b careful about cowz dat is real names
I just wanted to get a comment in before there's 5k comments, hey everyone!
Did somebody say KARMA TRAIN!!!???
Not in sticky threads
CHOO CHO... oh
The karma train is out of fuel :(
It never had any to being with
RIP in karma
CHOO CHOO!
no wait that was something else
I'm planning on naming my kid Karma Train. You're violating Rule 4.
So what if my username references my name?  Like it is just my name.
Seem like a silly rule. Any information you post could be used to identify you.
How does the comment you just made identify you?
From that comment alone, I already have a possibility for his full name.
It's obviously Billy Stevenson from Tucson, Arizona.
Hey, Billy!  How's the anal herpes that you got from Coach Elliot "The Pedo" Ralston from Freemont High?  Is he still not allowed within 500 feet of your home on Cedar Avenue?
BANNED
Quick! Every one look from someone who looks like he is about to cause some trouble and is wearing a suit!
He found this to be mildly humoristic, meaning he has a sense of humor. So he's not German nor working for the CIA. See? Thats like millions of people less we need to check in order to identify him
Actually I am German AND working for the CIA
Username checks out.
All due respect, but aren't the ask reddit mods notorious for having a stick up thier asses about this? like posting "sincerely John Doe from 123 Fake Street, Nowheresville" while obviously a joke would still get your shit removed? Or posting shit "insert something here" about celebrities, regardless of it fairly well known stuff?
Oh, you're a mod of this sub. No wonder I see your name so often in this sub.
Isn't this the reason behind the blatantly unworkable IP addresses used in TV shows like CSI?  If they used a valid address they just made up, they could be liable if a good chunk of their fan base decided to visit that address or do some hacking of it.
What happens if I talk about someone famous?
Can we use a 555 number, since those are all fictional?
Has this been an issue lately? I haven't noticed it but I'm not on Reddit as often as I usually am.
You don't notice here because those comments get removed by us.
So let me get this straight, if we tell a story, we can say "This guy, I'll call him joe..." But no last names or anything right?
While we're at it, can we amend rule #9 to include memes...?
John Cena?
[deleted]
Chief Wiggum: 911, this better be good!
Marge: I cut off my husbands thumb!
Chief Wiggum: Attempted murder!? You'll burn for this! Burn in jail!
Marge: It was an accident!
Chief Wiggum: Yeah, yeah. Save it for Dateline, Tuesday. What's
your address, so I can come and arrest you.
Marge: Arrest me? My address! It's uum.... 1..2...3.... Fake Street!
Chief Wiggum: 123 Fake Street. Got it.
Banned
A link to the rules would be cool in this overly cool post.
The Red Cross has a pretty extensive first aid app that covers quite a bit.
Just looked it up and there are multiple red Cross apps that claim to be from different red crosses and are all from different developers... which one are you referring to?
https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.cube.arc.fa
Kudos for a good utilitarian post
Thank you.
This needs to get rated higher, it is small, could actually save lives, and nobody wants to get stuck in situation like this without having a clue what to do.
Any Gameboy Advance emulator. So many great games on that console. Way higher quality than basically anything you'll find in the appstore
try MyBoy and Drastic, perfect for any gameboy advanced and ds games
Edit: Because a couple ppl asked - to play games on an emulator google GBA Roms/ DS Roms; choose one of the results (my favorite is Emuparadise.me) save it on your phone and choose the path in your emulator. From there you are ready to go.
Edit: i previously said Emuparadise.com - do NOT go there.
Emuparadise.com
Do you mean emuparadise.me? the .com is obviously malicious.
People always look really weird at me when i pull out a Gamboy color or Advance in public transport.
Im sorry but the games are just more awesome on the consoles
Ya having it on your phone is just a lot more convenient since you always have it on you anyways.
I love playing turn style games on my phone like pokemon or advance wars, but I find it too annoying to play anything else with touchscreen buttons.
Edit: I get it guys. Get a Bluetooth controller. But I'm not going to bring a controller into my work bathroom.
I beat Metroid fusion on my iPhone and I only died like a million times
This does not bode well because that and Zero Mission were the first ones i was going to try
Yeah, basically any Metroid game won't fair well on touchscreen.
ya i tried playing megaman x. It didn't go well
I beat DKC on my iPhone. That minecart level was brutal.
Right? I really don't enjoy the touchscreen buttons.
They work fine for turn based games, but no good for Mario, etc.
Yeah, I'll second that. Out of all the games I tried, Mario was worst. There was too much of a delay between pressing the "button" and jumping.
What games do you like to play? Only games I really remember are Pokemon sapphire/firered and Mario games
The Legend of Zelda: the Minish Cap is one of my favorites.
I beat Emerald after many many hours of commute. Best feeling.
Now I'm sad because I can't trade those mons to my ORAS :(
Can you get that on an iPhone without jail breaking?
Yes. See http://iemulators.com/gba4ios
You need to trust a cert and add a profile depending on ios version, but there are some good guides for that. Google "gba ios no jailbreak".
You can even get ds games with nds4ios.
Plague Inc.
It's like Pandemic, but way better.
What's the difference?
There are a lot more options, at least versus Pandemic 2 (though I haven't played the latest Pandemic)
Visuals are better, and game play is more realistic. You can see charts of the disease progression if you choose, and they also have good tutorials that explain how to play.
Plague Inc. has that news story about a respectful funeral goer pressing F so that pips it for me
The news reports make that game for me.
"Gamers around the world praise the Helix fossil"
it also has a bunch of new options, in addition to the traditional virus, bacteria and parasites, you got more options like prions, spores, and bioweapons.
also some fictional ones, like ZOMBIES (of course), neurax Worm, or the simian flu from planet of the Apes (PC verson)
Because of these, and many more, changes it has a lot more replayability than the old classic.
App version has those too, it's just not as pretty.
How is the PC version prettier? I've only ever played the app.
PC version has lots more data and science stuff, scenario creation, hotkeys and steam achievements. I think the scoreboard is still broken with blatant cheaters on the front page at all times, but what are you going to do?
In addition to other posted changes, it's a lot easier.
For one, Madagascar doesn't immediately fuck your game up by shutting down
Greenland is the hardest part now.
Closely followed by New Zealand
I've also played Bio Inc - where you try to kill one person, sometimes based on pre-existing conditions, by getting them really super sick. You might like it if you liked Plague.
Bro, what if it was an actual person in a lab somewhere, and you are killing them from your phone for science...
/s
We'll call it Ender's Disease.
Does that mean there's a companion app called Bean's Gambit, where you watch someone else play the game and almost play it yourself?
This is called "asking your boyfriend to show you how to play" you think your going to play but your doing it wrong so he takes the controller away from you and eventually you just go on the other room and watch Gilmore girls.
Game of the year
You sick fuck
Adding to this, you can affect what their lifestyles as well to unlock new diseases to give them, like age to give them arthritis, obesity to cause heart problems and smoking to cause lung cancer
Pandemic, I got dat Pandemic
You should get the WMD I hear it's the bomb
Oh, indeed.
You trifflin with Avon's reputation.
Omar comin'
Except for the part where it eats your battery
It's a game. Do you not expect it to be eating up the battery?
No, it physically eats your battery, that's why it's called Plague.
Shouldn't it be called Batteryophage or something then?
The Batteryonic Plague.
For me, it eats up my battery faster than my charger can charge it.  That's excessive, especially for a casual game.
Basically. I joke that it turns my phone into a space heater. Or that it's the battery incinerator. Granted, I have a Droid 4 right now, so the battery life wasn't great to begin with (even worse now that the phone's aged significantly), but I can play two to five games, and then I get 10% battery warnings.
There's a reason I jumped on the PC version. Game's good, and it's fun, but it murders phone battery.
Yeah I mean it's running a pretty crazy real-time disease transmission simulator for a few billion people. The CDC would have killed for that capability not 20 years ago, pretty crazy stuff.
I've spend too much time on this game. My favorite starting point: India. Don't forget the diarrhea and transmission by rodents and you're golden.
India is where its at
omg Kingdom rush was so good and I loved the style of it too
Best tower defense game ever imo.
Bloons TD 5 and the newest PC Kungdom Rush are closely tied for 1st in terms of tower defense games imo
If you like tower defense, I can list of SO MANY that probably dont need connection to play them.  (btw I am on iOS)
Some of the lesser known ones are
era TD
Staunch Defense
4towers there are multiple sequals 4towers Onslaught
Carrot Fantasy
Beast Towers
Fantasy Defense
I don't recommend toy defense.. and there are so many more that I could dig up if people want more recommendations!
I don't know how popular the Sentinel series are, but the 3rd and 4th Sentinel games were pretty enjoyable!
gem keeper was another good one i played a little
Keep in mind I am only talking mobile TD here, there is a whole nother WORLD of TD for flash and PC gaming
In mentioning tower defense games how did you forget Bloons Tower Defense! Great series, BTD5 is a cracking game.
I was trying to list ones that people don't know about... everyone knows about bloons and kingdom rush!
Robot Unicorn Attack.
Open your Eyes.
Fuck you for getting that song stuck in my head again.
Bloons Tower Defense 5, very famous tower defense game, nice time waster, but can be challenging too.
Battleheart and Battleheart: Legacy, two fantastic RPGs. In the first you control a party of four heroes you can customize, swap out, and level up as you travel through the world. The artstyle is charming as all hell, and it's a lot of fun, gets pretty hard as you go along. Legacy is the sequel, more of a typical RPG. You're a player character in the same universe, with a world to travel around and fight stuff, you level up, allocate skill points, and buy skills and gear depending on your stats. You can be a straight Archer, or a mixed Archer-Rogue, or a Rogue with a mix of Barbarian, or a Ninja with a mix of Paladin, or a Battlemage with a mix of Warlock, or my personal favorite, "straight Archer" with a mix of literally everything else in the game because hey, it's only a few skill points and I have the gold, seems like a cool skill to have... Again, less of a time waster, but lots of fun. Legacy uses a similar artstyle as the first game, adapted to a larger and more explorable world, with lots of self-aware and fourth-wall-breaking humor.
A Dark Room, again pretty famous. It's a minimalistic sort of mystery-adventure game, everything is done in ASCII. You build up your village, constantly struggling between doing what's right for your people and what you feel is necessary. There's a lot of charm to it and it gets pretty awesome once you start discovering the larger map.
Ahh, bloons tower defense games...I remember playing them like a madman in computer class during school. It's funny though because our class will play it till the game lags out really hard.
My goal in that game was never to win but to make my browser shut down in one class period.
Yeah, nothing made me rage more than those bloon games
A dark room is so underrated. Good call.
Super Hexagon. Worth it...
Am I the only one who feels stupid for not being able to beat it?
Haha no. Ive finished all other levels but i have only 15 seconds on the last level
I somehow have 44 seconds. I don't even know how, like anytime I try I die like 10 seconds in
59.16, I exploded when that happens. It doesn't matter, I still enjoy the game, I have 50 hours logged on it.
I've only gotten anywhere in that game while either extremely high or drunk
I also recommend it on PC.  Runs like butter, cheap as hell, and using the keyboard is a little bit more responsive than touch screen.
Pixel Dungeon or Shattered Pixel Dungeon
And if you decide those are too frustrating for you, Easy Pixel Dungeon!
Great game with constant updates. It took me awhile, butbinwas able to get the Amulet for all four heros. Then the dev just had to go and add durability to armor/weapons, and the game got so much harder.
This is the best phone game I have ever played. I love this game. I have spent so many hours on it!
Monument valley.
Ok Francis
Sadly too short of a game for the money you have to pay
Edit: have* not habe
It's free on the Amazon App Store with their "Underground" program right now!
And it's not even remotely difficult until the last level. I absolutely LOVE the concept, the graphics, and the feel of the game, but there is so much more they could have done with it.
indeed. i hope they will implement more levels
They're not adding any more now. They did add a level pack but you have to pay again, for fewer levels IIRC. Then they did a third addition for charity, which they state is the "final chapter".
After I bought it, I wondered, since it was so short, if it had been created specifically for House of Cards, to give Francis something unique to play. I was pretty disappointed when I finished the game.
Im sure I'll get downvoted but I'm saying this anyway. I dont agree with everyone measuring games worth by length. It's stupid. Games are an experience and should be measured by how fun they were and if the experience they were trying to give was given. For example, if a game wasn't pushing replay value or length but an engaging story then it's worth the price unless you just dont plain enjoy it but then that would be a personal preference and not the developer's fault. The more we continue to measure a game's value by length the less time devs will spend on quality of content (in some cases) and the more devs will try to pad the game with content (in some cases). Note: i know games can be made with length AND quality. I'm just saying it isn't fair to hold devs to a game length standard. I don't walk out of a 2 hour movie and complain that the movie ticket costs the same as when I saw Return of the King and in fact that brings up another quick point. Be happy not EVERY game costs 60 dollars. Movie tickets and (some) books are closer to each other in price than games.
Well, if I can get a fun game for $2, and an equally as fun game for $5, you don't need to be a scientist to figure out what one people are going to buy.
Things can be over-priced, video games included.
i liked the game and i want more thats all i said
You made a claim about the value received for value put in.
Monumentally fun.
Duet. Can't link cause I'm on my phone but I've been playing it a bit. Doesn't require internet, is free but you can pay for more levels, music is amazing and is just a generally good game.
Really annoying ad system tho. I can't really pay for the ad-less version so I just play til I get the ad and quit out...
I don't know what you're working with, but the settings on my phone allow me to pick and chose which apps have internet access. I just toggled Duet's internet off, and now there are no ads ever.
Here's a link
You Must Build a Boat-Best matching game on the appstore. Tons of upgrades, charm, collectibles, etc. Almost impossible to not marathon through.
Horizon Chase-Fun retro racing game with amazing graphics. Premium, no iap bullshit.
Monument Valley- Artistic MC escher-esque experience.
Spider, Secret of Bryce Manor-intuitive puzzler with a deep backstory. The sequel is phenomenal as well.
Game Dev Story-Unbelievably addictive simgame where you build a gaming company from the ground up.
King Cashing 2-Slot machine rpg with an awesome comic book art style, tons of content, and funny writing.
NBA Jam-Great arcade sports action.
Ridiculous Fishing-You shoot fish with shotgun. Awesome arcade game with tons of content.
Super Hexagon-Insanely challenging arcade game with awesome music.
Space Miner: Space Ore Bust-Awesome space shooter with fantastic story and great upgrade progression.
Boson X-360 degree free running game, also very tough.
Impossible Road-Very stylish game where you roll a ball down an endless hill.
Planet Quest-Rhythm game like Nintendo's Rhythm Heaven.
Pac-Man 256-Endless maze pacman game from creators of Crossy Road.
Goblin Sword-Great retro platformer with tight controls and a ton of upgrades.
Real games on mobile: Ace Attorney, Dragon Quest series, Final Fantasy, GTA Chinatown Wars, The World Ends With You, Walking Dead series, etc.
I'm pretty sure it's on the app store but You Must Build A Boat is a sequel to 10,000,000
Wasted far too much time on 10,000,000. Currently resisting the urge to download said boat game
Do it. You must build a boat is like 10,000,000 but better in every. single. aspect.
Set aside 12 hours.
You won't be able to put it down.
Just to add to this, Chrono Trigger, one of the greatest games of all time is available on at least the Google play store
Goblin Sword is absolutely phenomenal, and they update the game with new worlds every couple months! Glad to see it on you list!
Edit: iOS only
I can't find it on the android app store.
We share the same sadness.
I got real excited about seeing ace attorney but then dropped when I saw it's not on Android.  I then remembered I'm dumb and have it on my ds emulator on the very phone I was looking on.
Also super hexagon is a definite must have
Why you'd guys have to say super hexagon is on android.. Like I didn't waste enough time on it on my computer.
any game made by the developers of game dev story
/r/threadkillers
I don't like this kind of comments, how will I know which one is more upvoted.
Yeah it's unfortunate when this happens, hopefully someone replies and says "Yeah! I love blah blah" then that comment gets upvoted more than OP so you'll know which one is the best?
Agreed. I usually skip these types of comments.
Ebooks!
Don't forget that most games take a lot of battery life. So when i was traveling and using public transport i found the best thing thing to kill time and preserve battery life and space on my phone to be ebooks!
I'd suggest downloading a collection of short stories instead if a novel as it's easier to get into quickly.
If you read his entire comment, then Ebooks are for you! If you found yourself saying "TL;DR", then you should probably just move along.
Can I get a TL;DR of your comment?  I'm not reading all of that.
TL;DR Don't get Ebooks.
Can I get a TL;DR for that?
TL;DR E-books bad
Ugga ugga eBook! Ugga bugga bad!
If you are going for short stories i would recomend you Borges or Cortazar, probably two of the best authors in the genre
Audiobooks!
Don't forget that lighting the screen take a lot of battery life. So when i was traveling and using public transport i found the best thing thing to kill time and preserve battery life and space on my phone to be audiobooks!
I'd suggest downloading a collection of short stories instead if a novel as it's easier to get into quickly.
edit: spelling
Podcasts!
There's tons of audio out there that's not books, and a lot of it updates on a regular basis. I tend to carry a ton of these downloaded at all times, as well as one or two ebooks.
So, if I need my hands or my eyes -- if I'm actually walking or driving, that kind of thing -- or if I'm just low enough on battery, I listen to podcasts. If I have battery and I can just sit there and read, I read my email first, then a book. (Any decent email app should be able to give you most of your email offline, and just sync everything you did (including send any emails you wrote) when you come back online.)
If it's long enough, like a flight, I'll bring a tablet and some movies or TV shows, and some graphic novels in ebook format. But normal ebooks don't suffer nearly as much from being on a small screen -- there are just more pages that you turn faster.
Speaking of short stories my faves series are all from Ray Bradbury:
•The Illustrated Man
•The Martian Chronicles
•Golden Apples of the Sun
Choose your own adventure could be a great fit for this too. Maybe even fighting fantasy games such as heart on ice.
Crossy road is fun
Colorfy
Have you tried the new Shooty Skies? so addictive!!
Omg there's more
I like Smashy Road better.
Geometry Dash is SO good.
C'mon, 93% ToE2... I hate mini-wave...
Harder than wood
I second this. I've been playing for years and I've never gotten bored.
If you don't mind dropping a few bucks all of the final fantasy games have a whole lot of hours of play each
PSP emulator with Crisis Core
This. So many hours wasted on the toilet at work simply because I download FF for my mobile.
Wasted? If you were getting paid to shit and play Final Fantasy, that's the dream.
Oh don't get me wrong, it's great! But I also love my job and the work I do.
"Hold on Bob I'm just gonna go freshen up ;)"
goes into bathroom and plays Final Fantasy on the toilet
"I love my job and the work I do"
Yup, played all the way through ff5 on the shitter at work (not in one sitting obviously)
The Room and The Room 2.
Avernum HD
The room and room 2 are amazing, just kind of short.  Here's hoping the room 3 is as big as the developers promise (should be coming out soon according to their site).
Tetris.
drop 7
FTL
Is ftl for iOS? I was looking for it and concluded it was steam only
1010! Addictive game, and the only thing data/Wi-Fi is used for is ads on that game.
I got 19k and never bothered playing again because I know I'll never beat that score, I peaked.
Wind-up Knight- Platformer. You are a knight that doesn't stop running.
Paper Monsters Recut- Platformer. Classic collecting things.
Shardlands- Collect gems, solve puzzles, run from monsters.
Badland- Get through levels by cloning yourself, speeding up, slowing down and pressing buttons and things.
Asteroid Impacts- You have a set amount of asteroids. Use them to destroy planets.
Deemo- Music game with good graphics. A better Taptap.
Winter Walk- You are a man who must keep his hat blowing away in the wind. Lost of British comments. More fun than it sounds.
Duet- You are a pair of coloured dots that rotate together. Avoid splattering yourself.
7 Little Words- Use word blocks to construct words from a particular clue.
Puzzle Retreat- A good puzzle game.
Stay Alight- Throw balls of light to light things up.
Blendoku- Put colours in the correct gradient.
The Battle Cats- You command a weird army of cats to take over the world.
Smash Hit- Smash glass with metal balls. Super quality.
TwoDots- It's like Candy Crush, but instead of swapping things you connect things.
Tiny Thief- Solve puzzles.
Move: A Brain Shifting Puzzle- Move dots in tandem to their correct areas.
Blueprint 3D- Change your perspective to solve the puzzle.
Cytus- Music game. Like osu, but not.
Alphabear- Make words from a given amount of letters. I misremembered, needs data/wifi
Edit: remembered some
TwoDots- It's like Candy Crush, but instead of swapping things you connect things.
This is bad, this never needs to be more than 1 dot!
Alphabear doesn't work without data though
Smash Hit is so Damn good if you like simple concepts and gameplay done right.
Cytus is the only mobile game I've ever bought. It's so damn good for long rides on public transport, and the music is great.
"Doodle Jump". A pure classic.
That game still exists ? Haven't seen anyone play or talk about it in 2-3 years i think.
That was a really fun game tho i have to addmit
I remember it used to be paid access but now it's free
They have a free version and a paid version for IOS
MEEEEE HOYYY MINOYYYY
sudoku
Any game by Kairosoft
Grand Prix might be my favourite.
Cytus.
The only games I've got on my phone are Limbo, Phoenix Wright ace attorney, Zeros Escape: Virtues Last Reward (more of a novel) and the blitzcrank poro game for league. All pretty fun imo.
Settlers of Catan
Sorcery 1, 2 and 3!
Or 80 days by the same company
Cthulu saves the world
Not very complicated RPG with a ChronoTrigger Iike style. Creators have a good sense of humor and it shows
I would also recommend the game they made for Penny Arcade "On The Rain slick Precipice of Darkness 3"
Auralux
Osmos
Carmageddon
Galaxy on Fire 2
Prince of Persia shadow & flame
Hill climb racing
I still find 2048 to be super addictive
This game is a clone of "Threes". I played it instead of threes because it was free and threes cost 2.99
Then threes came out with a free ad supported version. I tried it and immediately bought threes.
It's so much better.
I bummed me out so much when everyone was playing 2048. I'd been playing Threes! for about a month when 2048 blew up. I was so bummed for the developer that the clone of their game was getting more attention than the original.
I was super into 2048 until I beat it, now I'm all like, "Meh."
Beating 2048 is not a big deal, you can go further to 4096 and on.
True Skate
Minecraft Pocket Edition has improved a lot in the past two years.
Jesus has it ever. I used to play MC on the Xbox, gave it up for a couple years, downloaded MC for my android recently and THERE'S MORE ON THE ANDROID THEN THERE WAS ON THE XBOX back then. I can't believe they crammed so much in.
A Dark Room. Incremental game with roguelike RPG elements. Fun stuff!
The Ensign is its prequel, and focuses a lot more on the roguelike RPG aspect. You will die a lot.
Nobody saying Myboy? Emulator for Gameboy Advanced. Currently playing through Pokemon Emerald again.
I know I'm a little late, but if you're looking for games, look no further:
If you want a nice platformer with a great aesthetic and some originality instead of being a Mario clone, and can deal with a bit of defective grammar (it's created by a foreign studio), then I can recommend Nihilumbra (iOS android). It was 69p when I bought it, but that might have changed. Well worth the money as even when you finish the game you're only halfway as you have to go back and do each level again, but harder.
If you don't mind games being rather reminiscent of other games for other devices, then I can say Oceanhorn (iOS) was a game I really enjoyed. It is rather Zelda-esque in the gameplay, but has a nice storyline and some well thought out controls. It may be more expensive than most - I paid £5.99 - but I took 13 hours with only 57% completion, and the developers have released a free update with 4 hours more gameplay on a new island.
If you want a beat 'em up with some fancy moves and a nice look, you can't go wrong with Reaper: Tale of a Pale Swordsman (iOS android Windows). It's free to download, and you can level up to level 10 on the free version, rather like a demo, and if you enjoy it, you can upgrade to a full version for a couple of quid. There are 3 tiers of full game, the higher ones with extra stuff, but the game is playable and full with the lowest tier. You can also upgrade tiers by paying the difference if you decide to later (which I did).
Limbo (iOS Android), which you may have played on console or PC, is also available on iOS, and, once you get used to the rather unique control system, is enjoyable. Probably more enjoyable for those who didn't play it on another device, though.
Smash hit (iOS Android) is an endless runner where you throw balls at glass to get more balls to throw at glass and to not die. It's vaguely fun. Try it.
If you happen to be looking for an excellent story-driven puzzle game, The Silent Age (iOS Android Windows) might be the answer to your prayers. Episode 1 is entirely free (except on Windowsphone - sorry :/), and ad-free, and episode 2 is available in-app for £3.99. It's basically a side-scrolling point-n-click with an interesting character and some sound-based puzzles to compliment to norm. It's also, thankfully, lacking those obscure puzzles that only the developer can guess and make no sense when you're not coding, drunk, at 3 in the morning.
Knoword (iOS Android) gives you the Merriam-Webster definition for a word, along with its first letter, and you have to type the word. Fellow Brits (and Canadians & Aussies, I guess), be warned; it uses the American spelling only, so it won't accept any superfluous "u"s, "s"s where the uS puts "z"s or "h"s in yoghurt.
All of the above games are without microtransactions, and the only IAPs are to buy the full game.
For fans of Pandemic, Plague inc. (iOS Android Windows) takes the concept of a giant, player-controlled, world-ending disease and expands on it. It involves new modes, new types of disease and some challenges, but be aware that a lot of the modes are categorised as expansions, and will require IAPs. That doesn't detract from the fact that the base game is fun as is, and definitely contains enough to make it fun for quite a while.
If you like your shooters, Dead Trigger (iOS Android) and Dead Trigger 2 (iOS Android Windows) might tickle your fancy, though I found they were marred with the curse of freemium. They are playable without paying for extra guns/ammo etc, but rather difficult.
A nice survival horror game is Dark Meadow: The Pact (iOS Android), which has you wake up in an abandoned hospital where death has a slightly different connotation and there is a cheery old man who I don't quite trust. Again, marred by microtransactions, but again, not necessary to enjoy the game. If you enjoy it, Dark Meadow (iOS) is available to buy as well, which, by my understanding, is the full version.
WordCollapse (iOS Androidold Androidnew) is fairly self explanatory: you have lots of letters, you take words out of them, the rest collapse and you find the rest of the words. Jesus am I terrible at selling things.
All of the Doodle God games are available on mobile, for fans of the browser version, or people looking for a twist on the classic alchemy games. Variants include:
Doodle God (iOS Android Windows)  Free/lite (iOS Android [Windows]())
Doodle Devil ([iOS]() Android Windows)  Free/lite ([iOS]() Android Windows)
Doodle Tanks ([iOS]() Android Windows)  Free/lite ([iOS]() Android)
Doodle Creatures ([iOS]() Android Windows)  Free/lite ([iOS]() Android Windows)
Doodle Kingdom ([iOS]() Android Windows)  Free/lite ([iOS]() Android Windows)
No, I have no idea why they need so many. To be honest, beyond God and Devil they're fairly shite. HD versions are also available for tablets.
Fallout Shelter
I found it initially very addictive but it soon becomes very repetitive and there's not much depth to it at all. I know it was mainly released to keep people occupied until Fallout 4 but still, they could do more with it.
It just needs more types of rooms, emergencies, attacking enemies and so on. Just to freshen it up and extend the longevity.
I'd like to see a vault experiment mode where you play out different vault Tec experiments. Also add yourself as a overseer avatar that can die/be overthrown.
It's one of those tycoon types of games except you can actually play for longer than 3 minutes at a time.
Fallout shelter is pretty RAD.
Alchemy is a lot of fun.
Terraria and the Kingdom Rush franchise
Terraria's like 20x better on PC (alternatively console if you're not a fan of PC gaming), though. Control scheme is just a lot nicer and more content. Not saying it's not great though, but still.
Minecraft PE
Square Enix has TWEWY ported to android. It's pricy, considering they kept the DS price, but it works with toch controls, and the battle system was perfected on android. I'd even say it's better than the DS original.
GTA San Andreas.
The World Ends with You.  It's pretty expensive for an app, but it's definitely worth it.  It used to be a DS game, but it got ported to Android and iOS.  If you like action RPGs with a decent story, this is seriously a great game for you.
One More Line!
Fallout Shelter is barrels of fun, if only a time waster.
Depends on the kind of games you are interested in. I always recommend Reaper: Tale of the Pale Swordsman. You can play a demo of it, but honestly spending $10 (dark harvest edition) on the whole game is really worth it cause of the insane amount of game time you can get. If you like simple games, Circle is really fun and so pleasurable to play. The developer also has a ton of other good games so check them out. Also, Jigsaw Puzzles are absolutely fabulous too if you're into that.
tl;dr Reaper: Tale of the Pale Swordsman, Circle, and Jigsaw Puzzles.
2048 is a simple yet great game.
May take a little bit of time to understand the best method to play, but it's great for spending loads of spare time on.
Someone stole my phone
Sorry for standing you up
Sent from my iPhone
I feel like there are people stupid enough to actually do this.
People stupid enough to fall for it, too.
It's okay I guess
One more day I stay lonely
Sent from my iPhone
Thank you for the turn, too.
Sorry, wrong number.
That pic was for your daughter
-Sent from my iPhone
Hope you're home alone
Since here's a pic of my bone
Sent from my iPhone
That dick is so small
That it looks like a small chode
Sent from my iPhone
Well she did not mind
When I was 2 inches deep
Sent from my iPhone
She didn't say so
But she hates your tiny dick
Sent from my android.
That dick is like a stick,
Quite thick I want to lick
Sent from my iPhone
You're wrong - it's not small
Instead, my balls are massive
Sent from my iPhone
Don't you worry, hun
I came with it either way.
Sent from dad's iPhone
I am oh so broke
Where did all my money go?
Sent from my iPhone
This is the most poetic one in the thread imo
If by "poetic" you mean "of or relating to poets", as opposed to meaning "of or relating to poetry" then I am very much in agreement.
I mean poetic as in "a fucking poem"
Art is subjective, don't be a pratt
Chill
Thanks!
#WhiteBitch #CrackedScreen #WheresMyPumpkinSpiceLatte
Edit: thanks for all the format tips! You guys/gals are awesome.
The # is supposed to be in front of whitebitch. Fuck mobile lol
Sorry for your loss,
Can you work the eight o' clock?
Sent from my iPhone
Sorry he dumped you.
You up for Netflix and chill?
Sent from my iPhone
We did not split-up
He died and so did our love
Sent from my iPhone
Outoftheloop, netflix and chill?
Sex.
this actually happened o me yesterday. so done with corporate.
A corporate sending a haiku sounds kind of awesome though.
If this is serious, sorry for your loss though.
It wasn't written in haiku format. but the end of the email did say Sent from my iPhone.
'Twas not a haiku
But the end of it did say
Sent from my iPhone
this actually
happened o me yesterday
so done with corporate
We ninety nine say
Boycott corporate giants!
Sent from my iPhone
Stay strong my brothers
I'm running out of charac
Sent from my iPhone
Don't you have iMessage
Perfect for revolution
Sent from my iPhone
Pro redditing tip: you need two new lines for it to show properly. There should be at least one empty line between the text you want to be on seperate lines.
Alternatively, put two spaces at the end of the first line.
It totally works.
Huh.
Til.
Thank you for the tip
a shame that the comment was
Sent from my iPhone
I live off the grid
Down with the technology!
Sent from my iPhone
Capitalism
Is such a shitty system
Sent from my iPhone
Baby I love you
Oh shit that was not for you
Sent from my iPhone
So they realized they were texting the wrong person but still sent it anyways?
But that just means you texted someone you do not love. If you sent that to your girl and were cheating on her why correct yourself. Am I missing something here?
You're thinking about this too hard.
Im not a very smart man I need an explanation :/
When you accidentally click on the wrong name in your contacts list.
Ahhh ok. I thought this is a cheating scenario lol
I'm here if you need to talk.
What if your boss and your wife were both called Kylie?
And also it only does sent from my iPhone on emails
Sent to the ex by accident.  She's psycho and would think he wants her back
Baby I loved you
Now, hurt, we must be apart
Sent from my iPhone
Duck you piece of shoot
God dammit autocorrect
Sent from my iphone
When I click agree
I have just given some con-
sent from my iphone
Love the wordplay
Welcome to Cat Facts!
Text 'cancel' to unsubscribe
Sent from my iPhone
Many days, no food
Children freeze in hungry beds
Sent from my iPhone
I'd freeze too if my bed was hungry
In Soviet Russia, Bed eats you!
In American continent, you eat your bed.
hungry beds
stretching it
It should really read "Children freeze, hungry in beds" I think.
This would be my dick
If my phone could send pictures
Sent from my iPhone
Beautiful.
......but...  Cool.
99 problems,
But a battery ain't one.
Sent from my iPhone.
The machines have won.
They were hidden in plain sight.
Sent from my iPhone
Did you see Kingsman?
I hope that never happens
Sent from my iPhone
I have no iPhone
So I'll have to lie a bit
Sent from my iPhone
I was lying too
My phone is not even new
Sent from my MyTouch
What is a haiku?
The directions are unclear.
I have no iPhone.
Dick stuck in iPhone
Directions were clear enough
Sent from my iPhone
You've a tiny dick
Three point five millimeters
Sent from my iPhone
Push enter key twice
to have lines nicely spaced out.
Sent from my iPhone
Space twice and an enter
To make this look much nicer
Sent from my iphone
You fucked up the first line there bud but good effort.
You know he's a douche
If his messages end with
Sent from my iPhone.
Will you marry me?
I've loved you since I met you.
Sent from my iPhone
Who would use apple?
Android is so much better
Sent from my iPhone
Sent from my iPhone Galaxy Nexus
I don't care about
Your fucking parameters
It's snowing on mt. Fuji
r/firstworldanarchists
context
I'm fucking alone.
The bridge is real nice today.
Sent from my iPhone.
Really really like this one, it says so much
Pics of my butthole
Paper still stuck to my rim
Sent from my iPhone
oversleep? Me? Nahh!
Just working from home today
Sent from my iPhone
Staring at a screen
Will make you miss out on life
Sent from my iPhone
The worst part was that
she texted him, and it was
sent from my iPhone
I am so sorry
your children are now missing
sent from my iPhone
Your kids are all dead
Sorry to break it to you
Sent from my iPhone
May I buy your house?
You no longer need the space.
Sent from my iPhone
You are now alone.
And potentially homeless.
Sent from my iPhone
Don't worry my friend
You are never alone, mate
Sent from my iPhone
/u/HaikuberryFin
I summon you to chime in
Sent from my iPhone
I new to Reddit.
Will this comment get karma?
Sent from my iPhone
I do not think so
Sorry to break it to you
Sent from my iPhone
You should run away
Leave while you still can, my friend!
Sent from my iPhone
I'm sorry teacher, I
couldn't call - I broke my phone
Sent from my Iphone
Wish I had money,
To donate to charity,
Sent from my iPhone
What is going on?
Where is /u/HaikuberryFin?
Sent from my iPhone.
I have a skill set
acquired from my career
i'm your worst nightmare
if you let her go
that will be the end of it
but if you do not
I will look for you
I will find you and kill you
sent from my iPhone
haikus don't always
end like you expect them to
it's snowing on mount fuji
I hated Steve Jobs,
Didn't give us anything,
Sent from my iPhone
Your first line is only 4 syllables.
EDIT: Has been fixed.
Damn autocorrect, typed 'hated'. Edited it.
CURSE YOU AUTOCORRECT!!
Sent from my iPhone
getting a divorce
shouldnt have touched my meat pies
sent from my iphone
Australian?
Here are the launch codes
OH SHIT THAT'S THE WRONG NUMBER
Sent from my iPhone
In the coffee pot
The pooping man's dream liquid
Sent from my iPhone
Fun fact of the day:
It's snowing on Mt Fuji
Sent from my iPhone
Ploop plop, it won't stop
My bum looses the demon
Sent from my iPhone
(because everyone texts and poops. don't deny it)
Hey Autocorrect
Stop it. It is not ducking
Sent from my iPhone
Push the space key twice
At the end of the sentence
Sent from my iPhone
I AM OCCUPY
FIGHTING THE CORPORATIONS
SENT FROM MY IPHONE
When Alicia tweets
Glad to endorse Blackberry
Sent from my iPhone
Hey, can't find my phone
But I'll talk to you later.
Sent from my iPhone
Netflix and chill, girl?
Oops, wrong number, sorry mom
Sent from my Iphone
I'm @ hospital
Get here now she's in bad shape
Sent from my iphone
I like chicken wings,
theres gre se all over the scrwen
-sent from my iPhone.
Chinese children have
Fantastic craftsmanship now
-Sent from my iPhone
Hey how's it going?
Just trying to make a change :/
Sent from my iPhone
I want to breed you
Oh, stupid auto correct.
Sent from my iPhone
The apocalypse
arrived today- I got pics.
Sent from my iPhone
I'll show you my dick
Send me a pic of your tits
Sent from my iPhone
Baby cries loudly
Thoughts of bleach and coat hangars
-Sent from my iPhone
I see your bubbles
Why you no send me a text
Sent from my iPhone
Have you seen my phone?
I can't find it anywhere.
Sent from my iPhone.
Consumer culture
It is the bane of my life
Sent from my iPhone
Food is on my plate
I think the world needs to see
Sent from my iPhone.
(Edited for formatting)
Internet stranger
You can't tell me what to do
Sent from my iPhone
This thread is stupid.
I do not have an iPhone.
Sent from my iPhone.
This picture's a 'bone'
with a behind, all alone.
-Sent from my iPhone
Can you call my phone?
I think I've lost it again.
Sent from my iPhone
Big Phat Gross Hoes 5
Fuck, that wasn't google search
-Sent from my iPhone
Tears splatter the screen
Sorrow washing life should not be
Sent from my phone
"Sent from my iPhone"
Who'd write a haiku with that?  :-/
Sent from my iPhone
A dick pic for you
A dick pick for everyone
Sent from my IPhone
Never did I think
you would contain so much blood
Sent from my iPhone
No, I can't facetime you.
I don't have an iphone.
Sent from my iPhone
locked n trunk plzhelp!!!!
im so scared he has a gun
Sent from my iPhone
Send out the nukes
Destroy North Korea, yay
Sent from my iPhone
Clean blue day. The clouds
Still in the sky. Ringtone:
Sent from my iPhone.
Know the muffin man?
Yes, I know the muffin man.
Sent from my iPhoe
Happy meal please
Make sure you ask for napkins
Sent from my iPhone
All hope is now lost
Broken Civilization
Sent from my iPhone
deep meanings
now coming
sent from my iphone
I swear that I’m not
addicted to my smartphone
sent from my iPhone
Sorry cannot call
Lost my phone and cannot text
Sent from my iPhone
Well it should be fine
I charged it this morning wa-
Sent from my iPhone
Android, the one.
There are no others.
Sent from my iPhone.
Hey girl you want dik?
JK unless you want to
Sent from my iPhone
Accidental nudes
Of me shitting on the floor
-Sent from my iPhone
Just thought u should no
I've been fucking your sister
- Sent from my IPhone
I'm back from the shop.
Brand new Samsung Galaxy
Sent from my iPhone
Virtual contact,
Not realistic enough.
-Sent from my iPhone
Hey honey, what's up?
Of course I'm at work! Where else?
-Sent from my iPhone
Going to the game
I mean -- crap -- calling in sick
Sent from my iPhone
I swear that it's true.
I'm not using my iPhone.
Sent from my iPhone.
It's just not working
Don't worry it's me not you
Sent from my iPhone
Dude I lost my phone,
try give my number a call?
-Sent from my iPhone
Why can't we move on?
Technology is so dead.
Sent from my iPhone.
Phone is dead, don't call
Email me at work instead
Sent from my iPhone
Why did I come into this thread thinking it said "scent" from my iPhone?
Just sent a dick pick
Oops, that's a group chat with mom
Sent from my iPhone
Come in through the back.
Badger is loose in the house.
-Sent from my iPhone.
Eight hundred dollars!
Unluckiest man worldwide.
-sent from my iPhone.
I wanted rose gold.
My parents are such retards.
-Sent from my iPhone
"Lol who's this cute girl?
Her laptop's Facebook's open!!"
Sent from my iPhone
Fuck iPhone users.
Be together. Not the Same.
Sent from my Android.
jk you guys are okay
I'm a murderer
I am in your house right now
Sent from my iPhone
I want to donate,
But I'm very poor right now.
Sent from my iPhone.
Hiakus are stupid
This was sent from my iPhone
Firstworldanarchists
Open a window!
What created that awful
Scent from my iPhone?
Yeah! Finger my ass!
Wait, is that thing recording?
-sent from my iPhone
Sorry to inform
Hired another applicant
Sent from my iPhone
In case you don't know
That I love Apple, this was
Sent from my iPhone
They took the cockpit,
I love you sweetie, goodbye.
Sent from my iPhone.
Look at this cat pic
These ten facts you won't believe
Sent from my iPhone
Trolling reddit as
I sit peacefully pooping
Sent from my iphone
Drinking and driving
Is SO not all that danger-
....
Sent from my iphone
"Texting and driving" would be better.
Pic of my penis
Winging the charged ether
Sent from my iPhone
Just take a quick peak
It's my dick for all to see
Sent from my iPhone
I don't want to rape.
But mobile porn? I get con-
Sent from my iPhone
If you like that one
Upvote me mobil-ly. As-
Sent from my iPhone
But if you didn't.
You will feel how, you, I re-
Sent from my iPhone
Can you help me out?
I just fell in the toilet
Sent from my iPhone
GOT THE TESLA JOB!
Steve Jobs's ghost can eat dick
-Sent from my iPhone
Legs fallen asleep
Please bring me toilet paper
Sent from my iPhone
Dick pic to my mum
Now she said she wants loads more
Sent from my iPhone?
I have to tell you
I am pregnant with your child
-Sent from my iPhone
Never buy Apple
Elitist snobs buy Apple
Sent from my iPhone
At Reddits request
I'm hoping to be gilded
Sent from my iPhone.
Sorry I missed your call
My damn battery is flat
Sent from my iPhone
Please send help to me
I am stuck on an island
Sent from my iPhone
Look, all I'm sayin'
Is that hipsters ducking suck
Sent from my iPhone
It fucking burns me up inside that I pay full price for my public transit pass every month, and yet the train just shows up whenever the fuck it wants. Five minutes early? Hope you didn't want to make that train. 25 minutes late? Sorry! 30 minutes late? Go kick sand. 48 minutes late? Go fuck yourself.
GET YOUR FUCKING SHIT TOGETHER, SEPTA.
SEPTA is early when you're late and late when you're early. I take it out of Overbrook once a week and I get fucked every time.
I getcha. One of my regional transit machines wasn't working and I was just making it to the bus stop so I had to run across the parking lot and use the other one. I asked the driver to wait a moment for me, he says yes and as soon as I turn around he leaves. EARLY. Fuck you too GO transit.
It's hell trying to take public transit out of Rock Bottom, isn't it?
Holy shit I was reading that like, "sounds like septa" then I got to the end!
#MussoliniHadSomeGoodIdeas
All the best tasting food is bad for you. I would love to eat a platter of poutine and wash it down with a pint of Bailey's three times a day but then i'd die.
Ah, the good ol' poutine routine. 4 out of 5 Canadian doctors recommend something relevant to this scenario.
Canadian here. My doctors have all told me 3-4 kilograms of poutine a day can add many years to your life, so long as you wash it down with a couple of liters of Molson.
Feel like the Molson would kill you first
You can blame evolution and millennia of food scarcity for that one.  We, supposedly, developed so that high energy foods (fats, glucose, carbs, proteins) tasted better because we needed more of them to live.
Now mankind sits on their ass all day and all this tasty energy food makes us fat instead.
Take solace knowing this would have helped you survive in the past.
I'm not fat, I'm famine resistant.
This is true in an overall way, but I'd argue that there are some things that are healthy and tasty. Garlic, for instance, and avocados. Hot peppers, apart from possible gastric effects.
This. I'm trying to lose about 15 pounds, and these constant salads and water really makes me miss my Coke and fried foods.
Salad is grim dude. Go for things like chunky soups, Roasted lean meat and vegetables and all those good things.
Obviously water is still best for you, but a cheeky Diet Coke doesn't do you any harm other than bringing back your sugar cravings if you have got over them.
Edit: Turns out there's a lot of hate for Diet Coke.
Seriously, why can't chocolate be the mother of all carbs
I come from a very poor country where many children end up as sex slaves. They absolutely did nothing to deserve it (anyway, what a child could do to "deserve" becoming a sex slave?), but here we are.
Way less fair than my whiney American problems. :(
I have my problems. But sometimes I feel like a dick for being bothered by them. Because at the end of the day I have a roof over my head, enough food, and relative safety. Which is much more than far too many people have in life.
My landlord is being an asshole, the car needs work, my cat threw up all over my bed, management at work is so bad now that I hate going to work, etc. But I can still go inside my warm home and make a sandwich whenever I want while other people don't know if they'll be fed or alive the next day. I sometimes feel bad about getting down over my issues in life knowing that they're not all that bad in comparison.
it's all subjective though. That's like saying you're never allowed to be happy because timmy in oklahoma shattered his kneecaps. Be happy with your own life
My boss keeps making us buy these dumb ass t shirts that we're supposed to wear while my store runs promotions for the month, but after that month we have to go back to our normal uniforms and we are no longer allowed to wear the shirts.
I think it's unfair for him to charge us to advertise their product when we already have to verbally promote it to every customer that we talk to, but I don't know enough about business to really complain I guess.
Check your state labor laws, pretty sure that isn't allowed, at least in some states.
If I remember correctly from when I read Washington's laws, the employer had to provide uniforms if they were specific articles, we only had to provide them if they were generic, like "black slacks" and "dark dress shoes".
I think for fast food we were given shirts since they wanted then to all be the exact shirt, and we had to provide our pants and shoes.
Can't speak for the rest of the world, but here in British Columbia that's the law. If it's a specific uniform, they pay.
Your boss honestly sounds like he's taking advantage of you and your coworkers. I would hope you could help him see how ridiculous it is that you're the one paying to advertise for his store. Maybe you and your coworkers could collectively bargain with him to have him compensate the price of the shirts in the future.
Definitely not acceptable behavior at all. Employees shouldn't be paying for this, and it would be fine/cheaper for the store to own the shirts and use them in a cycle of yearly promotions than buying more each time. Consider suggesting that any additional revenue generated during promotions should be given to employees for their investment.
I believe this is illegal... Where I live anyways. My boss wanted us to all have nonslip shoes, but legally he couldn't require it unless he provided them.
Correct; you cannot enforce such a specific dress code without providing said clothing. You can require professional clothing, but you cannot require a specific set of shoes or type of shoes.
thats bullshit he shouldn't force you to buy anything but replacements/extras of the standard uniform.
Adult Acne
It's pretty unfair to be approaching your early thirties and still have a pizza face.
26 and it's still there :(
I feel like people take me way less seriously at work because of it.
Roaccutane..strongest drug out there in relation to acne, will absolutely obliterate it but has side effects.
Among those possible intrusive thoughts of suicide.
Conveniently, this is also a side effect of acne.
Taking accutane was literally one of the best decision of my life. Sure it sucks for a bit to have such dry skin and a bit of back pain, but my god, 6 months later and it is like someone injected you with a bathtub full of confidence. You finally feel human. You finally want to strut your stuff and be seen in public. I would have taken fucking ANY side effects to get rid of that fucking acne that was still cratering my face when I was 23 years old.
I'm 25 and I still have bullshit acne, luckily not pizza face though. My hate comes from I've had it since I hit puberty and I have 4 siblings and none of them have it. And the youngest is 18 now oldest 30. What's up with that? My mom even says she never had to deal with it.
Have you been to /r/skincareaddiction? If not, or you find it overwhelming, message me and I can simplify!
What if you find it unbelievably expensive?  Which guide is the "I eat ramen noodles half the time" guide?
Well apart from changing your diet, I would say definitely drink more water if you are consuming that much sodium. Also simply putting a CLEAN, new towel over your pillow every night helped me more than any cream or other marketed crap.
Tried sterilizing your razors?
That I can't get financial aid for school. My parents threw me out when I was 19. They pay absolutely nothing for my cost of living, not to mention I am a legal, self-sufficient adult. But my father makes about 100K a year which I have to report on my FAFSA. So I get next to no financial aid. I make around 17K a year which the government views as completely disposable income (which, you know, I use to pay for rent, electricity, food, healthcare, and other bills) because of the amount my father makes. So the fact that I keep a roof over my head and try to put food in my mouth actually hurts me in the long run financial aid wise. So yeah... pretty unfair.
I'm pretty sure you can declare yourself as an independent in this case. If your father pays for nothing for you and you live on your own, this should be very possible.
Edit: as /u/aessa pointed out (and others as well) you arw considered an independent if yoy are 24 or older, a veteran, or are emancipated/an orphan.
You can't. I am 100% independent from my parents and have been for 2 years now. I've fought with the FAFSA people and they won't budge. It doesn't help that on paper they think my dad makes millions of dollars a year (he's a farmer and he  "makes" that much but spends nearly all of it as well).
Lucky for me in just in community college and got a grant that pays for a lot of school but it still sucks.
You would think that, but FAFSA doesn't give a flying fuck if you're independent or not. I was 21, had been on my own for two years, and in an effort to get the federal government to recognize me as an independent financial entity, my father drafted a letter of emancipation, which we both signed, and had it notarized. FAFSA just lol'd and essentially told me to fuck myself.
It's extremely difficult and a lengthy process to do before you're 21 unless you're married.
If he is 24, a vet, married, an orphan, graduated, or if he is a student for whom a financial aid administrator makes a documented determination of independence by reason of other unusual circumstances.
Also known as probably not without paperwork that may never actually work.
I had a similar experience a while back.  Kind of feel bad that the crappy system hasn't changed.
Not for FAFSA, unfortunately.
same thing happened to me at 16, I wasn't living at home, I was paying rent and getting myself to school then working after hours at an under 18 year old wage. deadbeat 30 year old brother wanted custody of his kids and lived with my parents (he was the reason I left home). When I asked my mum to sign the document saying I was looking after myself and citing the reason that I couldnt liive in an abusive environment my mum said "no, it might hurt my brothers chances of getting custody." I said "but he's mooching and I'm fucking struggling" she said "You can't make me choose between my kids."
Fuck you, you just did bitch.
The same thing happened to my brother.  He couldn't get student loans because our Dad makes a lot of money... but he doesn't just give it to us!  AND he charged us to live at home after we graduated high school.
He would have been better off with poor parents in every way.
I'm a parent and I DO NOT get people who do this to their kids. IMHO, people who do that shit to their kids ought to have their parental rights severed at least where it comes to their income being considered for financial aid. Give them a chance. I think one of the best things I did for mine was to help them graduate from college with no student debt. They got xxx amount of money a year for education that their grandparents and I had saved for since they were babies. We have a better than average income; I think it's my responsibility to offer them education if I can. If they needed more money, then they got scholarships, grants or they worked. They (I have 2) each took a year longer than usual, and they went to state schools, but they graduated with 0 debt.
Trying to make up for bad parenting through "tough love". Cutting off your kid at 18 is complete BS if he is trying to pursue into college. You are not teaching that kid any lesson, you are just fcking him over because everyone thinks only a dumbass would cut their child off when going to college therefore FAFSA.
Zero Tolerance policies in schools. I never got into fight situations in highschool or anything but if I did I'm not going to sit there and take it, thats total BS.
I was in trouble several times in Jr. High for fighting. I was defending myself every time. I got suspended, sat detentions and ended up in court twice, all for defending myself instead of letting some asshole pound my face and hope a staff member broke it up.
I was bullied twice in secondary school. The first time the guy walked up to me and threatened me, I gave him the finger, a teacher saw it, got detention. Okay, I accepted it.
The second time, that asshole pushed me, I still didn't do anything until another guy (he's a friend of the bully) walked up and they started to gang up on me. Back at that time I was a small and shy kid but I've been learning martial arts for years. I punched one guy in the nose, one in the knees. Got detention again. My parents were pissed because I just defended myself but they didn't say anything to the teacher. When we were at home they gave me a lecture about it but took me to a restaurant afterwards. Last year I asked my Dad about it and he said 'Yeah we were proud that you punched those assholes but fighting is not good so we had to lecture you'.
TL,DR: Fighting is bad, kid. But if someone wanted to physically hurt you, punch them.
How did you punch someone in their knees?
He was a short kid.
I absolutely hate those people
It should br 'hit' not 'punch' but I'm too lazy to change.
I always like to tell this story.  Back in the day my grandfather, who is very talented at judo, broke this kids arm that had been bullying him.  One day I guess taints and shoves weren't enough so he went for a punch.  Grandpa grabbed his arm and snapped it.  Because this was the 50s he didn't get in trouble.
Lol what a badass!
its better when you imagine a 80 yr old man and some 16 yr old punk.
Agreed. I was suspended once for trying to not die when a kid tried stabbing me. I got the same exact fucking punishment as a person who tried stabbing me. Zero tolerance is such bullshit.
Are you serious. That infuriates me so much. Taking a punch is retarded but not allowing yourself to be stabbed is so fucking cancerous that the humans that agree with that should be hung. Seriously,that's fucking bullshit.
Not as bad but got jumped by multiple people on my way to school.
Didn't try to fight back, just took it and went to class after.  Teacher brought me to the office after hearing my side of the story.  Told the principal.  Called the kids in.  Heard our stories separate, and then wanted to go over it with everyone together.
So the kids told theirs, I was telling mine and the principal is like "Are you sure you didn't hit them back?" after everyone had said I didn't, I said "I am sure."  Then she said "Because if you did, you'd get suspended too."
The other kids start going "Oh yeah, i remember him hitting me."  "I think I have a bruise."
The principal was ready to suspend me when the teacher had a talk with her in private.  I ALMOST got suspended for it.  This was back when zero tolerance was just in the works.   I would have been so pissed off if I had got suspended.  My teacher was furious.
I was under the impression that with zero tolerance policies, even if you don't fight back your'e just as liable for starting the fight as the guy who threw the punch.
My biggest fear in High School. I will never fight anyone but that won't stop Zero Tolerance.
I can see where you're coming from, but its just a tool to protect the school from lawsuits.
Tommy fights Bobby, we're told Tommy started it and he was bullying Bobby.
So who do you punish?  Tommy? But what if:
Everyone is assuming that schools operate in a world of perfect information.  This is rarely the case, and listening to kids as evidence is very difficult since its a school people are always in some way interconnected.  You punish both and it lessens the chance of legal actions based on the notion of favoritism/discrimination.
Dogs don't live long enough.
I just got a German Shepherd in the spring. He's about 7 months old now. I already dread the day that I know is coming in 10 or so years.
My puppy is 1 year, and sometimes I end up thinking about it and I just have to grab him and cuddle him.
Some small part of me wishes I had never got him because I'm not sure I'm strong enough to watch him die. Of course, I love him and am a better person for him, and will probably do it all over again when it happens.
I've got a 2 year old lab and a 4 month old golden retriever, Sheppard, rotty mix. Both of them are the best part of getting home after a long day. Just remember that you might not have your dog for your entire life, but your dogs entire life is you and your family. Don't dread the end, make his or her entire life the best it can possibly be for however long they're around.
Yep, we've lost a number of dogs over the years. Some old, some far too young. All of them are hard to take but with all of them the pain eases and you're left with nice memories.
The comforting factor is always that, for all the bad stuff that can happen to an animal, your pet got lucky and had a great life with a family that loved it.
dogs are the best people.
The foster care system in the US.
Not much care is fostered at all.
Foster the care.
And Australia
ELI5. What's wrong with the foster care system?
TL;DR: It's basically the TSA, except they screw with your family instead of your luggage.
There have been incidents of children being giving to abusive, and sometimes sexually abusive, foster parents. Likewise, children have been taken away on false pretenses, or insignificant pretenses. There isn't a very clear system of liability, so if something goes horribly wrong, no one ever gets fired, much less sued or jailed.
my aunt foster cared for a few months for a teenager who's parents were druggies. a few years later, the girl had kids of her own and was in a lot of trouble, and CPS took the kids. one of them was a baby and it died while under CPS care, because noone was watching it. ill try to find the story
http://www.click2houston.com/news/6monthold-baby-dies-in-cps-custody/32900556
this may be it, im not sure, i thought it happened a bit more recently
My coworker/friend is a foster care mother.  Her house is checked on a surprise (unannounced) basis at least 3 times a year.  She's adopted 2 children and is looking at a third.  Currently, she has a boy who was left on the doorstep in Wyoming, in December, because the mom 'forgot' where she set him down; a girl who's mother had 10 children, 8 survived, all were addicted to drugs, all in foster care; a young boy who's parents decided that god could heal his penile birth defects, which caused a great deal of pain and a five year old whose earliest memory is watching the sun rise and set on a box of crackers that he couldn't reach to eat. I don't know the story of the others she fosters as she really doesn't talk about that part much.
So, yeah, the system is messed up and overwhelmed, but it is certainly needed.
"Entry level position, must have experience."
WTF?
That experience is always negotiable. Apply anyway and explain how your past experience outside of the field is translatable.
Entry to the company, not to work in general.
Well, in that case, "CEO" is also an entry-level position.
Still bullshit.  The company still has to train the person to do the job.
My parents only got me 36 presents for my birthday this year but last year I got 37! 37!!!
I'm sure they will buy you 2 new presents at the zoo. Relax..
You should check to make sure he isn't actually a pig in a wig.
Well some of them are quite a bit bigger than last year...
I don't care how big they are!
When we go out, we'll buy you two new presents. How's that sound, pumpkin?
HE DOESN'T CARE HOW BIG THEY ARE!!!
Calm down Dudders
Dudders
Big D
Try not to open any presents on the way to the parking lot!
In a row?
"It is not what you know, it is who you know" in the job market is such unfair bullshit.
I've seen this, someone with more than sufficient qualifications above the job listing requirements loses out to the managers' friends' cousins' daughter who doesn't know how to do jack shit.
Fuck it, I give up.
Edit: good thoughtful comments below. It is all well and good to hire your friend or relative. But if a job is advertised, it is implied that all applicants should be screened equally. This is where the unfair comes in.
It's not who you know; it's who knows you.
I've had better luck hiring friends of current employees than I have hiring random people off the streets. They tend to be better employees. Sometimes someone sounds great on paper and they end up being horrible. Sometimes you hire someone who didn't even have a paper and they end up being a solid employee.
My employees know what I expect of them and they can tell their friends exactly what is expected. I feel like most job applicants that are looking for a job are just that, looking for the absolute first company who says yes, regardless of how well the fit actually is.
I remember I had one employee a while back. Based on his resume you would pretty much think the entire economy would collapse if he missed work one day. Employers verified dates and titles. He lasted a month before everyone got tired of his shit and we let him go.  Arrogant, condescending, and lazy. Bonus since he was still on probationary pay, he was also the lowest paid employee.
My employees know what I expect of them and they can tell their friends exactly what is expected
In addition to this, your employees know that if they refer a friend to you and their friend turns out to be lazy and incompetent, it's going to reflect poorly on them. So you likely only get the best applying through them, and if anything goes wrong, your employee is actively going to help you correct them.
At the end of the day, people trust other people more than they trust random pieces of paper. People also like to help each other.
Some people are born into areas where they will likely die from malnutrition or preventable diseases.
Why does fucking Gary always choose the starter that strong against mine?!!!
He's your rival mate. Just shoot the bastard, Oak will never know.
Why does fucking DICK always choose the starter that strong against mine?!!!
Ftfy
That people are burdened with depression, anxiety, and/or self-esteem issues.
I have these problems, and I just wonder why my mind can't be healthy. Why can't I function normally? I say it's unfair because I don't think I could have done too much to prevent them. Or anyone who suffers with this kind of stuff.
I sometimes cry myself to sleep knowing that other people can wake up and just be happy.
Which is why I cry watching Bojack horseman during scenes like from the episode "The Shot"
But this moment is bigger than that.
This is the moment that Secretariat stops running.
Because this is the moment you realize something inside you is broken, and it can never be fixed.
And this one from "Let's Find Out"
"All I ever wanted was to be your friend.
And you treat me like a big joke.
You think I don't notice? Why don't you like me?"
"Because I'm jealous... Of everything.
Everything comes so easy for you."
"Oh, and it doesn't for you? You're a millionaire movie star with a girlfriend who loves you, acting in your dream movie.
What more do you want? What else could the universe possibly owe you?"
"I want to feel good about myself.
The way you do.
And I don't know how.
I don't know if I can."
Why can't I function normally?
The worst is when you blame yourself for it. If only you had seen it coming earlier. If only you were stronger. If only. It's shitty, but it can be beaten.
College Tuition.. Anybody?
College Textbooks
Specifically where the online homework bullshit is the only reason you need to get the book
I bought a $200 book this semester that my professor said was required. Everything so far has been "supplemental" and not at all required, and the syllabus doesn't seem to indicate any required use for the textbook in the future. I'm so pissed.
EDIT: While I appreciate the advice, I've already graduated college. I know how books work, haha. I paid for the book because it would've been useful for my Masters program anyway.
Teachers often have to list textbooks on their syllabus', regardless of whether it is used or not.
First day of class one of my teachers told us "Unless you really want to read it, don't pick up the textbook, it won't be used in this class."
My advice is to sit through about a week or so of class before deciding if you need the book or not. It will save you ludicrous amounts of money.
Often professors will list a book as required so the bookstore will keep restocking it throughout the term. If it's optional they stop giving a shit about restock.
This is the explanation my profs gave me.
Good way to avoid situations like this ("required" textbooks actually being supplemental) is to look up used, cheap copies on the internet, and have that on standby. On the first day, read the syllabus to see if it's actually required or supplemental.
only get cheap, used books on required ones, save money yo
Even better, see if you can find a PDF somewhere online. I found a lot of online books, for free.
Also, get involved in extracurriculars; I went the Greek Life route which I know isn't for everyone, but it was great because we literally had our own library full of textbooks. Groups of us in the same majors would often sign up for the same classes, split the costs of materials we needed that the house didn't already have, and do all of the work together. You don't have to go Greek, but get involved in something.
I spent over $150 on just the shitty online homework. I should've just bought 3 AAA games...
some colleges rent out their books instead of forcing you to buy them. well, my college does, but i don't know if any other ones do. i think one of my books was ~$100 but i was able to rent it for $40
My school offers the chance to rent a physical textbook if you want one in addition to the online code you still have to buy.
This was my first thought! My brother and sister are in massive amounts of debt from college, my brother got his associates through community college and wanted to head to a university to further his education, he just couldn't get the money together without putting himself in further debt with loans.
I really want to get back to school myself and my only means are loans and putting myself further in to debt.
It's ridiculous.
Edit: And to further rant. It just blows my mind, I want to be more educated in my field, I want to be an educated member of society and be beneficial but it's so daunting. I'll be paying it off for years upon years.
My college couldn't raise tuition this year. So they charged everyone a $25 parking pass that expires after a semester. You get a $25 fee if you park without one as well.
EDIT: Found out today that I have it extremely good for having to pay such small fee. There for I'm grateful :D
Jesus, the passes at my school range from around $200-$500. The $500 ones are the only truly useful ones, naturally. They're annual permits rather than semester-long ones (I've never checked since it's still too expensive), I think, but even so.
$700/year. :( it hurts
You have it easy, parking passes at my school are like $125 for just a semester, and a $50 ticket for a first offense parking without one (the fine goes up with each offense). And of course there is not sufficient parking.
HA! $125 I fucking wish. Mines $500...
$714
Krusty Krab is unfair!
Mr Krabs is in there!
Standing at the concession!
Plotting his oppressions!
Wow! A fun fair? where??
At the Krusty Krab!
Krusty Krab fun fair?!
Life
Death on the other hand isn't unfair, He doesn't discriminate
THERE IS NO FAIR. THERE IS NO JUSTICE. THERE IS ONLY ME.
Depends on how you look at things.
Does death come to you, or does life lead you to death?
If it's the former, death can be unfair. If it's the latter, it's an unfair life that leads you to a seemingly unfair death.
If death is the one coming to me, he should try walking a bit faster.
A game we're all forced to play.
Just pick police officer and get paid whenever someone spins a ten
The number of people who don't have access to clean water
The fact that my brother was born with severe cerebral palsy and everyone in my family now thinks it's my responsibility as a younger brother to be his full time carer with my mum. The rest of my family has had a chance to live their own lives but simply because of when and where I was born I don't get that opportunity. I love my brother but I need my own life DAMN IT!
In Canada at least, I have to pay $110/month for secondary driver insurance,  my sister only pays $20 for hers. Same cars, same policy, same licencing. I understand statistically that young male drivers are more 'destructive'- but not to validate this gap between us
When people judge you for things that you have absolutely no control over. This could range from skin color, ethnicity, family wealth, looks, etc.
Penis size
Whenever I drop toast or pizza, it always lands face down. Every. Single. Time.
Simple: Eat it upside-down. If you drop it, it'll land right-side-up.
I need a team of scientists to run tests on this.
Pigeon spikes for homeless people.
They're even sad just for pigeons.
Yes. This is called "hostile architecture".
Examples include ...slanting windowsills to stop people sitting, benches with armrests that make it impossible to lie down, or sprinklers that intermittently come on but aren't really watering anything.
Or the dungeons of the Eyrie, slanted towards the open sky
In Bird Culture this is seen as a dick move.
Those are a thing? What the fuck
How money influences politics more than actual people.
Cancer.
Cancer sucks.
That people born poor who spend their lives doing everything right still end up less well off than people born rich who do everything wrong.
My bank has a newish policy where if my balance drops below 2,500 they charge me. I have to pay for something medical this month to the tune of 1000, so now I'm going to have to pay that bank charge too. I'm doing my best to live off my wages and save but the bank is literally charging me for being poor and it's fucking bent.
...I would find another bank if I were you.
What the what? This happens/is legal/what?
Carrying a baby to term, 9 months of hoping and dreaming, imagining their face and smile, getting their bedroom ready and washing their tiny clothes, and then one day your doctor looks up at you from the machine and tells you there is no heartbeat.
And then you have to give birth.
Like, why won't Bill Gates just give me 1m? SO unfair.
he'll give you 1 metre all right ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
A little known fact about Bill Gates is that most of his charities are actually elaborate covers for his experimental dick elongating research.
This might not be the kind of thing everyone else is posting, but this is one thing that I take to heart.
I think people with disabilities are getting financially held back. Meaning some people can't get Disability. They get denied.
Okay that sounds weird. I'll just go a tiny bit in my problem. I sustained a Traumatic Brain Injury 2 years ago. My family and I are paying out of pocket for a lot of my treatments, from rehab to specialized doctors. I go to rehab 5 days a week. Each therapist costs around $100 each. I go to PT/OT/ST. You guys can do the math from there.
Adults only have the option to apply for SSDI (or something) or the TBI Fund in their state. I got denied from both. Disability told me to go to the VA and TBI Fund denied me because of the kind of injury I have... it wasn't the 'preferred' injury.
Kids on the other hand are able to get help from all the different non profit organizations. They get all the attention. It goes along with any sort of illness or disability. There is probably shit for obese kids! Kids and their family get all the help, but once you turn 18 then you're shit outta luck.
tl;dr: Kids get more help than adults.
My mom was denied a few times before she got a lawyer to fight for it.  She has a broken back at T7 and an incomplete spinal cord injury.  But, she could still walk (for a few feet) at the time, so no one wanted to approve her.  Don't be afraid to contest that shit.
All my friends have rich parents. They have their lives sorted and have done since a young age. I don't have family, I've worked Shit minimum wage jobs since I was 16, this week I've only eaten bits of food people have left at work.
One of my friends just got bought a second house to rent out by his dad.
I appreciate they all worked hard to get where they are as individuals.
But it's fucking sickening when I can go days without eating.
At least they're not rich at your expense. I hope things turn around.
The fact that everyone constantly reminds me how short I am (im male), but the smallest comment i made about a fat female friend, im a inconsiderate asshole
I hear a lot of girls say "ohhh I can't date a short guy! I would feel like a man!", which makes no sense, and as a pretty tall girl, I kind of take offense to it.
I saw a couple walking near my work the other day though, the lady was about 6'1 at least, and the guy was maybe 5'5 ish, and the dude looked so fucking happy and comfortable, it was awesome and I feel like it made him really sexy
He's so happy because he's at perfect motor boating height
I've heard girls say they absolutely hate short guys, like it's somehow their fault.
They hate short guys or aren't attracted to short guys? There's a big difference
There's a difference, sure, but there's still no need to point out how unattractive you find short guys if you're stood next to one. Flip the scenario. A guy is stood next to a flat chested woman talking about how he only finds women with huge boobs attractive. Everyone thinks he's an asshole, righly so. Yet I've heard plenty of women say openly that they would never date a guy below a certain height.
There's nothing wrong with having a preference, but there's no need to say those kind of things that only make people feel bad about themselves.
I recall being in a school cafeteria and hearing a group of girls talking about how they would never date anyone under 5'8. Like they just sounded so proud about it, I mean having standards isn't bad but it just hurts yknow
You can do everything right health-wise and still end up getting a disease / illness.
It's not fair that people get Crohn's. It's bullshit, and I'm probably always going to be bitter/angry about it, but hopefully not as often as I do now.
Women that would be a very caring excellent mothers that desperately want children, but unable to.  And, you see drug addicted mothers that neglect their children with the necessity of food, clothing, shelter and love are very fertile that pump out a children each year.
Child custody laws in the U.S. are extremely biased against fathers
Forget custody for a minute. What really bothers me is child support.
Yes, most children born out of wedlock, or products of divorce, live with mom primarily. And yes, if dad only has kids part of the time and makes a little more income, he should pay something in child support. But the law does not require child support recipients to verify where the money is spent. The law doesn't care if dad is making less than mom, has 40/60 - he's still paying CS. The law also does not care about father's debts or other living expenses. I support the fact that children probably need one permanent or primary living arrangement, which would necessarily be against one party in the custody sense, but I do not support the inequity of child support laws.
I'm a female also
Playing as the Rebels on Hoth
I'm gluten and lactose intolerant. I fucking love ice cream and baked goods. Why do you do this to me, body?!
Me having a nice decent life while my close friends  have to suffer through abuse and extreme anxiety and depression. I am able to deal with sadness by enjoying the small things while they just can't. One can't even sleep because of her nightmares and is in a position where she can't report what's happening. The other just has extreme anxiety attacks and has too much stuff in her head.
Why do I have such a decent life environmentally and mentally but they can't? I certainly don't deserve this spot.
Everyone deserves that spot, you included. But you've just pointed out the sad facts, life is unfair and shit for some people.
Fortunately, sometimes you can rely on the milk of human kindness to help make it a little easier when you're in a shit situation. The more people make an effort to do that the fairer life becomes, pick people up when they fall and help them to the finish line.
Permanent aristocratic class.   The fact that somebody can be born into wealth and titles that automatically makes them better than you sucks.
I read "born into wealth and titties"... doesn't change a thing.
You know what sucks worse? Being born into poverty.
I can't get decent pain meds because of the shitty drug laws in my country.
The other side of the pillow is always cool, but that's not the side you are sleeping on.
That people use the saying "Life is unfair" as some kind of defense (or as a reason to straight up lie).
If humans would be more fair to other humans I think we would find "life" is a lot less unfair then we are taught to believe.
I have the fearlessness to take all kinds of social risks that get me great opportunities and experiences and some others don't get anything in that category.
Bad raffle drawings.
The kind where the winning ticket numbers are all close to each other because the drawer didn't mix up the ticket tub.
I hate those! This one in particular makes me furious.
Not sure what I was expecting when I clicked that...
People that win the gene pool. I envy people that are good looking and confident at the same time.
That I've been blamed for my own rape and/or accused of lying about it and that happens to people all the time. WTF.  Everyone thinks "Well if this happened at myschool I wouldn't be like those fucktards at steubanville and stand up for the rapists".  Yes you probably would, because no one wants to believe a guy, especially a friend, would do something like that.   It is a lot easier for everyone to think "One of my friends is a liar/attention seeker/etc"  than "Who one of my friends raped someone"
Edit:I had such low self-esteem that I never confronted any of my friends about the fact that they knew what happened but were still hanging out with the guy. Christ, I still hung out with him a few years later and acted like that was normal.  I  didn't press charges because I felt guilty about what might happen to him. I'm glad I didn't, because I don't think he's a bad person.  But the thought didn't even cross my mind.
EDIT:
upon reading comments, I think maybe I as little bit brainwashed- perhaps I was wrong about the whole nice guy part.  enough people tell you "he's too nice to have meant to do anything to hurt you on purpose" and you start to believe it.   That said I still forgive this person and have let go of the years of pain that followed.
I totally understand you. It sucks when you pretty much have to prove that it wasn't consensual bc you know, consent requires consciousness.
I'm so sorry for what you went through. It's disgusting the way we treat assault victims in our society; I hope you're feeling better now though.
People who comment on ask reddit posts but don't up vote them.
Agreed
I'll do my part by upvoting this post without comment.
you commented, now you gota upvote twice
Joke's on you: I didn't even upvote.
Mandatory Minimum sentencing for drug crimes. It ruins lives, destroys families, and is quite often a lose lose/lose for all of us.
Mayak.  Russia.
Mayak was the center of Soviet nuclear material production and the entire district, to this day, remains a "closed city".  You cannot even enter the city near the facility without a clearance.  It did not officially exist until recently.  For decades it was only known as a postal destination called "Chelyabinsk-40".
Mayak has seen every single kind of awful radiation accident short of zombies.  The towns and villages around it do not allow family members to see newborns until verified that they are not mutated.  Streams and rivers were mysteriously barb-wired.  The people really lived a sci-fi nightmare.
Mayak was a giant chemistry lab where plutonium (produced in reactors on site) was extracted and refined for use in weapons.  Every other type of radioactive materials research and processing was done there as well.  Plutonium and other radioactive metals were extracted and processed in solution with strong acids, principally nitric acid, and created all kinds of highly explosive, highly poisonous, highly radioactive, and highly exotic compounds and solutions.  The tanks and pipelines through the giant facility contain things that are mind-bogglingly dangerous....and often completely lost-track-of.
Mayak had several "criticality accidents" where plutonium and other sub-critical materials were put into conditions where a spontaneous chain reaction occurred.  Literally the touching off of a nuclear explosion in a beaker.  While very brief...(fractions of a second) enough radiation was produced to kill many scientists involved in days and even hours.
Mayak is the site of the most polluted place on planet earth.  Not Fukishima or even Chernobyl.  An entire lake (Karachay) was the open dumping ground for radioactive waste and gives anyone on its shore a lethal dose of radiation in an hour.
Mayak is a video game hell that actually exists.
From Wikipedia:
Major accidents at Mayak:
Mother of god. And now recognize the boost in the mid-90s and try to imagine how many incidents from before the fall of the USSR went unreported.
This is something out of fallout, jesus christ
The amount and severity of the mishaps makes it feel like it should be funny through how ridiculous it is (like many things in fallout)... but all of that actually happened, holy shit.
Or perhaps the damaged infrastructure and general economic downturn in post-Soviet Russia allowed Mayak to fall into disrepair.
the scariest one are the ones that just something like "explosion" and give no explanation
"Criticality accident"
"Just an accidental nuclear detonation. Nothing to see here."
Plutonium solution was poured into a cylindrical container with dangerous geometry. One person died, ...
Wow, .. pour a liquid into a tall thin cup, you live.  Pour into a short fat cup, you die.
This is legitimately the best reply because it gives an in-depth description and, presumably, actually exists.
The towns and villages around it do not allow family members to see newborns until verified that they are not mutated.
Now that's just ghastly.
Dutch, probably airbase Volkel is the closest to area 51 we have. It contains US nuclear weapons from the cold-war. We don't have a lot of secret places here.
Woah. This is what the Google earth view of it looks like.
That's what it actually looks like
My school had crazy paving as well. I'm glad to see it's catching on.
Such a fascinating place
This is true for all military installations in the Netherlands though, not just Volkel.
And a lot more. But there are also a lot of places that used to be censored but not anymore.
to be fair there is not much room for secret places
There is always room for secret places.
We still got some nice caves left, if i'm not mistaken there was a big nato base underground near a town in the south of the netherlands.
I always thought you hit water if you dig deeper than a meter anywhere in the Netherlands.
Duh it's where  they keep the mermaids.
That's because the entire country is secretly a gigantic ship.
Pine Gap in the middle of nowhere in Australia. Complete with UFO sightings and everything. It's a joint venture between Australia and USA.
I absolutely love that when someone asks about conspiracy areas outside of the United States, the top comment is a joint venture with the United States.
They do their top secret stuff well
In case anyone is interested: Pine Gap on Wikipedia - it's also one of the sites involved in the PRISM surveillance system according to the Snowden leaks.
And contributed to most if not all of US Drone strikes in the Middle East by providing targeting data.
Australia is scary sometimes... no wait always
DROP BEAR! LOOK OUT!
It's an NSA/ASD(former DSD) base, no big secret.
Dude, wtf!?! Shhhhhhhhhh!
All the people who work there claim to be gardners when asked about their job when they come into Alice Springs (the main town nearby).
Teotihuacan is the Mexican Area 51 in my opinion.
Archaeologists discovered JUST ten years ago a forgotten tomb in the heart of one of Teotihuacan's pyramids. They have slowly digged it out and so far have found dozens of relics and -wait for it- traces of liquid mercury. They haven't even reached the end of the tunnel but they think a king's tomb is at the bottom.
Teotihuacan wasn't built by the Aztec empire. They just discovered it and then inhabited it again.   They were so impressed by the buildings, they called it Teotihuacan which means "The City of Gods". We do not know its original name.
The Teotihuacan complex is massive, yet there are no historical records regarding the original city builders. What kind of culture builds something so big in the middle of nowhere and just leaves?
Unlike other civilizations, Teotihuacan did not spur other cultures. It just bloomed and then disappeared, leaving just a huge empty city behind.
Edit: A word.
Why is the mercury important?
Many ancient cultures ascribed mythical properties to mercury,  due to its appearance.   So whenever it shows up in ruins and such, and in significant quantities, its best to assume that the people thought it very important.  Or just neat, in the case of that chinese emperor with the mercury moat.
He also ate mercury daily for health benifits. Ended up killing him.
Funny how that works.
I'm sorry but this isn't 100% correct. You are correct in saying that archeologists don't know the name of the civilization that built the pyramids but they aren't clueless. Archeologists and linguists have deciphered the language of the inhabitants and have some knowledge of their culture, religion and way of life. Also, the city was never completely abandoned, that is just a common misconception. Many experts believe that the city has always been inhabited but the population has fluctuated drastically over the course of its history. At points there could have been over 100,000 people there and at other points there could have only been a few thousand. Some things that are not known about Teotihuacan are that they do not know the original name of the people or the city and they do not know the style of government that they used. There have been no "royal" style burials found so archeologists can only guess that they had Kings or Queens. Alot is still being discovered about Teotihuacan but there has been great advances over the last 20 years which have enlightened a lot of previous misconceptions.
Source: Anthropology student.
Nope, the language hasn't been deciphered yet (as of 2015). Though they have found traces of it, as in repetitive glyphs in some artifacts and buildings. However, they are missing a "Rosetta stone" object that can explain the language fully.
The same thing happened with the Mayan glyph system which was known but remained unexplained until Soviet linguist Yuri Knórozov successfully started decoding it in the 60s using a combination of  phonetics and graphic equivalencies.
A theory regarding the Teotihuacan writing system is that it was actually the original Aztec writing style. Being conquerors, the Aztec people kept records in several languages. Unfortunately the only ones that survived destruction were those made in Mixteco language.
Source: I discussed the issue with a friend that works in the Institute of Indigenous Languages of Mexico back in September because I also thought that it had been decoded :(
Thank you.  I was going to post along the lines of what you did although not as eloquently.  I traveled to Mexico in 2013 and saw the ruins first hand, and the tour guide explained all that to us.  Major sections were roped off as they were excavating and discovering new findings.  It was truly amazing to see in person just how beautiful the area is.
There is liquid mercury in the tomb with the clay soldiers in china
So are you saying it was the Chinese or the Mercurians?
Id say the chimaericans
Ironically, the emperor who had the tomb built for him (I think Qin dynasty, not entirely sure) drank Mercury because he called it the "elixir of life", thinking it would keep him alive forever. We all know how well that ended for him.
It was the founder of the Qin Dynasty. Qin Shi Huangdi
He's still alive, buried in his tomb and bored to the point of insanity?
Teotihuacan
Sometimes I wonder if History is indeed cyclical.
Advanced civilisation gets wiped off, starts again, gets wiped off, starts again, gets wiped off..
My god, the Reapers are real!!
We need Shepard!
We need the music video
e: you knew this was coming
"The cycle has repeated itself more times than you can fathom.  Organic civilizations rise...evolve...and at the apex of their glory...they are extinguished."
This should be higher.  The whole history of this place, or lack thereof, is crazy and fascinating.
I wrote a paper on it for my archaeology 101 class which I took as a fluff elective my senior year.
Basically my entire paper was, "The history of this place, or lack thereof, is crazy and fascinating." Got an A+
Finally, my time to shine! When my then girlfriend (now wife) was studying at the ENAH (National School of Anthropology and History) she was invited by one of her professors to visit a recently discovered tomb located in the middle portion of the moon pyramid (I think it was around 2005 or so). She managed to extend this invitation to me. The whole pyramid was off-limits to the general public, but we had truly unrestricted access; we entered through a narrow tunnel excavated in the floor of the middle platform. It was dark, hot, humid and cramped. After about 20 meters we reached a square, lamp-lit chamber whose floor was covered with various animal remains: coyotes, eagles, vultures, jaguars. The researchers had constructed a sturdy wooden grid that allowed them to traverse the chamber without touching the floor. I was introduced to an Asian gentleman that was the chief researcher, but I cannot recall his name. I spent about an hour there watching them work and trying not to get in the way of science. On the way out I accidentally managed to disconnect the hose that was pumping fresh air into the enclosure. I didn't get invited to many digs after that... -_-
(Edit...I asked my wife and the Asian researcher is Saburo Sugiyama).
Si serás pendejo, mijo.
Any good new videos on this? Documentary maybe?
There is a BBC doc in YouTube but it's a mess.
I found one in Spanish that is amazing, but has no subtitles. Here's the link in case someone wants to subtitle it :).
Maybe they kept most of their records on a type of paper, and it's all since disintegrated.
American but born in Former Yugoslavia.
Yugoslav version of "Area 51" is codenamed Objekt 505. This was an underground airport that goes under Bosnian-Croatian border.
There have been some speculations/conspiracy theories that it had been the center of Yugoslav space program - and the place where components for NASA moon landing were built.
Take a look (for entertainment purposes) in this YouTube clip
I live in Bihac, a town located a few miles from that facility. It's heavily guarded although it's declared as abandoned. My buddy and I tried to go there once on bikes but we were stopped by MP before even reaching the outside airstrip. They say it's guarded because it's on the border between Croatia (now in the EU) and Bosnia but you never know.
Norfolk. No one's really sure what goes on there, but it's something shady.
Edit: To confirm, I mean Norfolk as in the region in the UK, not the city in the US.
The Norfolk Bakers' Association: In bread for five generations
Only 5!?
That's as far back as their written records go - before that they had an oral tradition.
Am from Norfolk. Can confirm. It's all a bit cloak and dagger...
Shh, sleep.
Being in the Navy, we all agree Norfolk is where you don't want to go. It's the Dark Spot that Simba is never to go to.
The Elephant Graveyard?
Where Sailors go to die.
Dependas lurk in the shadows....of that bar in VA Beach that's open late.
It's called Peabody's.
British Norfolk sounds similar, but with more inbreeding and Dunwich-y.
E: I mean British Norfolk
Interestingly, down the coast in the next county, there's an actual Dunwich. In the 14th century it was of similar size to London, but got hit by a series of storms that eroded away the town. It's just a small village now. Lots of legends about being able to hear church bells beneath the waves
I know 3 (fourth one is just about to leave for basic training) guys in the Navy who have horror stories about Norfolk. Suicides, helicopter crashes that could have been prevented; it sounds awful.
I shit you not, our LPO (leading petty officer) was telling us how when he was there, they issued a warning about going to the local mall alone. Because, get this, male sailors were getting gang raped at gunpoint. IN VIRGINIA. OUTSIDE A NAVAL BASE.
My classmates said that while they were in Norfolk they had to use the buddy system. The most bizarre shit happens near that base.
I know Brits love to shit talk Liverpool, but I've never heard anything before about Norwich/the Norfolk area. What's the deal with that?
Too few surnames. It's all a big joke, but religiously enforced,
When Norfolk tourist board says Norwich is really coming into its own, they're not joking
It's famous for incest, flat land and a town called Cromer
Look up the medical acronym NFN...
People in the NHS got in trouble a few years back for putting NFN in official medical notes, meaning "normal for Norfolk". Norfolk is the UKs answer to the Deep South.
Normal for Norfolk. You'll understand when you see them
Is Norfolk a really boring place? The only reason I ask is because on the game Theme Park World, the helper dude would criticise your park if it was lacking attractions by saying in his Scottish accent, "It's like Norfolk, with a gate".
Also as a result of that, I always read 'Norfolk' in a Scottish accent to this day.
We don't smoke! We don't drink! Norfolk! Norfolk!
I live in Norfolk :)
Give me 6!
I live in Norwich, can confirm the only thing we have is a man who waves a puppet around outside Primark
I hear here in canada that somewhere in Ontario we have a locked down building that canada uses to store biochemical weapons from before the Geneva convention, because we haven't been able to destroy it... My ex-military father told me this, but I don't know if it's real....like Area 51 used to be; a myth
This is how you get on a list.
Actually mentioning the Maple syrup storage tanks will get you on a list... .which he did not do.
Carry on...
New Zealand: Waihopai Station. A signals intel facility. Looks like a big pair of bollocks.
Some protestors deflated one of the bollocks once and got in trouble for it.
Sorry this is a shit story. But that's NZ for ya.
Those are probably super expensive radar bollocks.
Waihopai Station is a joint Intelligence gathering location with the US/UK/Australia/Canada and NZ as part of ECHELON.
Wiki link for those interested: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Waihopai_Station
There's some conspiracy about places hidden in North Head, Auckland too
Korvatunturi. It's a place in northern Finland, where small red beings (sometimes referred to as dwarves in local mythology) have been spotted. People also often claim seeing a craft (often called a 'reki' in Finnish) flying in the night sky. You can also hear strange things there if you visit during the wintertime.
I visited the place nearly two years ago, and I shit you not I heard someone laughing "hoh hoh hoh" in the shadows when I was taking a leak in the woods. Place is creepy as fuck
I can confirm this. Next to Korvatuuntturi there is a place called Tori that's also mentioned in a lot of local tales. They say the place is haunted. You can often see Finnish people yelling "Torilla tavataan" which is basically the local version of "See you in hell." Strangest thing I've personally ever seen in Tori was these weird colored explosions in the sky. I was sure my life was over, but luckily it stopped after a few minutes.
New Brunswick
Am from Nova Scotia, can confirm. We don't actually drive through New Brunswick to get to the rest of Canada. Instead, we are stopped at the border between provinces, and are flown across by Canadian geese.
Next time I see geese holding up traffic, I'll know they're actually Canadian policemen.
It's a new RCMP policy. You have to actually be a goose to get hired. They are particularly effective in swarms.
they are particular effective in gaggles
Or skeins if they are in the air.
How many Canadian geese does it take to transport you? Also, how much do you tip afterwards?
African or European?
Wait..
Laden or unladen?
Well, they're carrying people. So laden.
I love how later in the movie you see someone attaching a coconut to a swallow trying to get it to fly.
It's Sir Bedevere
I've bin laden.  I'd like to be unladen.
Depends on how many moose you're traveling with.
Meese*
Sorry.
no I'm sorry
I'm sorry that you're sorry.
Canadian geese only operate return flights to Baffin Island. $20 per person. Children U12 go free.
We tip in beer.
I know where I'm moving
To be a goose
Are you suggesting canadians migrate?
clearly not canadian. a canadian knows they are called "canada geese" not "canadian geese"
Canadians just call them "geese".
Source: am Canadian.
Wrong. I'm Canadian. I call them "little feathered green-shitting bastards"
Thought this meant New Brunswick, NJ at first. It still applies.
Yeah, I live by New Brunswick and was confused about this answer.
To be fair, if he was talking about New Jersey, wouldn't your countries area 51 be area 51?
New Jersey is honorary Area 51.
i went camping in New Brunswick with my family once and my cousin got herpes
Must be a close family...
Am from Fredericton NB can confirm, everyone is leaving here to go to Alberta.
Didn't they set up a direct flight from somewhere NB to Fort McMurray?
No wonder everyone I meet here now is from New Brunswick. It was bad enough dealing with the newfies.
Please don't hurt me, I am from/in Fort Mac.
How dare you! The Newfie is a proud noble creature!
United Kingdom - Ours is probably Rendlesham Forest next to an old US army base, which I think back in the 80s was a hotbed for alleged UFO sightings and encounters. I can't remember all the details, but I'm sure you've all mastered Google.
There was only one event, but it's one of the most studied ufo sightings in history.
House of Parliament. It's got paedophiles and pig fucking going all up over there.
*Respectful inter-species facefuck
I'm Brazillian, its not an military base, but there's a city called Varginha which is know for its UFOs. Its very common to hear about Varginha's E.T. here. Ayy lmao
It's just impossible to not think of "vagina" when you read the name of the city.
Frankly though, a lot of the stories the inhabitants tell all sound like bullshit.
But hey, it's the only reason you'd want to visit that town anyway, so at least they're getting some money back after building all those alien and flying saucer statues.
Bielefeld.
Area 51 exists, it is  the contents that are speculated about. Even I, an American, know there is no such thing as Bielefield.
Aber es existiert nicht!
das weißt du nicht....
Er arbeitet für S.I.E.!
I know quite a few people who claim to be from Bielefeld.
I've been to a place that claims to be Bielefeld.
Multiple times, actually.
They had some good pubs there, good beer, good pizza. But they're probably just as fake.
Where? Never heard of such a place. Quite preposterous to even suggest it, I say!
Ah, Germany's Idaho.
Yeah but Bielefeld exists. You can't compare something real to an imaginary place like Idaho.
I live in Idaho, but not the one everyone knows. It's my own private Idaho.
So its Yourdaho?
*Alien kramer slides through the spaceship door.
But I life there :O
How can you life in imaginary city?
How Can Your Life Be Real If Bielefeld Isn't Real?
No you don't. You are lying. You must be lying.
He's one of them
Porton Down.
Secret military research base in UK, depicted in Sherlock for anyone wondering. Human testing has occurred there resulting in at least one death, and it is the oldest chemical weapons research lab in the world. The usual alien rumours  too.
'The figures released in 2005 reveal that one cow was used in a secret experiment in 2004.'
Just the one cow?
To be fair, it was a very large and belligerent cow.
I guess the scientist really didn't like his wife.
Met someone at a conference who worked there. He worked in Public Health, but apparently there are sections that are all very much off-limits and very secret.
ITT: jokes about shitty places, and names with no explanation.
I'm starting to wish all threads were serious by default. Reddit's jokes suck.
Yeah this needed a serious tag I'm actually interested
Yeah, this thread is about 90% garbage.
And the ones that do say ufos are just U.S. military bases around the globe. Lol.
Stonehenge I mean lots of people think weird shit happens there
Who? Enlighten or link please? Drunk druids on the solstice do not count.
Many books have been written "proving" that they were involved with aliens in the same way the pyramids of Egypt supposedly were. Mainly because the stone which was used to build it came from hundreds of miles away from Wales to Salisbury. But recently there was a guy who did a lot of research and proved how ancient people could have moved such large stones.
Well the Pandorica is underneath it. And the Doctor gave his battle speech on top of one of the stones.
Source: Doctor Who...  It's true, right?....RIGHT?
Where the demons dwell, where the banshees live and they do live well.
A giant granite birthday cake? Or a prison far too easy to escape?
We call them the colonies.  You may know them as Australia and the USA.  Strange things happen in both.  One seems hell bent on murdering anybody in education and the other seems to enjoy breeding ever more dangerous creatures.
Can confirm, am Australian scientist. Have just created a snake spider.
Snake spider v. Cat Snake
v.
Not only are they venomous, they're apparently litigious too!
Just wait until they turn on us. The people of Australia v. animal uprising
You already lost that one, mate.  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Emu_War
Well cat snake would easily win. To be honest I just ripped all the legs off a spider. I don't think it actually survived the procedure but I'm too scared to touch it and see.
Soooo you invented a snake? And you gave it the perfect excuse to collect welfare? You're the maddest scientist ever.
God damn it, the Big MT is leaking again.
Everyone knows about them, the real colonies where stuff gets done are the Pitcairn Islands and those terrifying Antarctic islands off the Falklands.
It looks like the eerie town the protagonists enter at the start of a horror movie.
I don't want to sound stupid, but what is Area 51?
Area 51 is a US military base in Nevada. It is most likely used to test experimental aircraft. Its notoriety comes from the fact that up until 2013 the government had never even acknowledged that it actually existed. It is also rumored to be the site of experiments on the remains and wreckage from an alien space craft that crashed near Roswell, New Mexico in 1947.
Not "most likely," but rather it is confirmed that several top-secret aircraft were developed at Area 51, including the SR-71 Blackbird and all of the earliest stealth fighters and bombers.
Ah I see. Still waiting on confirmation of aliens though I assume
damn it, people! It's a secret base! What's the use of having a secret base if you're just going to tell them about it when they ask?
Ahem.
Mr. /u/idonnotknow Area 51 is... a nightclub downtown. Overpriced drinks, poor quality sound system, and absolutely no alien technology. Not worth visiting. Have you been to the model village or the town square? Much more entertaining.
Ever see Independence Day? It's a secret air base in the Nevada desert where they test black aircraft. It's top secret. The government refused to even admit it existed until like 2010. If you go anywhere within a mile of it you'll be searched and escorted away. Lots of conspiracies surround it like if there are alien spacecraft being kept there and shit like that. Usually involves aliens. It's because they were SO secretive of it. Even more so than DARPA, which is our experimental military research division. So people's imaginations run wild.
The reason why it's been so secretive for decades is because that's where they were developing stealth aircraft. People thought the stealth bombers and drones of today were UFOs. Thinking it's aliens is actually better.
Technically to them, it was an unidentified flying object then.
If you go anywhere within a mile of it you'll be searched and escorted away.
It's two entrances and restricted areas are clearly marked and are a good few miles away from the base itself.  If you go past those, you get quickly surrounded by lots of men with big guns before you even get near it and you go directly to jail and in lots of trouble.  But if you stay on the outside, you're on public land and their security teams can't do anything but stare back at you.  There are tours from Las Vegas that regularly go out there.
You can even climb Tikaboo Peak and see the base with a good scope, from a distance of about 26 miles.  Two closer vantage points were closed to the public in 1995.
The whole Edward's/China Lake ect restricted airspace region totals about 50,000 Km2
the bases themselves are smaller, maybe 8000 or so km2
Another large test region is White Sands, about 8300 km2
From UK - Liverpool is our Area 51
You misspelled shithole
More like Skegness, Lots of weird activities go on there. There has been loads of C.H.A.V Sightings
There's so many worse places in the UK than Liverpool.
Like Blackpool
I get it was probably shit in the 80s but Liverpool is actually quite a nice city.
Disclaimer: I'm from Kent so I'm not a disgruntled Scouser.
The most consistent part of all my failures is me
This is strangely motivating
At least it's something you can control.
The greatest common factor.
Even as a failure, you're still great.
My failures are my only accomplishments.
"It's just, when you aren't around, I never think about you." - a guy I liked when I told him I wanted more. Still breaks my heart.
Was the guy... a cat?
I just went through the same thing, but from my (now ex) girlfriend of all almost three years. There suddenly was no love for me anymore
Omg I'm so sorry, that's just cruel. But at the same time it's so harsh I'm gonna keep it in the back of my head in the list of incredible insults in case I need it.
That's not cruel. He was honest and succinct, no beating around the bush.
It's so easy in these situations to tip toe around the problems and cause even more hurt. Straight up telling someone is gonna sting a bit but at least you know where you stand.
However, there is something to be said for being tactful while being honest.
And how would you convey the same thing while being tactful?
"I'm sorry, I just don't feel the same way."
Last part was exactly what I was planning on doing too 😂
😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂 😂
wait, was it necessary?
That is sad but I don't feel like it's cruel or anything.
I threw away an opportunity because I was scared, now I’m scared I will never have an opportunity.
Damn.
Welcome to the club...
It's a terrible day for rain.
But it's not raining, Mustang...
No.
It's raining...
Oh. So it is.
Honestly, so many episodes of Full Metal Alchemist made me sad.
'Damaging yourself for someone who is already damaged'
I did this to myself.
I'm sorry, we cannot use your organs to save your kid because you have aids.
If the parent was compatible, and the child was literally at deaths door it would make sense to risk HIV infection in order to prolong life. If the parent had AIDS, not just HIV, then the op might be too risky for them so that could get in the way.
I don't think that's how it works.
It does for cats made of cactus.
It actually does. (not kidding.)
The universe is probably littered with the one-planet graves of cultures which made the sensible economic decision that there's no good reason to go into space - each discovered, studied, and remembered by the ones who made the irrational decision. - Randall Munroe
Thankfully there's every economic reason ever to go into space. I don't  remember the exact amount, but for every dollar spent on NASA you get several back.
Going to space makes total sense!
Could be an entertainment extinction. In the long-run there is a race between perfecting entertainment and breaking the speed of light. If we can create a perfect simulater to let you follow your life's ambitions, and we can't break out of our little space bubble it can be a fairly logical conclusion.
High level of automation would allow a couple million people provide all the energy and food for billions to stay within entertainment supercenters (stereotypically pyramids) for their natural life. A couple generations later all that is left of humanity are the pyramids.
What comic is that from?
893: 65 years
Once heard a little girl ask this question at a funeral: "Mommy, why are they putting daddy in the ground? He's just sleeping."
"it's a terrible day for rain..."
But he said he has lots of work to do!
What do you mean? It's not raining.
Yes it is...
My little cousin asked this at his grandfather's funeral: "Mommy, is grandpa going to come home with us?"
There was a day when your parents picked you up for the last time.
Holy crap... This actually has me tearing up.
agreed.  this one nailed me.  gonna go outside now.
:(
Maybe physically, but they will never stop picking you up emotionally when you need it.
At least most won't.
Smallest coffins weigh the heaviest.
No, they're light. You'll feel sick when you realize how light they are.
"Is he actually in here?"
Gives it a little shake.
Donk
thud
"...Yep."
muffled "ouch!"
Let me just open it up a little to take a peak!!!
Yep. That was what struck me when I was carrying my brother and he was 4 when he passed, so not a baby, but still so light.
Me and my dad carried him but either one of us could have done it by ourselves.
I could have probably David Beckham curled him in to the furnace tbh.
From the half way line....of the crematorium?
The worst part of my grandmother's funeral was watching the pallbearers (her sons) all lift an unexpectedly light coffin.
I just used a shoebox to bury three dead kittens. This was the first thought that crossed my mind - I got the shoebox for them to play with when they were older. Instead, I had to bury them in it in the garden out back.
Oh man that sucks, what happened if you don't mind me asking? I just lost my dog a few days ago
She would have been 4 today.
...If she wasn't born on a leap year
We need to talk...
It doesn't matter who this is coming from, it always gives me instant panic. My fiancee likes to fuck with me sometimes.
"Hey, we need to talk"
"Oh god, what is it?"
"I'm going out with the girls Friday night. Do you mind?"
"WHAT THE FUCK?!?! Of course I don't mind, but what the fuck?"
I always open up misleading sentences with "First off, I'm perfectly fine, but I was in a car accident today," or "Good news, we need to talk when I get home."
It says what i need to say, but conveys first and foremost not to panic.
Dave Chappelle has a good bit on this.  I'll see if I can find it.
Here it is.
I said this to my boyfriend once without thinking.  I was just going to talk to him about something minor (our vacation plans needed to be finalized).  He had an immediate look of sadness and panic, and that's when I realized my mistake.  I felt so bad :(
My blood runs cold when I hear this.
you haven't paid your taxes
... about our vacation we're taking next month. I started making some plans while you were at work.
"It might've been"
Of all the words of mice and men, the saddest are, "what might have been?"
- Kurt Vonnegut
http://www.bartleby.com/102/76.html
It is originally a quote from this poem for those unaware
I know you love me, just sign the papers.
In 100 or so years, all your friends and family will be dead, and in 200 years nobody will remember any of you for longer than it takes to fill in a family tree in a school project.
In 100 or so years, all your friends and family will be dead,
That directly contradicts this:
in 200 years nobody will remember any of you for longer than it takes to fill in a family tree in a school project.
emphasis mine
I think the first part pertains to currently living family and friends and not the later descendants.
There are two kinds of people in this world.  People who can extrapolate from incomplete data.
"I'm accepting the job and moving. I don't want you to come with me."
That one really stung when my ex said that to me. Still debating what to do with the money I saved for a ring.
Motorcycle
Thinking a solo trip to Costa Rica or an island for a week. More to the story but it's all still kind of fresh.
Nah, come to Canada. It's beautiful here.
Bro. Just get your bros. And fucking bro out bro. But seriously. Throw some into savings, and go fucking do something awesome with your friends/siblings. Instead of dwelling on the loss, because it is going to sting, rise above the pain and create some great memories.
Yeah I've been staying busy with the guys as much as I can. Still trying to figure out something awesome to do with the money. Thinking of taking a nice trip to an island for a week.
As part of the human condition you will always seek fulfillment that can never be satisfied.
"A thing is not beautiful because it lasts"
The cupcakes you baked last night, they have all been turned into poo
God damnit harry, i fucking warned you about waving that thing in my kitchen.
I'm not a wizard, I'm just Harry!
In context, I think this sentence is one of the saddest. The day Teddy Roosevelt's mother and wife died his journal contained only one sentence,
"The light has gone out of my life"
Whatever one thinks of him as president, he was the quintessential manly man...wrestled with Gifford Pinchot randomly, hunted animals, loved the outdoors, etc. but this journal entry shows behind that character was a loving son and husband.
Along the same lines:
"This creature softened my heart of stone. She died and with her
died my last warm feelings for humanity."
"I'm sorry to inform you that [person] died."
NO!  Not [person]!  Anyone but [person] please God, pleeeeeease!!
We would have come earlier, but [person ] wasn't dead then.
Looking up at me she wagged her tail and I said goodbye to my best friend forever.
Damnit, this is the only sentence that actually inspired some emotion from my end.
I'm choking back tears, damnit.
For sale: baby shoes, never worn.
~ Ernest Hemingway
You only buy used shoes for your baby?
I only buy used babies. New babies at retail price is way to high these days, it's ridiculous. I mean why pay for a new baby when I could get a much cheaper, barely used pair of babies? My only complaint is since most work has been outsourced to China these days most of them are pretty worn out from those 15 hour days making shoes. Im alittle leery about lead paint too...
My wife has a book called 101 Organic Baby Purees.  Whenever I see it I think, mmmm I love organic babies, and I've never tried them pureed.
Well I don't recommend Chinese babies. You'll be hungry again in a couple hours.
Think about it.
Ohhhhh.
That's true, there are many people living below the poverty line who can only afford used shoes.  That is sad.
I don't think you get it
why were they never used
Parents had already bought everything for the baby, but the baby died.
He's single?
Because they're on the shelf at Walmart?
Part of the cleverness of the story is how its wording forces a rich context. It can't just be at a store like walmart, because stores don't need to specify that their shoes are unworn or that they're for sale. The only time you'll find something advertised as for sale and never used is when an individual is trying to re-sell something, and that has implications for the context of the stories.
Also it couldn't be Walmart because Walmart was found on July 2 1962. Hemingway died July 2 1961.
Most likely the parents received too many shoes and clothes in the baby shower.
6 word stories
Maybe the baby had really big feet.
You know what they say, big feet, big dick.
Tripod baby.
To be fair you should let everyone know that that is a direct quote from Ernest Hemingway. Journalists challenged him to write a story in six words and he complied with such a moving narrative.
Fair point. I'd hate to take credit from Hemingway for a job well done.
I have like 6 pairs of shoes that my baby didn't wear.  Before they're walking, they don't really need them, so all of those newborn shoes just ended up in the attic.
Had to explain to my boyfriend when he found out that we were having a son. He bought him these tiny little work boots.. "Uh.. You know he is going to grow out of these before he walks right? He doesn't need a boot with a protective toe and thick heel."
"I'm very sorry but from what the results have shown, it looks like you have stage 4 cancer."
It's just.... You've got mustard on your....
...beat, hoe
"Sorry son, there's no bacon left"
Well, this made me tear up.
Lets start a just giving page, let this boy taste the dream !
Found the Canadian.
My father used to always say, "Son, never fry bacon naked. Never." It sounded funny but he was dead serious.
[deleted]
Do you use the internet?
Bacon's just a meme. I think it's a surviving artifact from the "lel sO rAnDoMzZzZ PANKAKEZ Kitteh!!!! XD" period of the internet.
"I'm sorry, there's no more tea"
Disclaimer: Only sad to British people.
And Unlce Iroh.
I know there's no use in crying over spilled tea... It's just SO SAD! :'(
I know one shouldn't cry over spilled tea... but it's just so sad!
found the brit
Q: What's a sign that your friendship has died?
A: When the only thing you have in common is the past.
:(
"A four foot box, a foot for every year." Seamus Heaney
This too shall pass.
Faithfully yours,
--Your Kidney Stone
I was thinking that a not so confident Gandalf would say that.
This can be saddening or uplifting depending on the context in which it's said.
Although I guess the idea that everything eventually ends could be considered sad, or at least melancholic.
It gives heart ache sometimes to think about how transient we all are.
"Please...wait here. I need to get the doctor"
I use to know to a Sono tech who used to scan pregnant women. Yeah...it's hard.
sometimes love isn't enough.
In this moment you are simultaneously older than you've ever been before, and younger than you ever will be again.
Time shouldn't be scary, it should motivate
Are you a philosophizer?
Veterinarian to pet-owner:
"I'm sorry, but there's nothing we can do:  Your pet needs to be put to sleep ..."
Hurts even more when they use the pet's name. It really adds weight to the devastation.
Seen Friday 12:38pm
Donald Trump, for President!
Donald Trump, president.
FTFY
I don't love you anymore, I am really not sure I ever did.
It's not you, it's me.
Every birthday is just a celebration of a head long race to death.
I have three.
Sorry, one twin died.
Your baby cousin died this morning. (5 months)
Your grandmother just passed.
The three saddest sentences in my life to date.
"The smallest coffins are the heaviest."
To add to this, my sister in- law after she lost her son " Sorry I'm late, I fell asleep in the cemetery".
My boss lost his toddler son 8 years ago. This week is the anniversary of his death.  Everyone knows to give him a wide berth during this week.  My boss always wears tailored suits to work but he just came in wearing jeans that were soaked through and muddy on the knees.  It has been raining here this week. I know he has been at his sons grave all morning. He hasn't said a word to anyone since he came in or left his office.  When i saw him walk in this morning I had to go to my office, shut the door and weep. Though he tries to put up a strong front the look on his face is pure pain.
Edit:  He just sent an email sending everyone home early.
My nephew passed in the month of august, he was due to turn 2 in September. Those two months out of the year are the fucking worst for us all. I'm glad your boss manages to function the rest of the year... my sister in-law and her SO are now chronic alcoholics, and she literally won't leave the house unless it's a medical emergency.
There isn't a day that goes by, where I don't wish I could reach back in time and abort you before it was too late - you ruined my sex organs, my marriage, and my career, and now you come back expecting, what, love?
This is like putting your hand over a fire and then being mad at the fire because you got burned. A person like that Ruins their own marriage and career/life; because they'll never take responsibility for their own actions.
They're sharing a drink they call loneliness, but it's better than drinking alone.
Nobody cares about us but ourselves.
Yes, we have no bananas.
"The puppies drowned too"
fuck you
Life without the possibility of parole
Your dad has cancer.
:-(
"Every time I try to pick it up - like falling sand - as fast as I pick it up, it runs away through my clutching hands."
I would leave you for the person you used to be.
Mummy. I want my mummy.
Breaks my heart to think this is the last words of some kid.
"Your dad won't be coming home".
"Congratulations on becoming a father, but your wife did not make it through the birth."
One day, your parents set you down and never picked you up again.
"I'm leaving you."
Nononono. "I'm sorry, I just don't love you any more."
I got both of those within a few minutes of each other. Followed by "I don't know why. It just doesn't feel the same".
Surrounded by people, but still alone.
Glad I finished my eulogy.
You are not allowed to have candy from this day on.
The Three Stooges are dead.
Mother and Father together holding an American flag
Do you know a place where I can get a cheap child-sized coffin?
It might have been.
"I just got into ITT Tech, yay!"
"It's been two years and I can't get over you. I fucking hate myself."
for sale: baby shoes, never worn.
-hemmingway
from Salvador Dali; He was very close to his mother, and when she passed (from breast cancer) he stated, "I could not resign myself to the loss of a being on whom I counted to make invisible the unavoidable blemishes of my soul."
Love is watching someone die.
A life sentence for non-violent crimes
After all this time?
Always.
We're out of beer
No ! Not the beer
"I love you too grandma, but I'm still turning the machine off"
Each day we die a little more -Strongsad
"It could have been."
Their concept of boundaries... you gotta respect the personal space
1.) Personal space
2.) Personal Space
3.) Stay outta that personal space
4.) Keep away from that personal space
5.) ???
6.) Personal space.
rips off skin
Forget about everybody else, forget about Jesus Christ, forget about Mohammed, forget about.......um.....all of those other religion things
This JAN-uary, get ready to Michael down your Vincents
Demons, suck his life out, I don't give a shit anymore
Follow me on my adventure through this office. All right, here we go. We're gonna just steal a couple of things.
Excuse me. Can I help you?
Starting with common office objects.
Hey, hey, hey! That's my stuff!
Such as staplers and pins and all sorts of things like... such as that.
Hey Listen. Is your mouth tiny and small?
Why dont you come to Lil'Bits, where the food is tiny. It looks like regular food, but really tiny. You put it in your mouth and eat it. Nothing gets stuck in your lips...
Oh shit we've got tiny people
Eat some fucking shit you stupid bitch!  Haha nah I'm just kidding.
I will never be able to hear the words 'personal space' again without thinking of that scene. Ahh... How will I be able to wait 1,5 years for the next episode?!
The little alien in the background made that scene much more hilarious.
If you didn't have the same reaction as that alien you were watching it wrong.
OOH WEEE
WHOA WHOA WHOA -- who's around me right now!? Who's around me?
Physical and mental. Creepy people don't just stand too close to you. They also share personal details about themselves that you don't want to know, and/or ask you about your own personal details.
To take an extreme example, all of the guys pestering girls on dating sites with random, unprompted questions like "Do you like to suck cock?" I mean, the answer is probably yes. And maybe after the the third date when you're getting flirty and freaky that's an appropriate question to ask. But you don't ask a random stranger something like that. Nor do you volunteer similar information like your dick size.
tl;dr Respect other people's boundaries and also maintain some of your own.
I have an example at this. I was swimming at the gym and was in a separate pool room with 9-10 guys. A man who walked in with me tried to chat and then we started swimming. When we both rested, he started telling me about his routine at the gym and a bunch of stuff about work. Then he asked me where I worked, if it was close by, if I came to the gym after work a lot, if I swam there a lot, what my name was. I responded generically (like "I work downtown") and finally said, "Look I prefer not talking right now. I'm the only girl in this room and that's making me cautious. It's nothing against you, I just don't want to talk about myself with a stranger." At that point he was like "Well, lots of girls come in here and they don't feel threatened and they're always really friendly. I don't know why you feel like you're in danger blah blah blah" and I was like "It doesn't matter what other women are like. This makes me uncomfortable and I'm not going to ignore it just because you think I'm rude."
I was actually really proud of myself for that. Because he could have just been an overly friendly guy but that doesn't matter. If someone says they're uncomfortable, a normal person would change their behavior- not try to convince you that your feelings are wrong.
Edit: forgot a word
Damn girl that was such an assertive reaction.  I love it! Not passive or aggressive.  So perfect and adult like.  I woulda panicked and stopped working out.
what boundaries? stares into your eyes and moves closer so our noses are almost touching
In novels, this is how you get the "kiss already" vibe going.
In real life, this is not the case.
It's how you get the "one restraining order, please" vibe going.
I can smell what you ate today
Flicks nose
Not knowing when you're causing somebody to feel uncomfortable.
Or even moreso, not caring when you're making someone uncomfortable.
An inability to perceive or respond to normal social cues is one thing... it can come off as creepy if the other person doesn't know why you're acting 'weird', but that kind of creepiness can sometimes be defused if you're able to get to know the awkwardperson in question and realise that they need to be told things more directly, rather than relying on the unspoken hints that everyone else picks up on effortlessly (assuming that is all it is; obviously it's not necessarily always that easy).
A wilful casual disregard for normal social cues, because you're too busy trying to advance the conversation towards the part where you make sexually explicit remarks, regardless of whether the other person is into it (or whatever other 'end game' they might have in mind)... that's a whole other level and there's no way around it being creepy.
or.. enjoying making someone uncomfortable.
Or knowing and not caring.
One ex explicitly said (while drunk and extra honest) that he didn't mind, or even enjoyed, arguing with me until he wore me down to consenting to sex and/or anal sex. I told another guy -- a cop -- that I was too tired for sex and he replied that he was getting a condom. I told him the next day that I didn't want to see him again because he was too sexually aggressive, and he spent the entire next day arguing with me about it. (I repeat: my FIRST REACTION to him asking me out again was literally, "I do not want to see you again." I left no room for interpretation.) He tried twice more and only stopped when I implied that I'd pursue legal action if he kept bothering me.
Both of them acted like "no" was a debate. I'm older and smarter now, but there is no excuse for their behavior. They knew what I wanted and didn't want.
It makes me sad how much I relate to this. I have definitely had people treat "no" like it was negotiable, which is just... bizarre. I feel like I have no defense against it because I never considered that no would be interpreted as anything other than a flat no. If I meant maybe, I would have said "maybe."
Consenting eventually is not the same as thing consenting enthusiastically upfront. I have heard guys use that excuse that sometimes women change their minds, but I don't believe that a anyone is genuinely confused by the difference between "I thought I just wanted to snuggle but I'm horny now" and "jesus, okay, if you just shut up."
What freaks me out is that if I was like "Hey, let's fuck" and the other party hesitated at all I would just be all "oh that's cool I'll be over here not touching you or being creepy." How does it feel okay to just berate someone?
Yeah, if someone is pressing too hard or lays the charm on too thick is creepy. If I feel oily or like I need a shower when talking to someone or being hit on that's an instinct I always listen to. The thing I've worried about is what if someone didn't trigger that feeling until being in a room alone with them. Most men would respect a girl saying no or her right to change  her mind, but what if one didn't?
So many guys think that the word "no" translates as "convince me."
And not caring when you're informed of that.
If your response to "hey, that's making me uncomfortable" is to apologize and stop, you're golden.
If your response includes denial, guilt-tripping, deflection, name-calling, threats, shifting the blame, or anything like that, you're creepy.
I think it's an inability to perceive and adapt to cues from another person's speech or body language which results in behavior that seems or is invasive or threatening. I think the key factor is the behavior being abnormal given the reaction of the other person - it's all about context.
I would say it's this, coupled with the inability to take no for an answer.
Wouldn't that fall under "inability to perceive and adapt to cues from another person's speech or body language?"
I think the speech part, if it should be included at all, has to do with implications, not explicit statements. Someone can be benign, but still creepy because they are unaware of all the above cues. Being unaware of other people's feelings can be confused for disregarding them. That's just a misunderstanding. When someone clearly states their feelings and they are disregarded, that's beyond someone just being creepy. That verifies, where creepiness just causes suspicion.
As someone with Asperger's reading this thread, I feel like this explains a lot.
I know dude. Girls call me creepy all the time when I'm not even being remotely invasive or sexual. It took me a long time to realize that "you're being creepy" sometimes just means "you're Aspergers as fuck."
Its the one thing about being Aspergers that i really hate. I don't mean to do these things, it just happends. Everyday normal social cues and body language even tone of voice don't click with me, and not just with other people  but with myself as well.
He stated his feelings.
I kindly declined.
'What is it?' he argued -
'I'm nice,' he opined.
'I'm friendly. I'm funny.
I'm caring. I share.
I'm loyal and thoughtful,
And this isn't fair.'
I nodded politely,
And looked for an out.
'So why don't you like me?'
He said with a pout.
'You owe me an answer -
A text or a call -
You ought to be grateful
I asked you at all.'
'You won't get another -
Don't throw this away.'
He smiled at me, selfless:
'So what do you say?'
I pondered a moment
And thought with a sigh -
Then changed up my answer
To 'fuck off and die.'
"I don't get why she friendzoned me, what a bitch" - every creepy guy I've come across. Generally accompanied by complaining that girls don't put out. Unwanted Persistence = Creepy. Who knew?
Unfortunately the persistence thing is really played up in the entertainment industry, like if your affection isn't returned just keep trying and she'll come around.  It is a terrible lesson, and looking back on my late teen years I'm a bit embarrassed.  That being said, if you're an adult and you haven't learned about reality yet, yeah you're going to be a creep.
also, I feel like persistence was romanticized by earlier generations. I'm sure we've all heard this before: "he asked me out, I said no, but he was persistent and now we've been married 50 years!"
To be fair, I feel like back then girls said no to boys, even if they actually liked them, because to say "yes" was seen as slutty or easy. Then if a boy pursued more, it meant he was serious (preferably about getting married) and then it was acceptable to go out with him.
This. My grandma used to talk about this when she was telling stories of how she met my grandpa. She'd always say that she thought he was very handsome and was thrilled he was trying to court her, but it was expected that she remain aloof and turn him down at least twice, or she'd be known as easy and desperate.
I don't understand why being friendzoned is a problem. I am fairly quiet, and I know that puts women off, but once they get to know me they want to be friends. I like friends. A girlfriend would be nice, but i will settle for a new friend. Friends are awesome!
It's not a problem as long as you're not pining after her for years once you become friends after she tells you she's not interested. Like you said you just gained a new friend, which is awesome, and you're both moving on with your lives. Hopefully.
Friendzone usually implies that the guy is friends with her and still wants to be with her and remains friends with her in the hope that one day she will want him.
Ah yes, I've sadly had some of those over the past few years. It's sad because you think they're genuinely your friend, when really they just want to get into your pants :c
I read a comment a few days ago that summed it up great:
"There is no "friend zone" if you only want to be friends with someone because you expect something you are not a friend, just a shitty manipulator." -Keep-reefer-illegal
Also I automatically read it in Rick's voice from Rick & Morty.
Some men do not have female friends and won't talk to women who they arent romantically interested in. They tend to be pretty lame dudes.
"she friendzoned me, what a bitch," he opined.
"She was the daughter of an Irish evergreen tree," Tom opined.
Not many Tom Swift jokes on reddit, that one was a groaner.
They all are, and that's why we love them
He turns around, goes home, breaks his phone open, swallows the battery, and jumps teeth-first off the roof.
teeth-first
lol, never heard that term before.
I caught it live! Finally!
/r/niceguys will LOVE this!
As a former hopeless romantic during my single life, I was dumb enough to take cues from movies/the girls who love those movies where the main guy wouldn't take no for an answer, and eventually wins the girl over.
Seriously, romantic comedies are such bullshit, and the people who make them should be locked in port-a-potties and rolled down a hill.
EDIT: Google(skynet) lied to me on how to spell words.
porter potties?
port-a-potties.
I feel you guy, I cringe a bit when I think of my teenage years, thanks hollywood!
I can't read people's body language, so I don't take risks for fear of being creepy.
I think the key difference is that genuinely creepy people will claim they can't read people's body language (or other social cues), and then use it as an excuse to keep pushing boundaries.  They'll keep pushing even after they've been told that what they're doing isn't okay.
I'm pretty sure if you made a blunder and were told about it, you'd feel embarrassed and would make a mental note to avoid doing the same thing in the future.  Creeps don't give a shit.  They'll do it again and again and just claim that they're socially awkward or that they're no good at reading people.
Yeah, exactly. I actually had to tell a creepy friend that I couldn't continue the friendship anymore specifically because he was constantly pushing the boundaries (that I constantly put in place!) to see how far he could go.
That's what creepy is. It's giving just enough respect to someone's autonomy that you stop when they explicitly tell you to (and sometimes not even that) but not enough that you actually back off.
If a guy looks like he's smuggling a banana slug near his waistline, he's interested. If a girl spreads her legs in front of you and is wearing a skirt with no underwear, same. Otherwise... no idea
If a girl spreads her legs in front of you and is wearing a skirt with no underwear, same.
But maybe she's just being friendly.
Almost definitely, I would hate to make things awkward by misunderstanding
I read that as wristline, I was so confused for like 30 seconds there; I was trying to imagine what it's like to smuggle a banana slug in my sleeve.
Sticky.
Very sticky.
I had a girl come up to where I was sitting. I had met her that morning and already found her ... weird. She then proceed to announce to me in a super bubbly voice, "My step-dad raped me when I was little!"
SHE WAS SMILING. I felt so incredibly uncomfortable. I meant, that is a terrible thing! It just weirded me out that she told me!
Shen then started following me everywhere. She'd lean over my shoulder while I was on my laptop and ask, "Whatcha doin'?" I went down to the basement in my dorm to do laundry and she was sitting there. She said, "I knew you'd come down here."
So, I guess what I'm trying to say is that people who follow me around and tell me waaaay too much information early on creeps me out. She clearly had untreated mental conditions with how she acted around people and I had no idea how to handle her most of the time.
Edit: Since some of you are weird, weird people... NO, I did not find her attractive, and unfortunately for her, no one else I knew found her attractive either. I am female, I am not a lesbian, I had zero interest.
Oh god, I once had a guy who was into me tell me what bridge he was planning to jump off when he used to be suicidal. Worst attempt at a guilt trip I've ever seen. @_@
On one hand, it's someone trying to reach out. On the other hand, strangers usually do not know how to react to something like this!
I think those mental conditions could've possibly been a result of being raped by her stepdad.
Probably. :\ Very sad.
Shen then started following me everywhere.
Fucking peel for this guy, please.
Stickier than Ashe...
I think it's being too into someone way to soon. If we just met don't message me 5 times in a row unanswered. I'm probably in class or something.
When you start messaging someone and then fall asleep, only to awaken to hilarious texts and relief that you spotted crazy without even trying.
I twice woke up to over 50 text. the first time it was just a drunk chick that I was dating and she just sent me questions about my life. It was kinda sweet in a very creepy way
Who was it the second time?
Some bitch named zoe. she got pissed at me so she put me on blast while I slept
That's such a Zelda thing to say.
Fuckin' Zoe man.
Did this once with a guy from Virginia, I'm from Colorado and got his number while he was there. Anyway he started saying he likes to travel a lot and would like to see me more; fine, whatever, I can play along. While we are talking I go to dinner with my roommate and come back to 6 texts starting from a normal response to 'where'd you go?' with the last two being "Fuck you" and finally "????". I laughed it off and didn't respond to him. What a dick
Thank goodness I found my match a long time ago, I'm innocently just really fucking rambly and talkative. I guess context of messages plays into it too, hopefully.
So happy I have my soon to be fiance. She would forget her phone places when we first started dating and found it creepy to open it up to 50 messages. Then she realized that most of them weren't creepy texts, just random messages and thoughts I get throughout the day. She has grown to deal with it, and usually finds then funny, and we use them as a way to get our minds off the annoying stresses of day to day life
It's creepy when someone can't sense that I'm uncomfortable. I've gotten this with both guys and girls and it's weird. They'll look at me longingly or stand too close to me even after I lean away or take a step back. They'll try to sneak in some physical contact even after I pull away for the tenth time that hour. And for the love of God please don't try to whisper in my ear when there's no need to be quiet!
If I am unable to figure out his/her reasons for doing something. Like, "why is this guy still talking to me?", "why is she walking so close behind me?", "Why won't he leave me alone?". If I understand a person, it's easier, but not knowing the motives makes it creepy.
This is a really thoughtful answer. How in control of a situation we feel has everything to do with how safe we feel.  That dude that is following me around in the grocery store is terrifying for the same reason the new hire in training is to be avoided at all costs... who the hell knows what they're up to and why?
Edit: Wow, when I made this comment, the orginal was several clicks off the front page, I didn't think anyone would see this, let alone want more details. I guess a clarification is in order. I'm talking about the new member of the training department, not a co-worker who is being trained in. This guy goes wayyyy too far with the Dale Cargnegie tricks for making someone like you. He hadn't even heard three sentences from me but was right in there with the hyper sincere praise of my intellect and insight and success at a young age and then asking me strangely detailed questions that were not designed to have an answer but to show me how smart he is. It immediately set off my internal alarm that this guy has to manipulate people into doing what he wants. Then I found out he's 40 and had a fuzz buster in her car and was like, oh man, he has no common sense or concept of the magnanimity of danger when on the freeway. Avoid avoid.
People who just have no concept of societal norms. I had a guy recently who I've met only a handful of times, and who is friends with my boyfriend, randomly message me asking me to hook him up with my friends, then proceeding to send me half naked pictures to send to them. THAT IS CREEPY. If you have no concept of how to behave around other people, or what is appropriate and what's not, you're being creepy.
That sounds like blow and booze behavior.
Bingo. Get me around alcohol and stims and I do shit like this too. I don't fuck with stims anymore. I still make an ass out of myself drunk texting exes though. It sucks when I get into a 3 hour phone conversation and I wake up like "oh shit, I really said all that".
shame overs are fucking awful
That eyes wide open stare, like they're trying to capture my soul, when checking me out.
Rami Malek has eyes like that, which is probably why he got casted as the nut job in Mr. ROBOT and Until Dawn
Rami Malek always looks like he needs a hug and a nap.
Yo he fuckin killed it in until dawn
I was just thinking that! His character in Until Dawn is such good friends with this girl but it felt so creepy whenever he talked to her because of those eyes.
Yeah, his acting and mannerisms from the very first episode of MR ROBOT really told the story of his whole character.
( ͡o ͜ʖ ͡o)
http://gfycat.com/BruisedThirstyAmericancurl
Oh my God. WHAT HAPPENED TO HER FACE!
She has Grave's disease.
I think the fact that the dude is Asian makes this a little bit funnier
What if she's just taunting him lol.
I thought people liked that
When they have no concept of personal space or social cues that mean "GO AWAY. I DO NOT LIKE YOU, BUT I AM TRYING TO BE POLITE ABOUT IT."
It depends.
There's a girl I know at college called Imogen. She will not leave me a alone. She follows me around, and sends me a fucking shit tonne of messages. I told her to get lost, and told her to her face I dislike her. I even got my girlfriend to message her to back off. She runs up to me, and hugs me from behind. I'm legitimately worried to go around college in case I run into her.
She's creepy.
Oooh you're thinking about me, that's so sweet of you. Darling.
Run Bforsocks, RUN!
Mouth breather.  Standing too fucking close.
Good lord I have a friend that does this. He also grunts when he cuts steak.
Grunting while cutting steak enhances the flavor.
Or is it his meat sweat driblets that land on the steak.
Had a friend in high school with a nervous tic. Immediately after laughing, he would grunt and grab his crotch.
Your friend sounds like quagmire.
Who else but quagmire?!
Michael Jackson?
BEAT IT !!  BEAT IT !! JUST BEAT IT!!
Could be worse, he could moan while cutting steak
Mouth breather here. I work really hard at hiding it, but if I start concentrating on a task too much I inevitably start doing it more obviously. I wish nose breathing was easier :(
People without sinus issues don't understand. I can breathe comfortably out of my nose maybe 50% of the time, and not at all when I'm exercising.
This was my life until one day when I realized that, when I was little and my parents told me "Don't pick your nose," they meant "...in public," not "never under any circumstances take any action other than blowing to remove the crusty blockages."
Eating was particularly paradoxical. "Don't chew with your mouth open," they'd say. Had to take tiny bites to ensure I could finish chewing before I passed out.
This guy immediately comes to mind.
I have to breath with my mouth, my nose is so bad.  My doctor told me I have an allergy nose so it's hard to breath with. It's not intentional, sorry dood.
"We've reviewed your CAT Scans, and unfortunately we're afraid you have an Allergy Nose"
-Your doctor
Side effects may include: allergy nose, mouth breathing, being considered creepy by people on reddit
Doctor: "I'm sorry but... you're creepy."
NOOOOOOOOOO!!!
"Also there's no cure" :D
Doctor: "Sorry dood."
I have a deviated septum so I also have to breathe through my mouth because I can't get enough air through my nose.
Quit breathing on me
Stop standing so fucking close to me.
But you're in my goddamn closet.
Shut the fucking door and leave me alone.
But I have to pee
Pee in that shoe
No the other shoe
No! That's the shoe you shit in, the one on the left in the pee shoe! Damn it!
I got confused and pissed in your robe I'm sorry
When someone doesn't understand the definition of no or stop and instead thinks they are just playing hard to get.
"please stop you are creeping me the fuck out I dont want to talk to you in the slightest"
"u just playin hard to get"
Retail worker here! I get my fair share of creepy people all the time and it varies. Sometimes it's the normal looking housewife muttering to herself that she "never should have murdered that damn dog" when you ask the standard "How are you doing today?" and she says she's been lonely. Sometimes it's a normal looking man who starts crying when he retells the story of how he was baptized a year ago when he became born again and Jesus helped him forget all his terrible attractions to children. Or the sweet looking old man who only comes in to watch one of our clerks restock the porno magazines. Some of the creepiest looking people are the nicest folks I've met. It's always a normal looking person who over-OVER-shares their life that becomes creepy.
"never should've murdered that damn dog" is now going to be my standard response to "how are you?"
I regret nothing. That dog was messing with forces he couldn't begin to fathom.
What the hell kind of store is this???
If you've ever worked retail, you can confirm this is most stores.
Or any customer service job actually.  I worked in an Applebees, saw people like that
Walmart?
In Florida?
Sounds like a typical retail job to me.
People are strange
When you're a stranger.  Faces look ugly when you're alone.
Women seem wicked, when you're unwanted.
Streets are uneven when you're down.
Well hey if there is a guy who is going to not touch kids, who might otherwise have touched kids I say that counts as a win!
He's just trying to share how much Jesus helped him! Unfortunately, what he helped him with is a bit too much to share with strangers.
Have you had the perfectly normal dude who swears his sister and mother where replaced by the CIA with doubles which he is so sure of because he personally witnessed the surgical procedure where they stretch a person's legs with steel rods?
The joys of retail.
how desperate they are and the tone they use to talk to people
when they go from just met to you're my last best chance to find love in a matter of minutes. hard pass on that.
Being manipulative is the most obvious one. They're engaging you while also being deceptive, and you know it. "Creepy" is a precursor to "threatening" for a reason; it's a gut feeling that a person might be dangerous.
That said, people who consider the "threat" or "danger" to be to their social standing if they're seen to not be repulsed by the "creepy" person are assholes. And yes, they do exist. But yes, it's the first kind of person more often than the circle-jerk likes to think. Dudes don't like to think that they're anything but gentlemen or that their ulterior motives are transparent, but a lot of the time women pick up on that shit.
when you start getting close to someone and they start talking shit about your friends and hobbies, refuse to hang out with your old social circle, and in general try to isolate you from your established support groups: RED FLAG! RED FLAG!
Not respecting social/cultural norms (staring, invading personal space, being overtly rude, bad hygiene, etc...)
This is it.  All those comments about "it's not creepy if an attractive person does it" seem to be missing the point.  The attractive person picks up on the receptiveness and acts appropriately.  If the person is not receptive, because you're unattractive, then it's creepy because it's out of line with the personal/social context.
When a person elicits feelings of non-consensual violation in another, or talking about things that elicit strong emotions outside of a typical context in which to discuss them or with opposite emotional cues.
Creepiness, like all communication, is contextual.
Examples:
standing too close for the other person
holding unblinking eye contact in a way that does not match up with the other person
saying explicitly sexual things in a non-sexual context, or too soon in a flirtatious context
sending a dick pic to someone immediately upon meeting them
talking about serial killers with a smile on your face
jokes about rape with someone you just met
touching someone, especially sexually, when they have shown no signs of interest
stalking someone, sending multiple unwanted messages, following someone to their home, etc.
Being non-creepy is largely about making yourself more attractive and learning to send subtler signals and pick up on signs of interest in the other person in a non-threatening manner, communicating a combination of safety and flirtation, and avoiding violating their boundaries.
It is super creepy when a person doesn't blink their eyes.
Like Jake Gyllenhaal in Nightcrawler
That's the only movie of his that I haven't been able to finish watching. He's just too damn good at acting weird. It's too uncomfortable. I get to the scene when he's having dinner with the reporter lady and have to stop there every time.
I had a manager that my co-workers and I would joke is exactly like the Nightcrawler guy; from his looks, to the way he talks. Then he went on to tell us that he was unable to finish the movie because it made him really uncomfortable.
Uncomfortable is to be expected when you stare into the face of evil and see only your reflection.
Uncomfortable is to be expected when you stare into the face of evil and see only your reflection.
Aaaah! Shit. That line was creepy as hell, but in a "well-written-and-I-would-read-your-novel" kind of way.
What's really weird is that you eventually realize that the lady is probably a psychopath too.
I had a friend that did this. Not only did he not blink, he locked eye contact for an uncomfortably long time.
Creepy is largely a worry about your own safety.
It can be a personal grooming issue, weird dirty person coming up to me, stinky breath, invading my personal space...Creepy.  That might not be threatening if a well-groomed person did it.
By the same token, your personality can be creepy. Are you obsessed with violence, porn, or weapons? That's going to creep people out (unless you're in Texas). Complete lack of social skills? Creepy.
My personal cross to bear is in the "social skills" category...I only have two speeds in a conversation: really interested, or really bored. Really bored isn't creepy, but really interested often is. People don't like it if you pay too much attention to them.
To be not creepy, you need to work yourself into peoples comfort zone. Creepy is almost always a knee-jerk reaction, so fix your grooming, make polite conversation, don't act too interested, and you should be fine.
Complete lack of social skills? Creepy.
Yea but the only way to get better at something is to practice. So if you want better social skills you would have to realize that you're going to leave a lot of creeped out people in your wake.
Yea,,.The most important part is being self aware enough to know you're creeping people out, and not just deciding they're all uptight bitches or whatever.
This has been my life for a long period of time. The saddest part? I never found out why and it seems like people just generally don't like me. I don't intrude on personal space, I don't manipulate, I don't act "weird" (I think?) but over time, sooner or later people don't want to have anything to do with me. Sorry for the pity party, just had a really bad day at the end of a long stream of bad days.
[deleted]
Generally speaking, for me, it's being way outside the bounds of normal expected behavior. If everyone else maintains a general standard of cleanliness and you haven't showered in a month, you're probably going to come off as creepy. If I'm on a long camping trip where bathing is difficult I'm not going to find greasy hair and BO creepy. If I've never met you before and you go on a long monologue about politics/music/whatever and how you hate opposing viewpoint, you're probably creepy. If I'm at a political convention/concert/whatever and you find yourself geeking out about the relevant subject (and leaving out how you hate everyone who disagrees) you're probably not creepy.
Other than that, not reading obvious social cues or ignoring direct statements. If I'm not even looking at you while you're talking or I'm constantly finding excuses to talk to other people, I don't want to fuck you even if I haven't explicitly told you to go away. If you ask me out and I say "no thank you", arguing with me about how I really should go out with you is creepy.
Also, any attempts to control my behavior put you on the creepy list pretty damn fast. Introducing yourself by telling me I really shouldn't eat meat, or I really need to try your religion, or I really should ditch my guy, or I really shouldn't go out by myself and you're on the creep call.
"You know you really shouldn't eat meat"
"Shut up, creep"
"You should really update to the latest version of iOS, Apple is supporting you with new software"
"Shut up you fucking creep"
"Ok thank you for calling Apple Care."
All the people staring at me when I'm jerking off in the middle of the food court at the mall... fucking creeps.
Some people just don't have any sense of propriety, I swear. Can't a man get some relief in peace these days?
Yeah, seems like everyone is a pervert nowadays. Stop looking at my penis everyone!
Have you seen this comment? https://www.reddit.com/r/cringepics/comments/21gf9b/i_get_more_pussy_than_u_ever_will/cgd2x3b
if they wear leather trench coats
Matrix must have been creepy as shit to you.
With sunglasses.
If it's black and made of wool, it just means they're from Boston.
How could he see me?
Eyes with no emotion behind them can be terrifying. Especially when they're asking you questions about your life in an attempt to connect, but obviously feel nothing.
Edit: Sorry guys, didn't mean to piss you off. Just an observation, not a personal attack on you.
It's because they don't care about your boring life but are trying to be friendly.
It's creepy when the person calls on the phone with their identity blocked, and just makes weird breathing sounds into your voice mail - not saying a word ...
Facebook-stalking is pretty much a given.
I had a girl like ALL of my posts for about a month.
Me too! Weirdest girl. And she'd text me or call me all the time, sometimes she'd actually come into my house even if I wasn't even there! She knew where I worked, knew my parents, bought me birthday presents, super weird. Now we're moving in together and it's just getting weirder to the point where she'll just get in the shower naked with me and wears this ring I gave her fucking every day
It sounds like you have a stalker. One day you'll wake up to her lying in bed next to you. shudders
There's creepy and then there's "creepy"
Creepy is that person who stares at someone for way too long, or follows them around, or invades their personal space way too much. Generally, they just don't have any social awareness, and do things that would generally be considered weird in a bad way.
"Creepy" is something teenagers use to describe someone who isn't actually Creepy, but socially inconvenient. It allows them to distance themselves from that person, and make it known that the said person is socially lower than them. It simultaneously allows someone to advance/solidify their social rank while making sure someone else's social rank drops in the eyes of others.
Exactly, especially the second paragraph, "socially inconvenient".
The van is usually a big giveaway.
The way I explain creepiness to people is thru a story of my old roommate. Now to preface this he was a nice guy(for the most part).
So my roommate and I went out to dinner with our mutual friend Martin and his new fiancé to finally meet her as she lived in a different state. One of the very first things he starts asking her when Martin isn't around is fuck marry kill questions about people like Rosie O'Donald and Oprah. So she laughs at first kinda nervously and just trying to fit in with her fiancé's friends but he continues asking these crazy questions of her and saying it's because he's seeing if she's good enough for his friend, while mind you she's known him longer than we had combined.
Really it's just the ability to pick up on social cues and going along with social norms. I see a lot of guys on reddit who constantly bring up the attractive vs ugly argument. The horse is already dead stop beating it.
Predatory behavior mixed with poor hygiene.
Stop chatting up dogs, man.
Cowboy Bebop has been pretty fun so far, and I tend to avoid anime like the plague.
Came here for this and Samurai Champloo. Much easier to get into and finish without dedicating too much time to it.
Cowboy Bebop is like the easiest anime to watch and a great "basic" entry anime. Not to mention one of the best television shows in general of all time.
I agree entirely
and it's got an awesome soundtrack!
Definitely Cowboy Bebop. Lot's of action, deeper character stories, and some comedy. It doesn't have too much overt silliness like some anime shows and the score by Yoko Kanno fits perfectly. Also it's only 26 episodes, so it's not too much of a time commitment for people who aren't into anime.
I have watched the show with 3 people who didn't watch anime, and they not only liked it but wanted to keep watching more episodes.
Samurai Champloo. Short series, interesting characters, some humor and modern culture mixed in.
Plus the amazing music.
Nujabes was a God. RIP.
Oh wow, just googled. Didn't know he died! I agree though, amazing soundtrack.
Came here to mention this.  LOVED this show!  So sad it had to end after just one season.
Short and sweet anime. Probably Psycho-Pass.
If they're not into anime then trying any old school animes that are amazing isn't going to work cause they'll probably complain about the art style... Give them something new and really good
Psycho Pass is basically Judge Dredd meets Minority Report
And it manages to take the best of both.
Samurai Champloo, in my experience, as someone who isn't "into" anime.
Cowboy Bebop, Black Lagoon, and Monster.
One up for Monster. It could easily pass as live action series in the west, and doesn't have any common anime tropes.
Definitely seconding Monster, amazing deep series.
I don't generally care for anime, but I agree with Black Lagoon. It has characters who act like adults and it avoids most of the obnoxious anime tropes that turn me off. I like that it's action-oriented but doesn't wrap up the plot in a neat little package or have an obvious Big Bad who needs to be defeated, and yet it also doesn't devolve into mindless lunacy at the end like many of them do. It's also very character driven more than action driven. For better or for worse, the action itself it still kind of over-the-top in an anime-styled way, but I was okay with that for this show.
I did think the ending to that one was a bit wtf.
Maybe, but it's human-scale "WTF," rather than the acid trip "WTF" certain other animes devolve into. More "Breaking Bad" than "Evangelion."
Samurai Champloo is pretty sweet. It's about old school Japan but with a pretty funky vibe. And the main characters represent old school Japan traditions and the other one is a hot head loud mouth. One of my favs
The Studio Ghibli movies are your gateway to anime. They are basically Japanese Disney but a lot cooler. Howels Moving Castle, Spirited Away and Kikis Delivery Service are a good way for anyone to get into Anime. Feel good and unhateable.
Princess Mononoke was a feature film with some A-list voice acting. Another Studio Ghibli production.
Most of the english dubs of their movies have impressive voice casts
How could you not include Princess Mononoke and Nausicaä? Two best Ghibli/Miyazaki films in my opinion.
These were the exact three that my teenage daughter and I started with. While she isn't "into" anime, it more than opened her up to them. I'd suggest Whisper of the Heart and The Secret World of Arrietty as well.
Fullmetal Alchemist Brotherhood or maybe Baccano.
I'm so glad to see Baccano suggested. One of my favorites. Also the best opening song ever.
Akira?
KANEEDAAAA
TETSUOOOOO
SASUKEEEEEEEEEE
Wait, shit
AAAAAKKKIIIIIIRRRRRRAAAAAAAAAAAAA
Not. The. MANGA.
For the love of god, 99% of the western world will not like that one.
CANAADAAAAAAAAA
Kanedaaaaaaaaaa! Help meeeeeee!
I really don't care for anime but I enjoyed Trigun.
Trigun, cowboy bebop! Anything by that studio really
Definitely Fullmetal Alchemist: Brotherhood. Great premise that hooks you in right away, long enough to tell an amazing story but not drag you out, very little filler and doesn't rely on typical anime tropes. Rated #1 on MyAnimeList and Hummingbird too, which is a good selling point.
A massive issue I had with Brotherhood compared to the original was their massive overuse of "anime expressions".  I don't know what it's called, but like every other minute some character was having an exaggerated expression that totally crippled any possible mood they could have built.
It was just like an actiony cartoon that I could never take serious.
I always preferred stuff like Bebop and Shigurui that wasn't so cartoonish.
I hate that too, honestly.  I think they lowered it a bit when they got into new stuff around episode 17
I would tend to agree that it's not a good anime for people who don't like anime. However, it's not a bad anime for for people looking to transition into anime. It has a pretty serious plot, but has comic relief that introduces common anime tropes and expressions. It also does a good job of having no filler episodes and has a complete story with few plot holes. The English dub is also pretty solid, so new people won't have to read subtitles.
Fullmetal Alchemist is always my go-to recommendation. And double yes to Brotherhood.
For anyone unfamiliar, there are two FMA series. One that was made before the manga was complete, the other after it was complete. So the stories overlap for a while and then veer off in different directions. Both are great, but Brotherhood is more 'tight' as an overall storyline and doesn't meander as much (imo). Try Brotherhood first and if you like it you can go back and watch the first series to compare.
When it comes to FMA and FMA:B I usually recommend watching them the other way around. Maybe it's just because I watched both series as they were released, so I watched FMA first, but I feel the original series is good enough to get you hooked into the world, which Brotherhood then does a better job of fleshing out. I also tell people that if you're looking for action, go to Brotherhood; if you want feels, go for the original FMA.
Second this. Im not a fan of anime at all, but Fullmetal Alchemist is great. That and Inuyasha are the only animes ive ever liked.
I third this. A great story no matter what type of film you're in to.
Death Note. Just show them the first 3 episodes. If they arent hooked, then theres likley something wrong with them.
Or they aren't angsty teenagers.  Seriously though, I do like DN, but Light can be a little much.
This is really the best answer. A lot of people I know who don't like manga/anime don't like it because they think it's juvenile, or are put off by the weird sexual fetishization of female characters. Others are annoyed by the sappy angst that go on for episodes.
There's not a lot of that in Death Note. It is mature in tone (and not in the sense that it has excessive gore or sexuality), has a complex plot, and is pretty hard-nosed. The main character is a Machiavellian, amoral chessmaster, so there is minimal angst. The art style is relatively realistic, and its setting is an accessible one to a Western audience.
Best of all, it's not a series that runs for hundreds of episodes. It has a definite arc that ends when it should, so it's not so intimidating to pick up.
And potato chips. Can't forget the potato chips.
Take potato chip.
Eat it.
Take potato chip.
EAT IT!!
FTFY
It's also absolutely brilliant. Probably one of the greatest series of all time
It's such a cat and mouse themed show, and the whole time it has your brain going CRAZY. I watched the whole show in one sitting.
Death Note exemplifies "anime" writing and style
On other Redditor's suggestions, I watched Death Note a few weeks ago. I did not enjoy it. It's not for everyone.
care to explain why?
Light seemed quite odd.  I get all of his reasonings behind his decisions to rid the world of criminals, but once L was introduced to him, he reacted quite weirdly to it, creating a personal vendetta out of nowhere.  Also, I get that the whole premise is unrealistic, but when L interrogated him and makes him go through a test to become a detective, it's so unrealistic it detached you from the story.  The last thing that didn't sit well with me is that L made connections so obscene it was as if he was writing the plot.  Given I'm only on episode 18, but this is why I didn't like it, still looking forward to finishing it though.
but once L was introduced to him, he reacted quite weirdly to it, creating a personal vendetta out of nowhere
That's kind of the point. Up until then Light had never met anyone equal or superior to him.
I'll give you that a lot of the events that moved the plot seemed very "deus ex machina". The show doesn't seem as great after the first time through, but it was damn good.
I love Death Note...but you've got a point. I just put it down to the fact that L was a genius. His level of reasoning is beyond us. But yeah, I see what you mean.
There's genius, but then there's also sneaking a peek at the script.
I loathe  anime mostly but Death Note was pretty amazing. It took all the things I disliked about anime (mostly how fights are portrayed, giant super weapons, badass heros etc) and threw it out the window making an awesome drama.
A friend showed that to me as I was getting ready for my PhD proposal in a week. 3 days later, 1 page written and all episodes done. Was quite stressed after that.
Grave of the fireflies if you hate their happiness
Hunter x Hunter.
Great show but the Chimera Ant Arc was a bit bizarre, almost like a long nightmare.
Someone recommended me this series, and I have to say that it's probably one of the better semi long anime series I've watched except for that arc lol.
Imo it went south halfway as they elongated the plot while trying to make it seem really "deep" through too much complexity. This was done in previous arcs to great effect, but they lost it lol.
Aside from that, great series
As soon as they introduced the brother and sister I knew something horrible was going to happen.
The Big O - anime Batman with giant robot fights
My husband watched the show with me and liked it a lot and he pretty much dislikes 99% of anime. The only other anime he has seen and enjoyed was the Fatal Fury movie and Princess Mononoke.
The DVDs are out of print (I have both seasons thank goodness) but after looking recently I found them on youtube.
I recommend Ghost in the Shell: Stand Alone Complex. First and Second Gig.
My favorite of all time. If you are new to anime, watch the dubbed version.
Planetes. Hard-sci fi with great story and characters. Solid choice for someone not into things that are too typical of anime.
Legend of the Galactic Heroes. Arguably the greatest anime of all-time and the fact that it's an anime is really arbitrary. Amazing story, characterization and scope. I would recommend this to anyone that likes good epic storytelling.
Seconded. LoGH is one of the best anime series ever.
/r/anime
LoGH is the new old Steins Gate.
Planetes is probably one of my favorite anime series. The fact that it went NASA in approach instead of Gundam is why I love it so much. I love space, robots, and giant mega-structures... but I don't always like them mixed together... it takes away from my ability to suspend my disbelief.
Samurai Champloo. Tells a story, is still fairly episodic (you don't HAVE to watch it in order),  has some great art, amazing music, and is just pleasant as hell.
I was watching it in Japanese one night while my father slept on the couch. He woke up without his glasses, and so couldn't read the subtitles, but watched about 3/4 of an episode, laughing when appropriate because it can be that universally good. He later described it as "a wonderful audiovisual assault."
Redline
Mother-fucking-Redline. Easily one of my favourite animated movies. It's fun, it's good looking, the music is great, and despite how silly it is, there's a deep story underneath everything.
I often rematch this movie.
The hypest movie out there. It's a rite of passage for my friend group. You want in? Let's watch Redline, my friend.
Currently listening to the Yellow Line track from the OST. I think Hulu has it available for free to watch, too.
Berserk, doesn't matter if you're into anime or not because it's amazing.
I just wish I could find the old series :/
The 25 episode anime series?
Just Google it, there are a few sites.
A shame none of the anime goes beyond golden age/eclipse.
Spirited Away.
Actually pretty much anything from Studio Ghibli
Blue Exorcist has a great story and isn't too long also doesn't focus on the typical anime tropes. All episodes are free on viz anime along with a lot of other shonen jump animes.
it's also on netflix. Though I wouldn't recommend watching it there if you got a slow connection.
Pokemon
Avatar...
I'm surprised this isn't at the top.
Attack on Titan
Love this show but some of my friends who don't watch anime were thrown off by the giant naked people and graphic violence.
I'll second Attack on Titan. Good fast moving plot and constant action, none of the whole 'throw teenage girls with boobs in your face' crap to go along with it.
Call it "Attack on Insomnia" instead. Snore.
I know this thread is kind of old. I've introduced a ton of people to anime via The Devil is a Part Timer, especially the English dub, it's hilarious, there's some action and it's just a fun show with a great concept.
Tegan Toppa Gurren Lagan!
BRO! BRO! FIGHT THE POWAH!
JUST WHO THE HELL DO YOU THINK I AM?
I THINK YOU'RE A MAN. YOU NEED TO TAP INTO THE MANLY SPIRIT SO WE CAN COMBINE!
LETS SEE YOU GRIT THOSE TEETH!
I'm not gonna bullshit and pretend its not pretty much a drama because it is, but as someone who's always been fascinated with history and the personalities of military conflict along with all the varying circumstances that play their part, Gundam Wing Mobile Suit to this day blows my mind with how goddamn good it is. Watching it makes you feel like some kind of time traveling director or something  who has access to all the vital scenes and even the thoughts of the major players regarding a futuristic war. It almost seems like you're watching a documentary. I really love that show and I'm not a particularly big anime fan.
I'd suggest standalone movies instead of whole series, which often are very long-running and so require significant time investment.
Ghost in the Shell (the 1995 one) is one I most often recommend. Excellent art style, awesome music, and an intriguing story.
I also love the works of Satoshi Kon. I really like the art style in his movies, and his work often deals with depersonalization and unreliable narrators. I recommend Millenium Actress, Perfect Blue and Paprika (said to have inspired Inception).
I've gotten two people who despise anime to watch the ghost in the shell movie by telling them it was cyber punk. One watched psycho-pass afterwards and the other is watching through death note now
Millennium Actress is in my opinion one of the most beautiful films ever made.
One-Punch Man looks pretty promising as a non-generic anime that can appeal to more people. It's pretty funny. Only one episode out so far though.
Space Dandy is the obvious answer.
They put more effort into the English dub than anything else.
Trigun.
Edit: a letter
Now I'm wondering what your typo was. Was it:
Trigum?
Trogun?
Tregun?
Trigon?
Lol trigub
Sword Art Online was my first, its very good
That was my gateway drug. I also think Ouran isn't a bad one simply because it takes all the bad anime tropes and makes fun of them, it's quite hilarious.
nonono LOG HORIZON
I felt cheated by SAO. Started really interesting but turned into a love story. The story line in the gun game I enjoyed.
You should check out Log Horizon.
I dont know, i think a lot of it is in how you frame it. I think of it more as a story about Kirito rather than about the game or action.
SPOILER WARNING!
I liked Log Horizon better than SAO, but Log Horizon has problems too. I can never tell what it's supposed to be. It goes from discovering a new world to fighting bandits to selling food to politics to war to relationship drama. I mean, those are pretty huge jumps. Going from trapped-in-a-video-game to politics is a hard jump to make smoothly.
I also feel like the characters are a bit unrealistic. Shiroe has classic bland personality syndrome, and I don't care for the "This is my battlefield" crap he says while doing paperwork. He's a tactical genius, have him fight things. He also holds back Akatsuki, which is annoying. Also, let's be real. No one would be as romantically oblivious as him. And no girl is going to actually refer to him as a lord. And if she did, he would figure out her feelings pretty quickly.
So, meh. It's a lot like Sword Art Online in some aspects. It's an anime that has an awesome premise, but the execution wasn't too great. I loved both of them after I watched them, but I then started to dislike them after further thinking about them.
That being said, Log Horizon is still really cool. Better than SAO, imo. I enjoyed every part of it, but I think there is a bit to be desired.
Your lie in April is a pretty good anime. I've only just started anime and really enjoyed it!
My younger cousin, 15, loves cartoons. I convinced her to start anime because there are more adult themes in animes over cartoons. This weekend she's going to start with Your lie.
Ninja scroll, akira, spirited away, princess mononoke.
FLCL, short( 6 episodes i think), bizarre story, and fun. Not really an anime fan but I like this and Miyazaki films.
Honestly if they are into horror try Another, higurashi, or elfin lied by far some of the best animes to come out of the horror genre in my own opinion but their could be better that I am unaware of. I do have to say stay away from corpse party, it's pretty shifty and it strays pretty well away from the actual game so yeah
I'll like to recommend "Another" it's a short 12 episode anime (also has an OVA), it's a horror anime where the students of a certain class get killed off until they are able to solve the mystery of who the extra one is.  I'm someone who isn't really "into" anime and I find these short animes that stick to their plot to be the best ones tbh.
Sounds interesting as hell. I'll give that one a try. Thanks for adding the description!
Kiseijuu: Sei no Kakuritsu a.k.a Parasyte -the maxim- is a good one.
I don't really like watching anime myself as I prefer to read manga but Parasyte is very different from other animes I've watched thus far because of its somewhat darker theme.
Also, give One Punch Man a shot! The first episode just premiered a few days ago and it's hilarious!
thanks for the suggestions! I'll give one punch man a shot
A friend recommended "Claymore" to me when I wasn't really into anime, it's awesome
Cory in the house
Lol what the fuck
Gurren Lagann. I was very much not into anime when it was shown to me and yet by the end of the first episode I was demanding to watch more.
Panty & Stocking (with Garterbelt). It's disgusting, trashy humor that mixes traditional anime style with western cartoons - the most notable of which is the Powerpuff Girls. It's 18+, though, so don't watch it around your kid sister or your teeny-bopper nephew or anything. At least one or two episodes will have you rolling and asking yourself "Did they REALLY say THAT?!". A ton raunchier than most, but loads of fun. Sub over dub for this one: Some of the lines were done in English, and when they pop up they're hysterical to listen to.
Alternatively, you could start out with a couple movies. Studio Ghibli's films are usually go-tos, but if you want something a bit less popular than My Neighbor Totoro or Spirited Away, try Nausicaa in the Valley of the Wind. Definitely give Satoshi Kon's works a look: Perfect Blue is what inspired Black Swan and the concept is very similar, and Paprika is even more nuts (in a good way!). You could also look into Mamoru Hosoda's movies, which include Summer Wars, The Girl Who Lept Through Time, and Wolf Children.
I don't care for anime, and i always have tons of people tossing animes my way trying to get me into it.
I still haven't watched one that has gotten me into animes.
I'm gonna say Initial D. It's about drift racing. It's quick. The themes aren't heavy. The characters are interesting enough. There are a few seasons. It'll teach you a bit about cars. And the animation isn't too dazzling.
Other suggestions:
Soul Eater
Cowboy Bebop
Ghost in the Shell
Patlabor
Gargantia
Gundam Wing
Naruto
full metal alchemist brotherhood. or fairy tail.
Death Note is a great anime for just this audience. Personally I don't like anime, but Death Note really had a great plot and set of characters. Still don't like anime, but I love Death Note.
I totally feel you! Death note is the only anime i have watched an enjoyed aswell.
Akira.
Golden Boy - 6 OVAs of standard ≈25 min length, awesome, based in real world, humor that fits almost everyone. Much better than investing time into some epic story that you won't necessarily like.
Next any of those: Full movies like obviously Studio Ghibli works, the first Ghost in The Shell, Akira and Memories. Cowboy Bebop for actual epic story but with most episodes being great on their own too. Danshi Kōkōsei no Nichijō if you prefer more silly real life comedy. AnoHana if you don't mind slower story about kids (I've not heard of anyone who watched till the end and didn't like it but for the most part not much is going on and there isn't much comedy so it's a sleeper show).
If you (or whoever else you want this recommendations for) watches anything, come again saying what you liked and why (or didn't and why) and you can find much better specific recommendations.
Ranma 1/2
Rurouni Kenshin
Kenshin yes
Ranma? no. Not past the 1st season or 2. Any further than that and you start wanting to kick everybodies teeth in
Jojo's Bizarre Adventures
I'm totally not into anime but FullMetal Alchemist is one of the best things I've ever watched.
Darker Than Black, because it's comparable to Heroes.
A few years before the show begins, some minority of the population were given powers. Some of these people work for the government, or for criminal organizations, or rich people as bodyguards.
Neon Genesis Evangelion.
It's the anime everybody should watch for the sake of having an opinion of it. /r/anime is having a rewatch because it's 20 years old.
First one and only I watched and enjoyed was Death Note
Fate Zero!!
If you want to familiarize yourself with the drawing style without dealing with the annoying parts of anime, watch Avatar: The Last Airbender. It's animated in the same way, but made by a Western studio. It's also one of the best shows of all time.
If you want an anime without a lot of silliness, Attack on Titan or Death Note are your best bet. Both deal with a lot of heavy themes. AoT has a lot more action, while Death Note has a ton of insanely intricate plans.
If you want great story and great characters, watch Fullmetal Alchemist or Fullmetal Alchemist: Brotherhood. i can't begin to describe everything that makes it my favorite anime of all time.
Bible Black
Puella Magi Madoka Magica.
You think this is your average magical girl anime? You are wrong...you are so, so wrong.
The first question you should ask yourself is: what am I interested in? The chances are that Japan has created an anime that would cater to your specific taste. Are you into competitive road biking? Japan has an anime for you. Are you into cooking? Japan has an anime for you. Are you interested in philosophical dilemmas? Japan has an anime for you.
Anime isn't just Sailor Moon and Dragon Ball Z. There's a depth of experiences for people with open minds.
A person who isn't interested in anime should further pinpoint why they aren't interested in anime in the first place (is it the art style? the tropes? the negative associations of anime catering to "kids only"?). If you had answers to those kinds of questions I'm sure the folks on Reddit could provide you with anime that would suit your tastes.
The one where the tentacle vagina rapes everyone.
I too liked Mahou Shoujo Elena, my good sir.
Really it depends on the person, Most of the time people answer a question like this with a Studio Ghibli movie but really I would suggest Spice and wolf,
Its not all magic and exaggerated fighting or huge mecha fighting.
Its an anime where the story is easy to get into and isn't to fast paced or all action and no substance, Also its not a cutsey blue haired girls doing cute things type anime which puts a lot of people off either.
any of the ones that were questions on the University challenge
Reverse Anime
Antime?
Or Emina.
Try browsing the top anime on myanimelist.net. Find one that looks like something you might enjoy. Make sure it's not a sequel by looking under the "related anime" section just below its synopsis. You can also use the advanced search function to filter out Ecchi if you don't want shows with erotic fan-service.
Full metal alchemist brotherhood, ghost in the shell stand alone complex, mushishi, cowboy bebop
I don't really watch anime, but my friend gave me Attack on Kiru (spelling?). It was actually pretty beast it's about titans attacking what's left of humanity.
you're thinking of Shingeki no Kyojin/Attack on Titan
That's it! It's been a minute since I've seen it. Thanks stranger!
Black Lagoon, if you're into Tarantino style action
I recommend Paranoia Agent. It will mess with you.
Or anything made by Studio Ghibli.
Vampire Hunter D Bloodlust
A few Miyazaki films would be a good start. My neighbor Totoro and The wind rises are fantastic and probably most palatable for people not really into anime.
As someone who generally doesn't do anime. I think Ghost in the Shell was great (I watched the stand alone complex and now really want to watch the movie) and Death Note. I was watching Gantz for a while and that didn't make me nope out (lost a copy of it midway through watching it)
I really didn't like Cowboy Bebop. I just couldn't get in it and I really don't get the hype l.
Ghost in the machine?
I've never watched anything apart from pokemon and stuff, and that was when I was younger.
I stated watching something called Fairy Tail with a friend of mine and it's actually pretty awesome.
Witch Hunter Robin. It's very dramatic without the goofiness of many anime and doesn't focus on big boobs.
Fullmetal Alchemist: Brotherhood. It's absolutely brilliant and can be enjoyed by pretty much anyone, anime fan or not.
Attack on titan is pretty great.
Little Witch Academia. It's a half-hour short film that's very friendly to non-anime audiences. It's similar in temperament to a Disney movie.
It really depends on the person. Ninja Scroll first really got me into anime. It had lots of action and explicit violence. I enjoyed fist of the north star for the same thing, but it was not nearly as captivating as Ninja Scroll. Then Perfect Blue hooked me as a provocative thriller. Cute fun movies are ok, but they don't capture my attention as well. I pretty much glaze over when a show or movie centers around giant robots or strictly perversion. They seem more like exploitation  stories than anything else. I loved Trigun. I think Sword Of The Stranger was one of the latest ones I really dug. Grave of the Fireflies was too emotionally draining for me, but it was good. It reminded me of the book The Road where life was just shitty until it ended. They do find relief in ways, but damn. Attack on Titan is of the same, but I like it better. Hmm I guess I just like things to get weird and violent.
I'd recommend Ergo proxy, gankutsuou, Hajime no ippo, haibane renmai and bartender. All great shows with no fanservice
Sket Dance,
Beelzebub
I never really liked anime, but I do love Les Miserables, the movie, the show, the book, and now, the anime.
http://kissanime.com/Anime/Les-Miserables-Shoujo-Cosette/Episode-001?id=7918
Ghost in the Shell
Samurai Champloo, same creator as Cowboy Bebop. Alot of non-anime fans love Attack on Titan as well
I'd like to say jojos bizarre adventure, its just weird enough to be fun, but maybe that's just me.
Tokyo Ghoul.
Do it, do it now.
Has nobody said Dragonball/DBZ yet???!
Steam Boy is a fun adventure.  I like to compare it to Indiana Jones.  A powerful piece of equipment is uncovered and everyone wants to get their hands on it.
It's simple. If someone isn't into anime, don't force it onto them. That's just a dick move.
I see what your saying, but the reason I asked this question wasn't because I'm trying to force my friends to watch, but because I wanna watch some anime myself but I find most anime predictable and cliche.
Nobody ever talks about this but Princess Tutu is a bit flawless.
One that falls into a genre you're interested in.
This is a pretty good place to look. Scroll down for charts.
http://animu-mango.wikia.com/wiki/Anime_Recommendations
Being that I have a totoro tattoed on my wrist, My Neighbor Totoro is an easy answer. Or any Ghibli movie really. They're just disney films from Japan.
Gamers should give Sword Art Online a chance. I'd also avoid really long running series if I were just getting into anime.
Log Horizon is also a fun series to watch
Attack on Titan
Full Metal Alchemist
Tokyo Ghoul. Unf.
Studio Ghibli films like Princess Mononoke and Kiki's Delivery service are great viewings for people who aren't "into" anime. Spirited Away might be the next step, but it won an Academy award for best animated feature in 2003.
Gurren lagann if you want something that's on Netflix, doesn't have a thousand episodes and is just silly and fun. Oh an SO MANLY!
Edit: Disclaimer I may have nostalgia goggles for this one.
The only anime I've ever seen is Fruits Basket, basically the only thing i can tell you is that this family is cursed.
Death note and sword art online are some of my favorites and I'm not big on anime. I tend to stay away from the robot fighting stuff most of the time
doraemon japan version. simple but meaningful
Hunter x Hunter! I don't watch anime but this was hands down the best thing I've ever watched
ouran high school host c lub
OURAN HIGH SCHOOL HOST CLUB
can confirm, watched with my anime hating friends who all LOVED IT and went out and bought the dvds afterwards
Princess Monokoe.
Space Dandy
That cymbal-clanging toy monkey
Especially with that commercial where the football gods turn the guy into one
What?
Clowns
Definitely clowns.
I had a friend that collected clowns and I told her they gave me the creeps.  Years later we reconnected on FB and I asked about her clowns.  She said she got rid of them because they started to creep her out.
She collected clowns?? Like, went to kids birthday parties and kidnapped the clown and kept them in her basement?
Clown dolls.
She collected clown dolls?? Like, went to kids birthday parties and kidnapped the clown, took him home, stole his dolls, and kept them in her basement?
Yes.  Yes that is what she did.
Why collect toys when you can have the real thing?
Well, that's not really true...they were always supposed to be creepy.
http://www.smithsonianmag.com/ist/?next=/arts-culture/the-history-and-psychology-of-clowns-being-scary-20394516/
We all float down here!
Yes clowns definitely and completely, Just to add something I was almost kidnapped by a clown
Remembering details of interactions with someone. If I really like a girl I can remember everything but pretend to be less aware so she does not think I am stalking her or something. I dont like pretending to be stupider than I already am.
Well, if you sense things are going well with the girl you like, definitely bring up something you remembered they said or did and tell them why it stuck in your mind. Anytime a guy has done this with me it just makes me realize, "wow, they really were paying attention," and it makes me more attracted to them. I make sure to do the same with guys I like as well.
Even if a person is a casual acquaintance or co-worker, I remember things about them.  I just have a good memory, and I don't think it's creepy to remember something about a person when they willingly told it to you.  I'll even go as far to say that it's rude to not remember things about a person.
I find this to be quite a personable characteristic actually. Remember details about someone, next time you see them ask them about it. Shows you are genuinely interested in the person!
A playground at night.
There is something oddly calming about a playground at night in my opinion.
Especially if it's a little wet, just little wet from a slight drizzle or the sprinkler
Like misty?
Like misty?
Like misty?
The underside of a mushroom. Just thinking about all of those frills is making half of my face go numb.
Little girl beauty pageants.
furbies
I stayed at a family friend's place with my SO this past year. When we threw our bags in my partner laughed at all the kitschy stuff on the shelves- weird trinkets, knick-knacks, object d'art.
After a good meal and a bunch of wine we wished our hosts a good night, brushed our t's and hit the lights. We'd been lying in the dark for all of 45 seconds before he says 'Fuck this.' He gets out of bed, turns the lights back on, climbs on top of the dresser to the top shelf and turns the weird big white furby around so it's no longer looking at us. He gets down, turns off the light and climbs back into bed. I don't say a word. About two minutes later he just says 'Don't pretend like you could've slept. I saved us.'
Oh this. And people got in fist fights over them at toy stores the Christmas that they were released.
Fucking terrifying little creatures.
Realistic ventriloquist dummies. They are absolutely terrifying.
Walking during a windy autumn night. The leaves blowing in the wind sound like someone is running up behind you.
The Burger King "king" they started using about 5 years ago.
victorian era dolls
the Boat scene in "willy wonka and the chocolate factory"
I think that was meant to be creepy.
Being good with kids when you're not a parent. Instant pedo status 68% of the time.
Just for men or women as well?
60% of the time, it works every time
Hitch hiking, a lot of people are scared of hitch hikers but a lot of them just want a ride home. Movies glorify hitch hiker killers and such
Isn't it illegal to pick them up also?
people in old black and white photos.
and the laughter of children.
ET. That little bike riding scrotum terrorised my childhood.
[deleted]
Anyone else picturing a really terrifying traffic circle?
Those people with eyes that always seem to be bulging out of their head. I know you all know someone like that
church
"God is good. God is very important..."
Sit, kneel, stand, sit, stand, kneel, stand, sit.
Prayers, chants, songs, chants, prayers.
When I say this, you say that. Repeat after me
$$$ Time to pass the collection plate! $$$
Drink and eat God so he can be inside you literally
It is creepy seeing people you care about appear hypnotized. Every aspect of mass is designed to foster blind obedience and subservience to authority. Forever and ever, amen
A refrigerator's motor/fan. When falling asleep, this can be a very creepy sound in the middle of the night.
I made the mistake of putting my minifridge next to my bed for a bit in university. My sleeps were miserable for a few days before I realized that I wasn't going to get used to it. Fucking miserable.
Tickle me Elmo
Dolls of babies
uncles.
Streetlamps.
That vacuum from Teletubbies whose name (thanks Google) is Noo Noo, which is precisely what children scream as he comes near them..
Mustaches.
people in mascot costumes.
Lotus seed pods.
Posts on /r/creepy
The old Pelicans mascot.
The suit garment bag hanging on the back of my bedroom door when the lights are off
Old photographs.
Upbeat music from the twenties.
Purity Rings and the father-daughter ceremonies that go along with them.
little children laughing. I've never known myself to be suspicious, but horror movies have put me on guard
Dolls
Dentists...their job is to fix your teeth but gouging out my molars is uncomfortable and creepy
Hugs. They're a great way to let someone know you care about them, but only if you get it just right. As a 30 year old white man, the only times I'll give a hug is when greeting family or congratulating teammates.  My hot 22 year old wife, on the other hand, is a complete hug-slut and it's never creepy.
Everything that is large. Like very large. Seeing a thing that is not supposed to be large but is creeps the hell out of me.
Unattractive people
:(
Any dolls
Even sex dolls?
[deleted]
Different cultures I guess but why do you need oil delivered?
In the US, if you use oil heat, you have a tank that needs a refill every so often. Gas heat will be connected to city gas mains that come to your house.
Really? Oil? Not propane?
Bill Cosby
He IS creepy.
Smiling.. or is that just me
Porcelain dolls. :(
Super accurate humanoids
Dolls.
Moms dancing with their kids. Or I'm just weird...
Myself
House of Cards. For some reason, I couldn't stand the narration of the show.
It's not for everyone. But it's ones of my favorite shows
I agree. I'm Australian so the strong political background (and jargon) was hard at first to get my head around, but i've binged watched both seasons in one day. It's great.
The US series is an adaptation of an excellent UK one if you want a political system that's more familiar. The writer of the novels and UK series was actually the major political adviser to Margaret Thatcher and was notorious as 'the political hitman' in the 80s for scheming and busting people's careers.
What's the UK one called?
House of Cards.
The first two seasons at least.  Third season was just bleh
I got frustrated that I couldn't keep up with all the political jargon.
I'm from the UK and I found it pretty easy. Anything I didn't understand from the saturation of American media, I could usually infer from context.
Same here but I still tried to watch it and the narration gets a lot better in the second and third seasons. That's the only thing that gets better though, so there's that...
Archer... Tried watching the first episode 3 or 4 times since a friend had recommended it. Either gave up or fell asleep every time. Just couldn't get into it.
However, about a year later I was lying home with the flu and decided to give it a shot anyway since I had nothing else to watch.
It was quite OK after all, and it just got better and better.
By the time I reached season two and the episode with the swamp boat, I realized that I had found a new favourite show... And it still got better and better from that point...
Archer took a while to find it's characters.
Pam is kind of annoying until she became a secret bad-ass and Krieger getting a longer leash to be weird really improved his comedy.
I think that's the current issue with Moonbeam City as well. Characters haven't found themselves yet.
I was hooked when I saw "The Placebo Effect"   No going back after that.
Damned cartoon bastards mixing heartfelt emotion with comedy and violence!
RAAAAAMPAGE!!!!
Did you see Regis this morning?
Game of thrones, I usually love shows and movies that are set in fantasy lands and have sword play but this show just didn't do it for me.
I just never got into it after the second episode.
I gave up on it too the first time. Then I got into an accident and was on bed rest for a week...and my friend put it on for me while she was taking care of things around the house for me (great friend!) It took 3 or 4 episodes for it to finally click with me. Now I'm borderline obsessed. I've read all the books and am foaming at the mouth for the next season and book.
It's a bit hard to get into because there's so much shit going on at once,  but once you do you become obsessed over every little detail. That's how it happened with me at least.
For me it was the lack of character exposition. The first episode was so goddamn chock full of "here's some guy who's got this enormous web of connections to the other 20 guys we've introduced in the last 10 minutes. We won't be taking any time to explain why you should care".
This is why playing Crusader Kings 2 is so helpful. I can think of all the characters in the show like in the game. The game explains medieval noble relations quite well.
You know I find that GOT is not made for the people who enjoy fantasy, I personally love GOT, but I cannot sit through LOTR...
I don't know. I'm a huge fan of fantasy and I loved GoT. It's well-liked by fantasy nerds. I think it would be more accurate to say that it's not just made for people who enjoy fantasy.
Same! It was way too confusing. I really wanted to love it.
But the third episode is where things happen!
You are missing out bud
I was like "fuck this, I already saw LOTR saga. I dont need no more of this sword horsemen crap."
I'm the opposite:
I love Game Of Thrones and usually dislike most fantasy.
I like the whole show except for the 3rd season which no one wants to admit blows ass.
Yeah, I feel you. Sometimes I have to attempt a show more than one time, more or less like ripping the cord on a lawnmower. The first time I tried watching Game of Thrones, I got bored during the first episode and quit. It was a really long episode, it required you to learn an absurd amount of new characters' faces and names, and it was basically just too much to keep up with. It just threw you in the world and expected you to be able to follow.
Eventually I went back and tried again, and bam, in one night I must have watched almost the entire first season.
Not saying you absolutely have to watch the show, but I think it's definitely worth it. I don't recommend people to watch a show if it is going to take until Season 3 to get good, because that's insane. But with Game of Thrones, I think if you can just power through the first episode and a half, you'll get hooked.
Supernatural. Ohmygosh that was horrific.
Agents of S.H.I.E.L.D.
I'm a huge Marvel fan, both comics and movies, but I just really couldn't get into it.
I did the same thing. I kept going to watch it, failing and coming back. The main reason being that the first season starts off in a "monster of the week" format and strings it along a little too far.
Eventually; once things fall apart and shit hits the fan, the series soars.
Yeah, I dropped the show midway through the first half of season 1, then before Avengers 2 came out I decided to binge the entire MCU in chronological order. Ended up being a bit more hyped for Marvel stuff when I came back to SHIELD and that helped me get to the really good parts.
After the thing happens with Ward, the show really takes off.
You actually look back at those earlier episodes and miss the monster-a-week thing once the meta-plot kicks in.
But yeah; the transfer of the "Main Character" from Ward to Skye really makes the series.
tbh the first season was pretty bad other than a couple of decent episodes but the show got alot better in season 2
ITT: No one reads the question properly.
"I tried watching the first few episodes and I didn't like it... so I ended up watching all the seasons and now I love it!"
Welcome to AskReddit, where people ignore the question and just talk on a semi-related issue.
Question asked: "What TV show did you give up on during the first episode?"
Answer: "I watched the first season of Breaking Bad, but I just couldn't get into it."
Question answered: "What TV show did you give up on?"
Question asked: "What show had a fantastic premise, but failed to utilize the premise?"
Answer: "Dexter was so good for four seasons, but then it just got shitty."
Question answered: "What TV show do you want to complain about?"
It happens so much on this sub. People just read the title, and then they modify the question to fit what they feel like talking about, even if it isn't addressing the question. It's unfortunate, really. People complain about AskReddit having the same few questions all day every day. But it doesn't really. People come up with unique and varied questions all the time, but people just respond to them by answering a more "neutral" question like, "What TV show do you dislike?" So we just get the same answers over and over, despite different questions.
"I tried watching the first few episodes and I didn't like it... so I ended up watching all the seasons and now I love it!"
Walking Dead
I really enjoyed the first season, the second season was "eh", and by the third season I was wondering why I was still watching.
I actually thought the third season was pretty decent. The second season was so boring though.
I thought the opposite. I liked the second season, and season three started off promising, but then they introduced the worst character in tv history and I couldn't care anymore.
Wait wait wait, you're telling me the put Scrappy Doo in the walking dead?
Who was the worst character?
The "I'm over-the-top evil for no reason watch me stare at my zombie heads" Governor.
The beginning of the third season was a bit annoying, especially the "phone call" that Rick was talking to. But the rest of the season was worth it!
Season 4 was the epitome of "lets do the obviously dumber option for the sake of dramatic effect"
If you're willing to try again just skip to Season 4.
I loved the pilot, but everything that came after... ugh. That pilot kept me watching for four seasons chock full of characters making stupid decisions.
It's strange because I love zombies, but this one just didn't click with me either.
I like The Walking Dead, but about a third of the way through "Fear The Walking Dead" I completely lost interest.  I had no investment in the development of these characters whatsoever and the setting was nothing exciting either.
This is a show that had a very bad second season and a sloppy third. It got a fuck ton better in the second half of the third season.
That being said, I blame absolutely nobody for not sticking with it during that part.
Same here. Predictable, nothing original from zombies.
Same after the first 20 minutes I realized I was watching a Soap Opera with zombies. I just don't picture a zombie apocalypse going down like that.
I liked first three seasons but then it got so boring I just couldn't stand it.
I tried watching The Walking Dead twice. But every time I explain to someone who is actually into it that I stopped because it was way too slow, they always agree with me lol.
I lasted up to the 2nd season. When Lory transformed in a mega archie ultra mother fucking biOtch. Lost interest. That and the fact that she couldnt drive shit, by hitting the only tree in 8 miles around.
Blacklist. Another generic old people show predictable as fuck. Stopped watching after half an hour or so.
Me too... It was just too coincidental... Couldn't get past it
They heavily implied over and over that he is her father. He all but admits it in the first episode. He basically tells her and she still didn't get it. Also her own husband is a secret agent. I wasn't about to commit to a show where the main character is a genius government agent while also a complete idiot.
But he's also not her father. So there's that...
She suspects he's her biological father nearly from the get-go. It's later confirmed that he isn't via DNA testing. It's still up in the air, but suspected that he had some sort of relationship with her father.
Her husband is a really good secret agent but she also starts to suspect him nearly from episode 1.
She isn't a genius, she's literally a rookie. There are plenty of legitimate non-Spader criticisms about the show, but those aren't some of them.
Literally the only reason to watch the show is to see James Spader chew scenery.
The plots are ridiculously contrived and the supporting cast is terrible, but holy shit is Spader good at what he does.
Old people show? How so?
You know just one of those shows that they put out for old people...like ncis.
Or Law and Order SVU. My grandma spent a year watching that show continuously on USA.
Yeah USA is the nursing home channel.
I actually kinda like it! It's a generic "Problem! Solve problem. New problem!" type of deal, but there's this line of mystery in it. Why her. Why him. What's that big secret he's keeping.
When they inevitably fuck up with computer things I always worry about all other professions they fuck up. If their IT guys are bad, I'm guessing the DNA-altering guy was full on bullshit, too.
It's like The Mentalist. Most episodes are filler, some actually get to the big point. Except The Mentalist was good enough to watch. Castle, on the other hand, was not. I now simply look at the IMDB summaries to see what episodes aren't a waste of time.
I feel like you're being too harsh on the show.  You should try watching it again.
No I generally hate that whole format. Any show that is like a new adventure every episode isn't for me.
Just don't call it an "old people show" as if you were 10. Call it what it is: formulaic.
Bob's burgers.   Recently I tried again. If they got renewed for seasons 8 and 9 they must be doing something right...right?
Forced myself to watch 3 episodes. Couldn't do more.
It's your generic family sitcom, done as a cartoon.
There's absolutely nothing special about it.
It's perhaps a step up from Family Matters.
How I Met Your Mother.
Terribly unfunny, typical American feel-good moral lesson nonsense, in which you could replace the narrator character with a cardboard cutout with a sign saying "im lovesick :(" taped to the front and nobody would notice.
I'm sorry, I just super hate this fucking show.
It's just a generic crappy sitcom. Nothing is unique about it. Everything it does is copied or influenced by something else.
I think people only pretend it's different because of Neil Patrick Harris.
I have never seen a full episode either; I can't relate to it.  But then I could probably describe a whole season of the show from all of my friends telling me about their favorite scene.
Makes me hate it even more.
If you're not a fan of the conventional character-driven American sitcom as a genre, there's not much there to like.
But for fans of the drama, there's actually a lot of innovation in the use of non-linear story-telling and the unreliable narrator that (obviously) wouldn't be apparent in a single episode.
I started watching it without really liking it because I didn't have cable and it's in constant re-runs. A half dozen episodes (out of order, which the show's structure actually rewards more than most character arc-driven shows), I started to appreciate the attention to detail.
A good traditional American sitcom is a lot like a good American-style pilsner, though. You'd have to be willing to pay a lot closer attention than most people are to tell the good ones from the bad ones.
"legen... Wait for it..."
Oh my God he's gonna say it! I can't wait!
"dary! "
HOHOHOHAHAHAHAHA OMG HE SAID IT AGAIN SO FUNNY!
... God I fucking hate that show
And that fucking laugh track!!!
Parks and Rec. Don't hate me, I've heard the later seasons are better, it just felt like another boring sitcom.
To be fair, just skip the first season and start with season 2
Yeah, I've been thinking that might be the best plan of action.
It was very similar to The Office in that the first season introduced you to everyone and what the plot of the show was. Or thats at least how I viewed it.
There are a lot of shows like that.
I watched the first 3 episodes and didn't like it at all. I took a 2-year break from it, and my friend convinced me to pick it back up, claiming the first season was just slow, but the show gets much better. She was so right. It's a great show.
It's a very specific type of humor and it's not for everyone. I recommend looking up a summary of the first season so you get back story if you start again from season 2.
The Office. I watched the pilot thrice and found it too cringey for my taste but finally decided to persist through the first season. Best decision I ever made.
It's true, they didn't really find their stride until the second season, i agree.
The first episode is the cringiest thing I've ever seen, but trust me: it gets a lot better.
Bastard Executioner.
That show had a shitty, cheesy feel to it. Katey Sagal's accent....so terrible. Her acting in general.
Kurt should stick to gang culture.
It's discount Game of Thrones. Every scene you feel like the actors are in a set. Very cheap.
Sense8. I watched about half of the first episode and thought it was awful.
I was the same but then a friend suggested just skipping the first episode and it quickly became one of my favorite shows! Try giving it another shot, the first episode is relatively useless plot wise.
The Big Bang Theory. upvotes that way <--
Have my upvote, I hate watching shows that it feels like they are reading a script. I want the show to trick me into thinking that is not the case. Big bang theory just feels like a cut and paste show...pause...wait for canned laughter. Paste in another stupid joke...pause wait for laughter.
Particularly in the age where most popular sitcoms don't use laugh tracks anymore.
You've described it perfectly in regards to those sitcoms.
So fucking corny i feel like im in a maze
Agreed. I tried to see what the buzz was about. Couldn't stomach 10 minutes.
Likewise, with 2.5 Men.
A'ight. Take mine.
I really don't feel anything when I watch the show. If anything I think that the jokes are often xenophobic and insensitive.
I just don't find mean jokes funny. Whatsoever.
The Wire. Tried to watch it three times. What a bore.
First few episodes are slow, laying groundwork. It's very good when the story picks up.
Agreed, slow as fuck but very well done.
I pushed hard through to about 4 episodes into season 2 and it never picked up for me.  Super boring.
People on /r/AskReddit yesterday were acting like it was undeniably better than Breaking Bad.
Sons of Anarchy and Walking Dead. I wasn't really seeing what all the hype was about.
Don't worry. Watched the whole show, felt the same.
Sons started out strong, but by the 4th season I just stopped caring.
Supergirl. -_-'
Couldn't get through the pilot. It was insanely boring and predictable.
Supergirl is out???
Yeah. Just the pilot.
I couldn't get through the trailer, man. You're a trooper.
Flash.
Although I like every other comic TV show, this one seemed dumbed down.
Modern Family.
I agree with this. I hated the show at first, but after a while I'd catch one episode or another and finally got into it
I could never watch Modern Family because of how the characters almost always got into uncomfortable situations. I'm sure it's a good show, but my anxiety is so bad I can't watch TV shows where people put themselves into awkward situations. One that comes to mind is Phil and his oldest daughter's boyfriend.
Family Guy. None of the characters are likable for me. Fell asleep.
If you're watching Family Guy for character identities/development, you're gonna have a bad time.
Even South Park/Simpsons have character identities.
Yeah but Family Guy is different. There are no arcs, and the characters are unpredictable because each show's entire premise is impossible.
Family Guy is like 20 min worth of unrelated 30-60 second youtube gags strung together incoherently.
YAWN!
The Walking Dead, that shooting scene when the car is upside down and the bad guys get out and start shooting at the cops.
When you are given a weapon in the police you are trained to use it. It is impossible for 5 cops to shoot an entire mag without hitting somebody who is only 20m away.
Don't worry, once there are zombies, everyone and their grandma can 360noscope headshot them from 150m away while sprinting
Brooklyn Nine Nine. I just.... couldn't stand it, it wasn't funny and it wasn't interesting.
Entourage. I am a bit of a film and TV snob, however a friend (who is also a bit of a snob) said it is one of his favourite shows. I noped the fuck out of it in 10-15 minutes.
The Office. It seemed extremely boring to me. Maybe my expectations were just too big after an epic Parks & Rec ending.
You have to watch through the first season and then it gets really good at season 2.
Glee. I thought it was going to be a mockumentary type show that poked fun at the people in the Glee Club. Then they started singing, and singing, and singing.
American Horror Story.  I was so excited for this because I love the Horror Genre but damn I just cannot get into this show.  Sorry you AHS fans, I tried three times.
You might want to try the different seasons if you haven't? They're all different storylines.
Breaking bad. I got maybe 10 minutes in, got bored, and have not watched it since.
It takes a few episodes, ok a lot of deposited :). Netflix did research and found that the hook point for most people is season 2, which I find to be accurate.
I generally give a show 5 episodes to hook me. I make exceptions if everyone I know says it's good . Breaking bad was one of them.
Game of thrones. Incest, rape and child murder don't pique my interests.
And that's just the first episode!
Archer. My friend thought it was genius so I turned off the TV and said "that's quite enough of that". It was terrible.
Daredevil
If The Tomorrow People is popular, then The Tomorrow People.
Either way, Attack on Titan as well.
Oh boy Reddit is going to hate me for this...
Firefly
I was watching the first episode and about halfway through, I got kinda bored of it. The theme for some reason didn't fit for me. I do like scifi movies/shows, but the plot/story reminded me of a serious futurama or some kind of "spin-off" show about a "Han Solo" type smuggler flying through space.
Although I might give it another chance since it was pretty late when I started to watch it and I was pretty tired. Maybe I misinterpreted the show because I was too tired.
Big Bang Theory
The Office (US and UK)
The Bachelor (really any reality show at all)
The New Girl
How I Met Your Mother
I'm sure there are more.
Kimmy Schmid... Multiple coworkers recommended it, we didn't even make through the first episode
You shut your whore mouth, Kimmy Schmidt is rad.
I dislike the show because I find Titus and the landlady super annoying. I like the girl that plays Kimmy though. She was funny in The Office.
wow someone else who finds Titus annoying high five "everyone" who's watched this show raves about how "funny" he is but I can't stand him.
I find Titus annoying, but I find that type of annoying funny.
Parks And Recreation and Community.
I ended up watching them way later, but the first episodes were terrible.
Mad Men. SO MUCH SMOKING.
Sons of Anarchy.
Suits and Mad Men.
Fear the Walking Dead, The Walking Dead, Game of Thrones, The Big Bang Theory (although my husband likes these shows and I still watch a few episodes with him every once in a while).
Heroes.
I think I made it, 3 episodes into the second season and nope'd out.
Dexter.  I just couldn't get into it at all for whatever reason. I didn't find the characters interesting,  I just didn't like any of it.
Scandal, House of Cards
Gossip Girl
The 100. Just not my type.
Scorpion, how did that thing get any further than a stupid idea, let a long a pilot.
Better not be coming back on TV that show suck!
Lost Girl. I love me some modern fantasy but it's just too schlocky.
Minority Report
Mad Men
The Crazy Ones. It was Robin Williams as Don Draper doing an impression of Robin Williams.
Mulaney.  Love his standup but that show....eehhh.  Oh wait, you said popular.  Sorry.
American Horror Story: Freakshow.  It didn't grab me when it immediately went to a scene that was supposed to shock us with the sexual content and I turned it off when Jessica Lange sang a David Bowie song years before Bowie existed.
I'm still giving :Hotel a shot even though it had too much gratuitous sex just for shock value and edge.  (but Matt Bomer nude, have to give it a try).  If anyone sings though, I'm out.
I didn't make it through the premier of Fear The Walking Dead.
You didn't miss much.
Steins;Gate. Was really hoping for an insane time travel anime, I thought it would be more like Primer than some bad comedy. Tried dubbed, tried subbed, either way I hated it.
Not exactly the first episode but I'm having a really hard time getting into Justified for some reason. I watched the first episode, wasn't inspired to watch the second and didn't for a few weeks. I've heard great things about the show, just doesn't seem to grab my attention.
Dexter. I was so bored with it the first episode but people kept telling me to push through the first season. I watched the first season and still couldn't get into it.
American Horror Story. Didn't hold my attention.
The intro music is supposed to be creepy and disturbig but its just annoying musical diarrhea.
Dexter
Sherlock. I fell asleep.
Lost. I just thought it looked dumb and over complicated. Did not give 2 shits to find out what happens and why because it all looked very stupid. Just simply didn't care, I guess too much action and drama makes it so unrelatable. Didn't watch it till the end. Compare that pilot to breaking bad or Dexter for example, those 2 shows take it slow and u get to know the characters and actually experience the comfort of their environment before a problem is introduced. (BTW I can't even remember the pilot of lost too well all I remember is "bam! People running on an island! Shits intense man!")
BoJack takes a little while to hit its stride but it's amazing.
Wet Hot American Summer. Something about Paul Rudd pretending to be a teenager is just upsetting
That was the joke that you clearly missed. It's supposed to be ridiculous.
I'll watch almost anything but The Last Ship was just awful.
30 rock.
Just not funny at all. Complete waste of effort by all parties involved. Particularly Tracy Morgan/Jordan who is the most unfunny comedian ever.
Firefly. It really seemed like the type of show I normally like, but I just couldn't finish the episode.
The Office UK. I might just be an uncultured Yank but just so much about that show would make me cringe. It was weird because I was raised with a lot of British humor and TV shows.
I;m also not a fan of Criminal Minds, that nerdy kid from MIT or some shit drives me up the wall insane. Fuck. That. Kid.
Mad Men-- 20 minutes in I was saying "Shut up already and get to your point!" ugh. Never again.
4400.
I dont know why, my finger slipped and switched channel. I guess I didnt go back because on channel 42 there was a summer season "E" Entretainment especial. There were a lot of bikinis and girls going "wooooooooooooooooo".
Girls
It was almost Mad Men. I was just sitting here like "Oh wow, a boy's club, how refreshing.." and I just generally found it dry.
But the more I watched it, I couldn't stop, and now I'm at the beginning of season 7 and I hate everyone.
How I met your mother. I just don't see the appeal.
Tyrant on F/X.
I tried. I really did.  But it's just not that great.  Not to mention the premise apparently gets ridiculous later on according to my friend who loves it.
LOST.
I gave up right away. People told me to keep going, eventually I caved in and kept going until the end of season 2.
That show was horrible.
Most recently the only show I turned off during the first episode of was Marco Polo.
I really wasn't feeling it. Haven't gone back.
Parks and Recs.  It was so tremendously unfunny to me and it'd been built up so high by my friends.  I was bored and disappointed.
The Newsroom. The smugness annoyed the cack out of me.
Gotham. Just stupid.
Agents of SHIELD. Turgid.
Gossip Girl.
Better call Saul, it's bag of shite
Breaking bad. It was slow at first but became the best show I've ever watched. I cried when it was all over. RIP
How many times I've come close to death without me noticing.
How many people were romantically interested in me.
Agreed, maybe not who though.
I'd want to know who.  It might be devastating for awhile, but I'd carry on eventually.
I would probably just become a shut in after a while.  I mean thinking about the results in any way are kind of depressing.  On the one hand you could be more attractive than you thought.  Maybe your best friend of your non-preferred gender has a fantasy crush that you would normally die not knowing, or an uncle/aunt, or parent.  The middle ground would leave you feeling plain or unwanted, always unsure.  The unattractive scale would be horrible to deal with and really make you withdraw.
No thanks.  I will just pretend I am average and enjoy the love I get from my wife.  She is more than enough to keep me satisfied.
How much money I have spent on useless items. That way I can make some changes and save some money.
I kept track of this for a month.  It opened my eyes on the money I wasted.  I no longer buy coffee out, instead I use a reusable coffee mug.
"If you win the lottery, the first thing I want you to get me is a face lift and a boob job," said my 49 year old girlfriend as I was checking my ticket.
"Well, actually, the first thing I would buy is a reconditioned engine and a respray for my Mondeo," I replied.
"Why would you waste your money tarting that old thing up, you might as well get yourself a new one," she said.
"My point exactly."
Ha! Good stuff.
Did she get the point?
this is called a budget >_>
People who have been attracted to me but haven't made it known.
It's over 9000. Ya happy now?
"If you torture data enough it will confess"
Statistics in a nutshell.
Assists. As in how many people have died because of indirect actions of me.
Overall value vs replacement player.
ITT: people who don't know what a statistic is.
I'd want to know mean daily minutes spent wasting time.
Total amount of time I've masturbated.
YEARS, MAN
48 seconds x 3,976,437,419 sessions = . . .
Carry the one. . .
The number of eggs i have eaten
I've ate so many eggs man. We could be the egg-men!
Goo goo ga joob
Frank?
pleases stop flailing that spork around, you'll put somebody's eye out.
hours spent procrastinating important things
My life expectancy.
Something HUD like? Bang-Possibility (for non-family members)
Path to death at any moment.
Admittedly, my life would turn into a quest to keep heading off causes of death, but it would be motivating to eat right and exercise.
Something about future stock performance.
How many hours spent on video games...
I've spent over 100 days on Skyrim alone...
Is that 2,400 hours or you've been playing it for 100 days with variable hours per day?
Filthy casual.
The number one thing people have thought about me. That, or have a pie chart about the most common thought... Like funny: 12% cute: 4% etc etc
The total amount of drugs I've done.  Including alcohol and any sort of medication I have had to take for illness', not just recreational.
At first, I wanted to know the number of people who thought I was attractive/interested in me.  But that won't make me feel better about it, and I am realizing that I don't need that to love who I am.
I want to know the total weight of boogers I have picked.
Number of times I made someone else laugh.
How often did I fart?
How many times my name has been mentioned when I'm not in the room. For the ego stroke more than anything
How many hours I've spent masturbating
How much money I spent on Pokémon cards as a kid, comapred to how much the collection collecting dust in my attic is worth now.
How many times someone has pulled out in front of me only to go 10 miles under the speed I've been going.
Another good thing to ask - how many times in my life have I farted while dead asleep?
How many hours I spend watching Netflix.  Although I am kind of scared to know.
How many fap sessions, how much money ive spent on bud, how many shits ive taken
How many people have masturbated to thoughts of me. I'm a man so probably not a lot
Time spent jerkin'
How many times I've closed Reddit and then opened up a new tab for Reddit.
Exactly how much snot have I generated in total? Is it more likely to fill a dump truck or a silo?
Also how much in gallons or liters has gone down your throat.
/r/nocontext
The number of times I've been able to improve someone's day.
I like this answer. Seems like one of the few statistics that wouldn't either a) just be depressing, or b) completely useless information.
I don't have a statistic readily available currently. I might hit up /r/outside about that...
BUT the chance that I might do this for one person is what motivates me to make it through the day.
How many people have been positively impacted by the everyday actions of mine over the past 20 years?
The number of peoples lives I've affected without even realizing it
How much time have I waisted versus how much time I have made use of.
How many hours I spent on which video games.  I'm sure Civ II would top the list, but I just gotta know.
Not a statistic, but I'd love to see a heat map of places my man gravy has ended up over my life.
Percentage Life Remaining.. okay maybe not
The ratio of time spent happy to time spent unhappy
The number of times I've said the word "fuck"
How many orgasms.
*How many pounds of poop I've produced.
*How many miles I've walked.
*How many times I've written the letter "e"
I would like to know how many times I've seen an askreddit thread asking what statistic I would like to know about my life.
It's somewhere around 20.
Whether or not everyone hates my fucking guts
Everyone does, sorry :(
Ho Chi Minh City: Nguyen
Korea: Kim
How many times I've read this same fucking AskReddit question.
I don't understand how people think we didn't land on the moon. Russia would have been all over our bullshit.
[removed]
They are - the fake Moon landing theory is quite popular in Russia. Modern Russia, not USSR, I've never read any Soviet publication asserting the Moon landing was faked, even when reading the very politically biased encyclopedias. I'm ashamed to admit I considered the fake landings to be a convincing theory at some point in the 90s when I got a lot of information from shitty Russian-language rags.
Of course during the first Moon landing, the USSR was following it very closely. The entire flight was being tracked by Soviet locators, and some Soviet cosmonauts were also following it from a ground station.
I think this is regional, I live on Long Island and never ran into a real person that thought this. I think the reason is that large portions of the project were developed here, so likely someone you know or are related too had something to do with the project.
that there are hot singles in your area who want to have sex
[removed]
[removed]
AND...they are dying to meet YOU!
(of all people).
Homeopathy.
If the number of people believing in it gets little enough, it will start to actually work.
Water has memory!
And while its memory of a long lost drop of onion juice is infinite
It somehow forgets all the shit it's had in it!
Tim Minchin - Storm
You know what they call alternative medicine that's been proved to work?
Medicine.
I love that line.
Essential oils.
Extracting and concentrating chemical compounds from plants that have shown to have some medicinal value is the exact opposite of homeopathy.
Essential oils area scam even if a few of them have some vague medicinal value. If they actually did have any real medical value you wouldn't need a pyramid scheme to sell them.
pyramid scheme
Uh, you can buy them in the grocery store.
I have used lemongrass oil to potentiate the effects of cannabis many a time. It contains myrcene, which lowers the blood-brain barrier for thc absorption. Though, lemongrass may also be an herbal SSRI - more and better research is absolutely needed on things like this. Do not mix with either pharmaceutical or herbal MAOIs, as this could be potentially fatal.
I just buy mine at the shop. Tea tree oil is a good one that is very useful.
I'm not going to defend it over cancer treatment, but it's "feel good" medicine. It feels good, feeling good can help you fight a cold or something. Some doctors recommend it in addition to normal stressful treatments because it can relax you.
Placebos do have some positive effects, but anyone selling homeopathic remedies is full of shit. It can be deadly if someone decides to abandon their chemo or whatever in favor of snake oil, which is the main risk I can see for labeling it as a legitimate treatment.
I agree, but sometimes a few dollars for a placebo can't be that bad. But if companies are charging $500 for "all-natural" toxin removers, then screw those companies
It's not so much that people believe in it as they just think it is another buzzword for "natural medicine." It's not. At all.
Vaccines cause autism. Can't understand why people won't let this go.
When you have a child who is normal until xyz year and regression hits it's easier to blame an outside source than it is to talk about genetics.
Source: work with students with autism - I see how desperate parents get with dieting and miracle working to expect things to happen.
My BIL and his wife blamed their sons Aspergers on all the food coloring in products.  To this day they think he doesn't need treatment as long as he abstains from artificial colors and flavors.  It has not worked.
My grandma hates it when I talk about getting my next pox vaccine. Like I'm going to drop dead or something.
Please show her the proof that the doctor who introduced that bullshit has been fired for blatantly lying
The problem is it doesn't matter to them.  He didn't get fired for blatantly lying, he got fired because of "Big Pharma" not wanting him to tell "the truth".  And all those other studies done that show no link?  "Big Pharma" again.
You can't reason someone into something they weren't reasoned into.
I can't understand why a politician stating this is not immediately disqualified in most people's minds.
Because people do not value intelligence in their elected officials. Knowing somebody is smarter than them frightens most people, so they make up excuses that intellectuals and science is just a scam or a trick.
http://www.howdovaccinescauseautism.com/
Hey, my best friend's sister's boyfriend's cousin's roommate knew this guy whose kid had autism and HE was vaccinated. That's pretty conclusive to me. I'm surprised that doctors and scientists injecting children with random chemicals isn't causing more problems in kids...
If this is a joke (and I fucking hope it is), you should put "/s" after it to show that it's a joke.
Well you apparently have a keen eye for sarcasm. Oh wait, you probably won't get that. Yes, I was being sarcastic, but thanks for playing.
Because someone fabricated an experiment and around the same time many different things were lumped into the autism spectrum. ADHD? Autism spectrum. Dyslexia? Autism spectrum.
Instead of hearing that the definition of autism has changed people saw the first thing and started pointing the finger. Now we have a whole generation where people are going to have to deal with polio, measles and other curable diseases because of voluntary ignorance.
Evolution is not real.
Moon landings were faked.
Is there even a possibility that evolution is not real?
No.  We've seen it in action in controlled experiments.  There is no doubt.
Scrolling through quickly I read:
Evolution was faked.
Moon is not real.
Just kind of expecting Jesus to pop out from behind the curtain and say "Haha! Got'cha!"
Some people blame Pres Obama for the poor Hurricane Katrina response, despite it happening 3 years before he was even elected president.
http://www.nydailynews.com/news/politics/lousiana-republicans-blame-president-obama-hurricane-katrina-response-article-1.1433096
Anyone who thinks dinosaurs and people were on the earth at the same time.
"I can't take these people seriously, they're watching The Flintstones like it's a documentary"
Anyone who thinks dinosaurs and people were on the earth at the same time.
They still are
I meant the classic 'terrible lizard'. People who think T-rex and humans co-existed cleaaaaarly wouldn't believe that their chickens are left over dinosaurs.
I know, I was being facetious
Reminds me, my brother met a lady that seriously believed dinos never existed. Not even a suspicion or something. Just flat out sure they never did.
..... so, she thinks they're a hoax the whole world agrees to go along with?
Honestly I can understand people who suspect a conspiracy more than I get people who are so confident in one like that. If I had to rationalize it perhaps you dont belive in religon and despite so many people beliving in god at different times in different ways. Youve never seen any proof so regardless of w.e strange trivial proofs people point at they could all be faked so you wouldnt take them seriosly? Why would people fake it? Well people pretend to be religious and use religon for economic gain too. Sooo basically what I am imagining from this persons perspective is the same logic applied in a similar fashion.  Personally I really so think there is nothing wrong with having such a suspicion if you do not know any better. Its just she was convinced without a doubt that its all fake.
Isn't that just a small minority of Christians? 80% of the kids in the high school I went to didn't believe in evolution, they thought Jesus was coming back, they thought the Earth is 4000 years old or whatever.
Edit: What I mean is that doesn't seem very rare to me.
That is just so so wrong.
The Earth was dated to 6,004 (4004 BC)......according to Ussher.
The Bishop.....not the singer.
Yep. A lot of the time they didn't even know what they were saying.
80%? That sounds pretty impossible to me but again I live in Canada and non of my christian friends are like that
Yeah, my school was pretty fucking Christian. In my form class (not sure how to explain what that is) of 25 students only me and one of my friends were atheists. The rest were ALL CHRISTIAN. It wasn't that bad in all the other classes but something interesting is that in a class like English, the higher you went up the sets the less religious people there were. I don't blame them for being such 'hardcore' Christians, but I think they're a little bit misinformed.
Obama is a Muslim. Obama wasn't born in the US... seriously they think someone could've missed that?
You can be Muslim and American. I wouldn't care if he's a Muslim, but he obviously isn't
Edit: sorry I misread that as "He was born in the US, so he must not be a Muslim"
The Rapture THE RAPTURE is comming tomororw, next day ohh just a normal day agian sigh
The Bible literally says that not even Jesus knows when the rapture will happen.
How will he plan drinks and snacks when we all arrive?
Yeah never understood why you would make a big deal about the rapture anyways I'd rather not know.
Creation science.
Sept 23rd.
Always Sept 23rd.
The Daily Mail
That there are some people out there that actually believe the world is flat...
That girls pee from their vagina.
Any word out of a scientologists' mouth
Told a coworker who loves nature documentaries something I learned here on reddit about humans being the best endurance runners - he actually told me humans weren't animals.  We had a long argument about it but I hesitate to call it an argument because his only responses were "nope, no, NA-uh".
"Are we mammals?", "yes", "so we are animals", "nope."
I told him even if he's religious and doesn't believe in evolutions (pretty sure he isn't) that humans are still classified in the animal kingdom - he didn't care.
[removed]
That is so strange. I've not heard this one before. What was his rationalisation?
He doesn't believe we evolved from a more primitive animal (which is fine, whatever - not my belief but realistically i can't go back and show him) so theirfore we aren't animals. . . Even though I can point to the animal kingdom and say "look there we are!"
I wonder if thinks he is a majestic superior being when he takes a shit.
That's hilarious. We are, by our own definition, "animals". We coined that term to specifically identify a whole group of living things, of which we are included. It's not even up for debate. It'd be like arguing that granite isn't a rock.
Yea well he isn't the brightest crayon in the box. 7 coworkers in my room and they were all giggling and trying to offer there own proof to no avail.
He sounds like a fucking moron.
A lot of people have trouble with this.  On some very deep level, they think that calling humans "animals" somehow degrades what it is to be human.  It's not even solely the religious nutters who think this (though it often is).  It's not a position one gets to rationally. It's a case of "I don't like the implications of this, so I am going to disbelieve it, evidence be damned".
Holy crap, I remember a girl in my 4th grade class (christian school) asked a question about this when we were doing animal kingdom stuff in our science books. Our teacher told us that we are kind of like mammals but were made in god's image, and therefore not classified like animals. This is the only instance where i can look back on my christian schooling and call bullshit. The school and most of the teachers were reasonably progressive about science and history.
They're minerals Marie!
I can accept what people believe about their cult because it's basically a religion and more faith based than anything.
I really have a hard time believing any one is seriously a part of the Flat Earth Society. It's something that people knew thousands of years ago just by looking at the horizon.
It's a joke website and people just like to wind other people with it.
Rapid weight-loss scams. My coworker recently had a friend of hers recommend these "skinny wraps" that you put some gel on and wrap tightly around your midsection.
I just....I can't believe it. It's calories in/calories out. My coworker has been going to the gym every day and losing weight slowly but steadily. I told her that if she buys these skinny wraps, she'll attribute her hard-earned weight loss to the bull shit nonsense of this weight loss scam product and her only response was "I don't care".
These work great....just put it on your mouth and not your waist.
That being morbidly obese doesn't have any bearing on how healthy someone is.
Health At Every Size is dangerously influential in that regard since they seek to feed people (no pun intended) their delusion of being healthy despite being overweight. Goes directly against common scientific convention.
It is also inflated to hell as a movement.
It is a niche even online, no one but a few very small group thinks like this.
I've heard I was originally supposed to mean that you can start eating healthier at any size. Does anyone know if this is true?
I was arguing with someone on YouTube about this. God they were a fucking idiot.
I was arguing with someone on YouTube
Well, there's your problem!
You're fat because of your genes.
Please, you're fat because you eat 3 cheeseburgers a day for lunch and think coke is a replacement for water.
Some people have a real physiological, heritable condition that wrecks their metabolism. This is extremely rare, however. There is simply no way that genetics are a meaningful factor in the obesity rates we're seeing. It's all diet - specifically the modern, industrialized junk food diet.
But if maybe 1% of  them have a genetic defect causing it, 99% of them will choose to believe that they are that 1%, because this enables them to continue eating candy bars dipped in milk shakes or whatever.
What is the name of the condition? Also, if your metabolism is lowered you can just eat less calories and still stay thin. You have to be careful to eat nutrient dense food though to get all your vitamins.
And even IF they have, hypothyroidism adds like 15 pounds.  And can be treated with super cheap medication.
Exactly. 99% of obese people choose it. They could change it but they prefer to believe they have a real problem.
Calories in > calories out = weight gain. It's not that hard.
Trump. I don't understand this political phenomenon.
Easy.
People LOVE (what seems to be) non-PC straight talk.
(FYI...I am not a Trump fan)
That Asians are only from China, Japan, Korea etc, etc!
Yep! American Indians are now known to have been of asiatic origin.
"Now known?" Hasn't that been known for a long, long time?
If there was a time when it wasn't know the statement stands correct.
Yea...I guess that's true. But he made it sound like it was recently discovered
NO....they used to be the "lost tribe" of Israel.....so...Semites.
To be fair, "etc., etc." covers a lot of ground :)
But you get what I'm talking about right?
People will believe any bullshit they agree with. Yesterday on the front page of /r/science there was an article that "disproved" drug tests by using a sample size of 3 people (actually two experiments, one used a single person another test used two people). Everyone thought it meant drug tests didn't matter.
A sample size that small could mean a thousand things tainted the experiment but the anti-drug test circlejerk ate it up
That a lot of people believe reality TV is real.
But its right there in the name! They couldn't call it "reality" if it wasn't real, stupid!
/s ;)
The government cares about you.
Mormons. Book of Mormon. It was written by 1 individual. It's a fake. Yet there's over 20 million people that say it's true.
How'd that South Park song go?
DUMBDUMBDUMBDUMBDUMB
Religions. All of the religions. They were all invented by humans. They are all fake. Yet the vast majority of people on this planet believe in one or another.
That Sandy Hook was a conspiracy..
wat
I think i just felt my blood pressure rise
That vaccines cause autism. Yeah one day you're just gonna wake up with a bad case of autism after not having it your whole life.
Some people actually believe that Mount Rushmore occurred naturally...
Facepalm
Wow he drives a brand new high end car, he must be rich.
In all honesty he or she is probably financed up to their gills in debt and work just to barely make minimum payments every month.
Sure if you know the guy has a great job that pays 6 figures and drives a BMW he probably can afford it, but if you have a friend that has an ok job but a really really nice car, either mom and dad have money, or they are in way over their head.
This comment barely relates to this thread.  It seems like you are just venting about other people's personal spending habits.
In addition, most people who drive nice cars can in fact afford them, whether by job or inheritance.  Sure there are dumb-asses who finance themselves to the limit, but I guarantee they are not the majority.
I think he's meaning to point out if someone has nice things, then they are wealthy. Which isn't always the case, but a lot of people think it is.
Personally I got very wary of that sort of thing as a result of 2008...a lot of people I thought were doing well were foreclosed on and had cars repo'd.
That sort of thing. People being house poor or car poor.
Vehicle sales industry member here - nope.
Really cheap (<$10k) vehicles get paid cash, really expensive (>$100k) vehicles get paid cash, the vast majority of everything in between is financed.
I can't even begin to describe the number of times I've seen someone say they are trying to downsize to reduce their payment when they are 10k upside down on a luxury car they couldn't afford.
It literally happens at least 2 or 3 times a week - to me alone.
There is probably some confirmation bias there because the people who can afford it don't try to get out of it right away, but it happens way too often to just be a weird case situation that barely happens.
Everything on the illuminati.killerz Instagram page.
The whole 10% of the brain thing
Going outside in 10.C without a jacket will give you a cold
This drives me insane.  And there is no reasoning with people about it either.
Mom?
There are "Stevie Wonder truthers" who don't believe Stevie Wonder is really blind.
My mind is officially blown.
That some people are inferior to others simply because their skin is a different colour/ they have a different sexuality/ they believe in different thing to you/ they have a different way of life to you/ they come from a different place than you. Basivly, people who think that someone is worse than them because their different.
The American justice system is perfect.
No one, not even the founders said this. They said it was more perfect, but they never said it was the perfect system of justice.
Person from country X does heinous act Y. Everyone from country X must want to do heinous act Y.
That the Holocaust didn't happen.
I have living proof of the Holocaust happening.
Are you hiding Hitler in your basement?
[Sweats nervously] ...No...
Some people think The Martian is based on a true story...
That owning firearms is a fail-safe against a tyrannical government.
Electricity. People believe in electricity.
It doesn't have to be any extreme belief. My issue is with people being incapable of articulating why they hold a certain belief. A lot of people don't critically think about anything, let alone polar issues, such as politics and religion. Essentially just because is a common answer.
That people are for abortion because they want to kill children.
That people are against abortion because they want to restrict women's rights.
Believing stereotypes to be absolutes.
Flat Earthers
That when an idea makes logical sense in your head, it's automatically science.  Or put another when people earnestly believe logic = science.
Hippies will tell you that you're stupid for believing in jesus and then go on about their gems that align their 'chakras' and their horoscopes.
That global warming is a scientific conspiracy.
Edit: sorry "climate change".
Someone downvoted me.
Probably one of those conspiracy theory mentalists.
eh, it's not a conspiracy in the classic sense, but it sure ain't completely as true and absolutely caused by man.
Vaccines are evil, moon landing hoax, 9/11 truthers, those people who think dinosaurs are 6000 years old, Reagan being a hero to current Republicans
That having guns will protect you from the government overreach.
That the earth is 6000 years old
That SeaWorld doesn't care about their animals or Orcas.
African Americans can only be black.
A friend of mine is a white guy from South Africa and got a US citizenship. In bars that leads to some fun discussions.
Astrology. How many people believe that hooey is alarming.
Taking religious texts literally. I have a couple degrees in History and have painfully spent years learning how to interpret, contextualize, and understand sources. Many times the exact time period and sources of said texts. Then to have somebody look me dead in the eyes and adamantly state that I have no idea what I'm talking about and its the "literal truth". I am all for different opinions and perspectives...but come on, give me something to work with here.
Muslims believe the Quran is the eternal and literal word of god. It may be open to interpretations on meaning, but not in what it actually says.
Obama is a good president
I second this
My father works for a highway department and my mother is a teacher. We live in Wisconsin, so when Scott Walker became governor our family was very upset. It was common knowledge that he wanted to get rid of unions among other things. As time went on, benefits got taken away from each of my parents. One day my father and his coworkers got their paychecks, and as they were looking at them, they all noticed it was a few hundred dollars less than usual. One guy asked "what the hell is this?", to which my father replied, "you can thank our Governor Walker for that." The man then blurted out, "this isn't fair! I thought he was just going after the teachers."
Moral of the story, look into who you're voting for and what they plan to do once elected instead of listening to the general public opinion. Also don't be stupid, stupid.
I love that.  It's fine if you fuck over the teachers, but fucking over me!? That's totally different and unfair!
George Bush was a good president
He wasn't that good but he wasn't that bad.
he was far from the worst
He was one the worst, if not the worst, President in this country's history.
Andrew Johnson would like a word
Proof?
I'm not saying he was a great one.
You mean aside from the war crimes?
War crimes of starting the Iraq war?
Maybe something about the lying (evidence), starting an illegal war... him and Tony, fuck them.
Do you know for a fact at the time he was lying?
It was either lying or incompetence.
Any of which make him a shit president.
But how do you know it was him. he could have been given false info or false info was reported from the spies. there is a lot we don't know.
To add: if you are going to start a war, costing trillions of dollars and hundreds of thousands of lives you better fucking be 99.9999999999999999999999999999999999% sure you are doing it on correct intel.
mmm hm that is where the incompetence thing comes in.
Creationism
That it's the poor people's fault for being poor, and if they just worked harder they would be able to be rich.
The world isn't designed that way you fucks.  Anyone who gets rich on their own is likely to just sell out to the rich elite anyways.
Most stereotypes, like how all muslims are terrorists and want to kill me. I grew up in this town called Dearborn which has a huge Muslim population so naturally many of my friends were, so it always bothered me people elsewhere believe they're all bad people
But, God, does Michigan ave have some good shwarma
It's what I miss about home the most! I live in new england now and there is no good middle eastern food anywhere compared to Dearborn
Attention! Please keep in mind that the OP of this thread has chosen to mark this post with the [Serious] replies only tag, therefore any replies that are jokes, puns, off-topic, or are otherwise non-contributory will be removed.
If you don't fall within the scope the question is directed to, please do not reply to the question as your comment will be removed. If the question is "Bakers of reddit..." and you're not a baker, your comment will be removed. All top-level replies need to be from someone who is in the group the question was asked to.
If you see others posting comments that violate this tag, please report them to the mods!
Thanks for your cooperation and enjoy the discussion!
I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please contact the moderators of this subreddit if you have any questions or concerns.
That any religious people are dumb for believing in a God that cannot be proven.  Usually the individual is a subscriber to the big bang theory, which states that matter expanded rapidly to form the known universe.  The theory has no logical explanation for where the matter came from. There are only other theories that alternate unknown dimensions collided creating the matter.  Heck some people even believe that aliens created what we know of the universe.  Who creates the aliens?  The theory is as unprovable as a God.
What you are saying is incredibly stupid indeed. I am also certain you have absolutely no idea about the physics and maths involved in the big bang theory. It's not like someone came up with this using their imagination... What if I say that a flying man bear pig created the universe, can you prove me wrong? I cannot fathom why the answer to everything would have anything to do with judeo christian texts written by travelling nomads. Why would I need to disprove something that has no basis in reality. There is no "faith" or "belief" when it comes to the big bang theory, it's not something you subscribe to, it just is, like water is wet, there are many proofs and experiments to demonstrate its plausibility.
Yep, best thing about science. You can't disprove it, because it's there whether you want it to be or not
Not really.
We have evidence that there was a Big Bang, including but not limited to the expansion of the universe and background radiation. Your evidence is an old book. Any rational person will believe the former.
I'm sitting here trying to work out whether /u/proffartsalot is religious or just annoyed at people trying to disprove God.
That 60fps is the most a human eye can see or notice in a game. Ughhh no. Not true at all. I play league regularly at 144 and if I swap to 60 its like getting stabbed in the eyes.
Creationism; specifically, young-earth creationism.
"If we increase taxes on the rich they won't find ways to avoid them!"
Close current loopholes if you give a damn
Anything Jesus did. Actually, anything anyone did that would basically be called "magic" now
There's a certain point where I'm baffled that people still subscribe to the idea of religion ( Islam / Christianity / Judaism)
I can understand little children believing because you can make them believe in Santa.   But when full, decades old adults are violently attacking each other over their chosen Santa then I just can't grasp it.   I can't grasp the differences in what they see from my own.  I honestly want to truly experience how they think.  I was raised baptist, but there was a point where I just threw my hands up and said "this is silly."
I believe that religion can be a powerful tool to get people to do good and charitable things.  But I also see it used for violence, and it ruins lives then.   I guess people just really want here to be an afterlife, death is too scary.
IF they pull out their phone. I stop talking and leave.
I had a job in tech support at my university. I'd be called out to help a student and once they explained their issue, I'd start explaining how to do it (I taught software for the most part). There are SO many times where people would just whip out their cell phone and start texting while I was talking.
A few would even say, "Oh, you can keep talking." I always replied, "No, I'll wait." I am not going to talk and then have you ask me to repeat myself.
I get yelled at by my friends and family for always having my phone on silent or vibrate. I just think it's almost just as bad to be with company and have your phone constantly going off.
Unless I contain life saving information, I can think of no reason why I should ever keep my phone on loud.
This. I find this infuriating and I think to top it off is when they either ask you to repeat or cut you off mid sentence because they weren't actually paying attention.
My friend would do this everytime I was with her. Always texting around me or snapchatting me despite her completely ignoring me. I don't talk to her anymore.
God, last night I was at a forced social gathering and the person sitting across from me was on their phone playing games the entire fucking time.  Worst part was, I couldn't leave.  I hate meeting people for my husbands job because of shit like that and I'm forced to be nice even if they're being dicks.
If they talk really softly. Makes me cringe so much, not really sure why.
I get really uncomfortable when I have to continuously ask someone to repeat themselves because they are talking so quietly!
My husband does this to everyone in any service industry. He gets way too polite (I didn't know it was possible either) and starts to speak so softly I can't even hear what he said standing right next to him. Drives me nuts.
Or when they mumble.  Especially combined with a strong regional accent.  There are only so many ways to ask someone to repeat themselves before it becomes embarrassing for all involved.
Ah I agree with this a thousand times over. I feel like they're not committing to their words enough.
When they get angry because you have a different opinion. My sister does this all the time. We'll be discussing something, she'll disagree with whatever I said, and instead of arguing her case or opinion, she'll just call me something rude. People who do this piss me right the fuck off.
People are so ridiculous! It's the worst when it's something like personal taste or condition. "I'm cold." "NO YOU'RE NOT! I'M WARM!" "Uh..."
I was thinking closer to:
"It's hot out."
"Really? I'm pretty cold..."
"You're a fucking idiot."
A lot of the conversations with my sister go something like that.
I picture that said all with dead-pan expressions.
Sounds like a great conversationalist.
This is not a sales call, but.....
Grrr or the people who are cagey about WHY they are calling my wife.  "Hello is <wife> there?"  "May I ask who is calling?"  "I am a representative that would like to ask her a few questions."  "Representative of whom?"  "Is she available?" <click>
I got one yesterday that was a wrong number. They were claiming to be looking for 'Keith'.
And they were like...."well, then how would YOU like to answer our survey?"
just tell them to hold on...and just leave the phone on, and let them wait.  I forget where I read/saw it, but it worked.  About 5 mins in, I was like, just give me a minute, she's around here, hold pls.. I did that like 3 or 4 times...
but now, everything I do I just use a googlevoice number, and you can send people to a block thingy that  says" there number you are trying to call has been disconnected" ...i love it
"Would you be interested in hearing about our products?  No, no, this is not sales. I just provide information and pricing about our products.  Wait!"
When they say they don't believe we went to the moon.
"Ah, I see you believe in stupid conspiracies. Goodbye forever!"
When they start talking about something supernatural as if everyone believes such things.
"So I have a ghost in my house and the other day he..."
Nope. I'm out.
Haha, people have DONE that to you?
Oh yeah, more than once. They haven't to you?
No, luckily. I LOVE supernatural stuff, but if that was the first thing someone said to me, I'd likely believe they're new-age weird.
When I realize that I've barely talked, and they've spoken an entire novel of words.
The only time I find that acceptable is when it's a good friend and they're getting something off their chest.
Ah, good point.
But when it's not that... I just start tilting my head while giving them a wide-eyed stare. Then they stop talking and ask, "The hell are you doing?"
Sometimes I love "talking" to people like this because it takes no effort on my part. I don't have to talk, I don't even have to listen. They'll carry the whole conversation, and I can just sit back and relax.
Eh, depends on what they're saying. Honestly, sometimes there's nothing more wonderful than a person talking about something they're passionate about.
It's the opposite for me. I realise that I am almost out of breath from talking so much and they have just been nodding and saying "yep", not really trying to add anything. I get really self concious that they don't give a fuck what I am saying (which is a possibility) and then I get really quiet.
"let me tell you why I know everything about politics, religion, and all philosophical matters."
"Let me offend you very quickly!"
Opinions that are set in stone make me just give up on a conversation. Fanaticism does, too.
Yeah well I think your opinion is WRONG!
I CAN´T BELIEVE PEOPLE DON´T LIKE -TVSHOW-! It´s the best and all of them are RETARDED AND STUPID FOR NOT LIKING IT.
HOW DARE YOUUUUUUUUUU
Also, someone apparently didn't understand I was kidding around, because I got an angry PM. I promise you I was kidding. :<
:( I have never gotten an angry PM. Are you angry, by any chance?
I am not angry, but would you like me to pretend to be and send you one? :>
All right! Yeaaaah!
You got it!
One word answers.  Its a conversation, talking shouldn't be like pulling teeth.
k
Copy.
When they consistently steer the conversation to be about them.
"What a great story. Now here's mine!"
When they start to gossip or say things intentionally designed to hurt someone else's reputation in order to make themselves somehow seem superior.
I've never understood people who enjoy putting down others to feel superior. I know we all do it from time to time, but I always end up feeling awful.
Unless it's one of my sworn enemies and someone shares that sworn enemy. Then we destroy them from afar. Muahahah!
"You're going to go to hell for..."
I have no problem with religious people. Religious people don't say shit like that. People using religion as an excuse to be assholes say that. And frankly, I don't engage. "Welp, nice talking to you, gotta go, bye."
Don't judge people; offer a hand to help. Don't force religion; be there if they decide they might want to find it. Help others, regardless of what they believe. Basic human decency.
"And she was all like, ya well, whatever! like, who does that, like seriously, omg. "
"Mhm. Mhm. Yes. Quite. Go on."
"I'm not  gay, but...."
"I'm not a _____ but ______"
I'm not a racist but the Japanese have great craftmanship
Ha! Positive Racism!
Any hint of conspiracy nuttery.  Jews did 9/11, chemtrails, etc.  Those people can not be reasoned with and there is no point in ever having any conversation with them.
"I'm a men's rights activist"
If anyone announces right away that they are some sort of activist... I'm glad you support a cause you find important, but don't make that your identity.
Couldn't have said it any better myself.
When I realize they really aren't listening. They listen to respond rather than listen to understand.
Bad breath.
I have no sense of smell, so I'm always paranoid I have bad breath even though I do my best to make sure I don't. Sorry if it was ever me! :(
It was you. Sorry we don't talk anymore :/
F-forgive me?
Sure, I had no idea you had no sense of smell.
Also, what the hell?! No sense of smell?!
Haha, yeah. It sucks.
When we both run out of interesting things to say.
When they get really close to your face.
Close talkers: you take one step back and they take it as an invitation to get closer.
When I realize they are bat-shit crazy.  For some, it is their actions, not their words, that do so.  Fondling themselves or nose-picking is another conversation stopper.
Ew... I don't think I've interacted with anyone other than a child that starts nose-picking like that. EW. That is bothering me way too much right now.
Someday, someday, it'll happen.  And how about those who talk while chewing a mouth full of food?  Why do I have to tell them to stop talking until they swallow?
If someone expects a reply quickly or if it's necessary, just cover your mouth with your hand. Still not as polite, but it's much better.
Oh yes, you're preaching to the choir here because I have dental issues myself and am very self conscious about eating.
Does food fall out or something? Do you chew weird? Are my questions too weird?
Are my questions too weird?
I now understand why you asked the original question OP.  You've just crossed that boundary from curious to rude.  No offense, but I don't want to talk about it anymore.  Would you ask someone that question face to face?  Might not be offensive to some, but I'm not answering that.
Mission accomplished.
I was just showing other ways of people being annoying if you're being serious. ._.
"I don't believe in vaccines."
There is literally nothing I can say to that. I mean, "Vaccines cause autism" okay, fine, whatever, but you... don't believe in vaccines? That's not how that works. Regardless of what side effects they do or do not have, they have more than proven that they work.
Or do you know someone with Polio in a first world country?
Vaccines are imaginary, I don't know what you're talking about! People just made up that word to sound SPOOKY!
/s
Are you a medical Student from Kansas? I had this exact discussion with someone recently.
Nope. Luckily the person who said that is young enough she can change her mind and doesn't seem like she's going to get knocked up any time soon.
I can't have conversations with people who only want to complain about their circumstances. If my friends or significant other talk to me about new problems, they know I am there to listen to them and provide advice if/when they ask for it. However, if all they want to do is talk about how hard their life is without doing anything about it, I tune them out.
It's okay to vent or rant from time to time, but when every conversation is about how your life is so terrible... My cousin does that and wonders why none of us want to be around her.
When they open with a highly polarized political or religious viewpoint.  I don't even care what it is, your shouldn't divulge something as personal as your political or religious views before getting to know someone.
I was laughing about a born again Christian wedding I went to because it was so over the top and I felt very out of place. I've always had the view of 'to each their own', but I just found it really funny!
... I did not know my aunt had become a born again Christian. She handled it very gracefully.
When they attempt to sell me something in the middle of it.
Talking way too close to my face, that and all the bad "isms".
When they respond to everything I say with only things they are interested in talking about, completely ignoring any semblance of a flow of conversation. Shows me they aren't listening at all.
When they start talking negatively, or negatively about someone else.
No.
Mostly, it'll be in a dicussion, not necessarily a conversation over coffee, where I have listened but not been heard.
I love hearing people's stories. Why would someone not want to listen? :(
It's the case of stubbornness, I'd say. I've met people, and perhaps been that person at a time, who "enjoys discussion" but actually means they enjoy only sharing their opinion, not hearing other people's.
They pretend so hard that they are listening to your points and taking them into consideration.
Them being narrow minded, and pushing their beliefs on me, while not being able to accept my beliefs.
Online for me would be grammir noozis.
Generally though if they are very condescending or dismissive. Like when a religious person or an atheist think they are better than someone else because of their beliefs. Or someone who is way too obsessed with being. I like mellow people.
I'll supply the information if they ask for it, but most of the time it's just not necessary. I get really tempted to correct grammar and spelling from time to time along the thought of "nooo don't put it on your resume like that", but come on -- a lot of people aren't putting that much effort into an internet forum!
"What's up bruh"
If they are rude
Anytime I am put on hold I hang up.  Easy enough to say I got disconnected if/when they call back.
Even if it's to look up information or get an answer for you?
No, but I still hate being on hold.
Okay, I was a little worried there. I have to put customers on hold when I need to go ask the answer because I don't know it. :(
"Have you heard of chem trails?"
Ahh.. I see.. Goodbye.
That wave is perfect.
When they immediately start asking personal questions or being nosy in general (and I don't really know them that well).
"So, you got a boyfriend/girlfriend yet?"
"Oh, that job sounds cool, how much do you make?"
"Why are you working in X, when you went to school for Y?"
"Why are you talking to me when you could be silent? >:|"
I tell them about my hobby. They say "You have too much time on your hands".
Fuck you. I work hard to make time for my hobby.
What's your hobby? :)
When they over talk you constantly.
I spend a lot of time on the phone, if someone is eating / drinking or breathing down the phone (has their mic too close to their mouth) I will very quickly make sure they stop. Or conversation is over, their choice.
The moment the other showers negativity, begins to cut other and argue over trivialities, esp with strangers, acts like an intolerant control freak, or as a bigot, its a cue. Say your goodbyes.
Picking their nose, chewing fingernails, putting a finger in their ear and then looking at it or pretty much anything that involves doing something you aren't supposed to do in public to a body part.
People who are so adamant in their beliefs, even when you show them cold hard facts refuting it. I think its called the BackFire effect, when someone reinforces their ideas in light of evidence that refutes it. Also people who ignorantly state opinions like, all muslims are terrorists, or lets make the world better by killing all the diabetics, it'll weed out the genetics ect ect. ---Also Lmaopao said if someone pulls out their phone, that's a big one for me too.
When they say racist stuff.
Mentioning bodily functions/problems is another big no-no. Don't want to hear about explosive diarrhea, a rash on your taint or a ingrown hair on your nutsack. Save the talk of your period too for someone else, mentioning it to people who hardly know you is odd.
"Oh, sorry I'm being a bitch. Just bleeding out of my vajayjay, you know?"
ಠ_ಠ
being small minded, ya know? not looking at every aspect or trying to understand where another person is coming from
That drives me nuts as well! Not everyone has had the same experiences!
When they talk about something flashy they want to buy "omg I need an iphone 7 and a new prada bag. Or any sort of "So my sweet 16, wedding, baby shower will be at this fancy place, this designer cake.. etc".
Ughh I hate people like that.
Anyone who purposely gets their children into popular movies and then complains when their children like it. "OMG i have to buy FROZEN everything...." Like your the dumb dumb that got them into it into the first place.
When they start saying xenophobic and homophobic things. There's nothing that pisses me off more.
Why do people think that's okay to just start talking about?
I learned my lesson after one incident a year ago. To make the story short, the conversation ended with my best friend's girlfriend crying and my cousin almost drowning after that shitface pushed him into the river.
Well. That seems extreme.
NEVER keep a conversation with nationalistic people.
Through texting I instantly stop talking when I just get "lol" as a reply to a text, and no follow up. Hate having to always be the one to keep a conversation going.
Sometimes I will reply "LOL" and I need some time to compose myself. But seriously, I do the same thing as you.
" If you say so " makes me feel like like absolute 0 fuck is given about the current subject and the conversation overall.
Racism
"I'm not racist but..."
Whenever a guy acts like it's bizarre or special that I have knowledge of something considered "boyish". I'd consider myself an attractive woman and if I had a dollar for every time a guy told me I'm "too pretty to like video games" or pulled the "wow you're a GIRL and you like (whatever)?!" I'd have enough money to ship all of said men into the sun. I'm trying to just have a conversation about our shared hobby, stop making it about  me and how "special" I am. I'm not special for having hobbies and also taking care of my appearance. It's not as flattering as some men may think to hear this garbage. Big thank you to the guys who DONT do this, you rock. :)
Just on a similar note...
I hate that people think I'm looking for attention if I somehow say I'm a female around the same time I play video games. Most of the time I'm talking about how the dynamic has changed since I was young. It's much more common now. It was not when I had my first taste of online gaming.
I did go to my gamer's club in high school once... and one guy literally drooled when I said I liked his FFVII hat. (•_•)
A coworker of mine is incapable of not turning the topic of every conversation onto her kids.  I get it, people like talking about their kids, but every.  fucking.  time.
That would drive me up the wall.
Casual racism.
Immediately sharing their political views.
when they say stupid things... and are serious about them.
Where you start laughing and they keep looking at you with a straight face?
When they refuse to admit they are wrong.
I don't understand when people keep arguing after they've been proven wrong. It's just making them look worse.
When people start saying ignorant things with pride. Worked with a person who was proud to only know a single language. I was/am working on a second language and she was saying a person should only have to know one language. If someone wants to talk to you, they better learn it. I can see her point of view, but at the same time it's kind of a selfish way to see the world
It'd be great if communication was easier with everyone knowing the same language! ... but I really like learning other languages and some sound really pretty!
bigotry
Loud talkers. If you're in a public space, you need to be aware of the volume of your voice. Just don't do that, okay? No one wants to hear your shit. And if we're talking, believe me, I can hear you.
When talking about anything scientific, especially biology or geology, I will just end the conversation if they say they believe the  Earth is only several thousand years old.  I won't try to debate you on it because you're just too far gone.
I just don't understand how people can be that ignorant.
Insulting someone as means to start a conversation.
I hate it like, when they say like, all the time? And like, end every sentence with like a question sounding inflection? Like....
That and when they can't simply end a train of thought, they have to add: "Soooo, yeah".
I enjoy counting how many 'likes' someone said in a conversation.
I've done that too. I've already tuned out what's being said so I might as well get SOMETHING out of them talking.
Have you ever replied to them while saying 'like' over and over again in a valley girl accent?
Ha, no. I can't bring myself to do it.
Gather some courage and DO IT
I have a friend who when on a rant will say something along the line of, "he did xyz and then I was just like."
And she never finishes the sentence. You were like what? I don't get it. Haha.
Nice. Next time she does that, you should say: "So, you couldn't even?"
You've met my sister I take it.
Possibly. My sister used to and "and stuff" or "and everything" in her conversation as if it were reinforcing what she was saying. It was most annoying and took me a couple of months to break her of that habit, and stuff...
Wait they can be cured?
They can, they just have to unlearn the habit and will require a deliberate attempt by them to do so.
Poor story-telling ability, such as unnecessarily long pauses, useless information to the story, and/or ticks, such as laughing at the end of every sentence. Bonus points for when they don't understand body language, so the issue compounds even moreso.
People who don't stop talking
If they start talking about sports.
Attention! Please keep in mind that the OP of this thread has chosen to mark this post with the [Serious] replies only tag, therefore any replies that are jokes, puns, off-topic, or are otherwise non-contributory will be removed.
If you don't fall within the scope the question is directed to, please do not reply to the question as your comment will be removed. If the question is "Bakers of reddit..." and you're not a baker, your comment will be removed. All top-level replies need to be from someone who is in the group the question was asked to.
If you see others posting comments that violate this tag, please report them to the mods!
Thanks for your cooperation and enjoy the discussion!
I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please contact the moderators of this subreddit if you have any questions or concerns.
Smoking.
I have a severe hatred for cigarettes and can't stand the smoke. If they start smoking I'm gone.
The worst is when they light the cigarette then ask, "Is this okay?"
When they expose their penis
especially when they're female
Spontaneous sporadic lactation.
Has... has this happened to you?
When they say goodbye
